 It was a particularly hot summer day. The green plants lining both sides of the road stood weakly. The chirping of insects was anxiety inducing. When a grand car collided with a motorcycle under the glittering, sunlit road, the people who usually enjoyed watching lively scenes hid underneath the shade of the trees. For once, they didn’t budge. On such a hot day, even if their husbands or wives ran off, they wouldn’t be willing to step out of the door and chase after them. The person riding the motorcycle had rammed into the headlights of the grand car and had also fallen off from the motorcycle. The zipper of the duffel bag that had been placed at the back of the motorcycle broke and the items inside spilled out, rolling all over the ground messily. “Hey!” A delicate, rowdy-looking youth alighted from the car and crossed his arms, looking down at the young man who was picking up the things from the ground. “Bro, you’re here to swindle me?” He had been driving perfectly fine, yet this motorcycle had rushed out from the corner for no reason and knocked against his car directly. How could he not feel wronged? Fortunately, he had been driving normally and had even installed a recording device. Otherwise, he would be swindled again. “Sorry, I wasn’t paying attention while driving,” The young man didn’t have the time to pick up the scattered items and stood up, apologizing to the youth. “I will definitely take responsibility for what I did.” The youth looked askance at the young man as he sized him up. He had rather delicate features, but who in this age still wore t-shirts with holes in them? There was also that mess of twigs and plants on the ground. He even saw a lump of pink mud. Someone who could even treat this junk as treasure probably wasn’t right in the head. “Do you know how much the headlights on my car costs?” He kicked at a small stone beside his foot. It seemed to have also dropped out of the duffel bag. “I don’t, don’t know,” The young man stared fixedly at the headlight for a few seconds before opening his mouth hesitantly. “How, how much?” The youth inhaled deeply and told himself not to haggle with a poor ghost. He waved a hand impatiently. “Scram, scram, scram. You know you don’t have the money to compensate yet still don’t want to quickly run off?!” “You don’t want me to compensate?” The young man scratched his head. He stooped and picked up the collapsed motorcycle with one hand before forcefully pounding the top with his bare hands twice. The originally bent motorcycle head...; straightened. The youth glanced at his own thin arms and legs and then looked at the other party’s arms which didn’t seem very well-built yet contained a lot of strength. Swallowing, he stealthily took a few steps back and placed a hand on the car handle. <i>F*ck. This, this was considered threatening him with violence, right?</i>  “No, no need for compensation. Go, go,” A wise man knew better than to fight when the odds were against him. There was absolutely no need for him to be too firm when the moment came for him to be terrified. “How would that be proper?” The young man shook the motorcycle. With a bang, quite a few motorcycle parts fell out. He pushed the motorcycle to the side, stooped and rummaged in the duffel bag for a while, and then presented a black thing to the youth. “Compensation should be given after breaking something. Consume this Ranyi meat and evil spirits will be warded off, allowing one to sleep peacefully. Take it as compensation.” The youth burned with rage internally yet didn’t dare to express it out loud. He took the thing that had a fishy smell and squeezed out a wisp of a smile. “Thank you.” <i>So, not only did this bastard threaten him with violence, he also wanted to dupe him with fake medicine. Was he even human?</i>  <i>No, those who sold fake medicine never had any humanity to begin with. Anyone with the slightest bit of conscience and morality wouldn’t do this sort of thing.</i>  The young man selling fake medication was about to leave on his motorcycle when the youth summoned his courage and asked, “Can that motorcycle of yours be ridden?” <i>Don’t ride halfway, run into some issue, and deceive yourself and others.</i>  He didn’t dare to voice this statement. “That won’t happen again. I wasn’t familiar with motorcycles just now, so I didn’t control my strength well,” The young man moved his long legs and straddled the ragged motorcycle before wobbling off. He hadn’t made it very far when another piece of metal dropped from the motorcycle. The youth watched dumbstruck as the young man rode the motorcycle into the distance. He sat back in his car, regaining his wits only after a long while. <i>It was his first time coming into contact with a motorcycle and he dared to ride it on the main road. Which one of them was more like an undisciplined rich second generation?!</i>  Fu Li rode the raggedy motorcycle all the way into a tiny alley. Motorcycles and bicycles were parked in the alley, causing the originally not large alley to become even more narrow. He carefully avoided a motorcycle that had been lain down flat and crossed over an overturned motorcycle, stopping in front of a wooden door with the sign ‘Nurturing and Relaxation Club for Elderly’ hanging on it. There was mottled red paint on the dilapidated wooden door. The dull grey doorstep hadn’t been swept in who knew how long; a thick layer of dust had accumulated on it. Fu Li parked the motorcycle at the side, patted the dust off himself, hoisted the duffel bag on his back, and then stepped forward, knocking on the half-open wooden door. He rapped on the door thrice, paused for a while, and then continued to knock another three times. The cycle continued in this way. Only after a long while did a short and plump old man open the door. He was dressed in a white vest that had turned yellow from being washed too many times and was holding onto a large palm leaf fan. He looked Fu Li up and down very slowly. “Name?” “Hello senior, this younger generation is called Fu Li.” “Fu Li?” The old man stared at the palm leaf fan for a while before nodding. “Your name’s on it. Come in and register.” He entered the small courtyard house. Two mahjong tables had been set up inside. Several elderly men and women were playing mahjong at that moment. Not a single person looked up upon seeing Fu Li enter. As Fu Li followed the plump elderly man into the house, two elderly women started quarreling. In a fit of anger, one of the elderly women dressed in a cheongsam smashed the table into pieces with a slap of her palm. “Wang Cuihua!” The old man whose movements had been exceedingly slow since opening the door suddenly turned around swiftly and roared at the elderly woman wearing a cheongsam, “You smashed the table again. Remember to pay for the damage.” Fu Li saw the elderly woman who had still been swearing with her hands on her hips a moment ago deflate in an instant. “Let’s go,” The plump elderly man saw that Fu Li was still in a daze and shook his head. “Young people just haven’t seen the world.” Fu Li, “...;” The inside of the house was a little dark. Fu Li nearly tripped as he walked in. “Doesn’t your fox clan have night vision?” The plump old man shook his head even harder. “The generations nowadays get progressively worse; even this sort of clan instinct can be forgotten. You’re really losing face for your clan. Several thousand years ago, all of you could still run amuck around the world, but look at you now, not even able to see the road clearly.” “But senior, I’m not from the fox clan,” Innocence was written all over Fu Li’s face. “Why are you called Fu Li if you’re not from the fox fox clan?” The plump old man wasn’t at all embarrassed about his mistake. He calmly switched on the lights in the room and sat down in front of a shabby computer. He pointed at a stool opposite. “Sit there, straighten your back. I need to take your picture first.” The old man filled in every registration segment before pointing to the last blank and asking Fu Li, “What is your ideal job?” “Civil servant. Serving the people,” Longing filled Fu Li’s face. “It’ll be even better if I can leave my name in historical records.” Hearing this, the elderly man nearly plucked clean the buttons on the keyboard. He shook the large palm leaf fan and looked at Fu Li as if he was a weirdo. “Do you have a university degree?” Fu Li shook his head. “How are you going to be a civil servant without a degree?” The plump old man stared blankly for a long time and then asked helplessly, “Who told you to enter the city?” “Seventh Uncle Sun,” Fu Li answered. “I don’t know where Seventh Uncle Sun went either. I couldn’t find him today.” “Doggie Sun?” The old man took his time answering Fu Li’s question. “He was arrested a few days ago for making and selling fake identification.” “Ah?” Fu Li hadn’t expected Seventh Uncle Sun, who had just returned to the mountain in a very dazzling manner before the year ended, to have actually broken the law. He stared blankly for a long while before lamenting, “When I came out, everyone told me that living in the big city isn’t easy. It looks like that’s true.” “You don’t have a university degree. What about a high school certificate?” Fu Li continued shaking his head. The plump man took out a small book from a drawer and scribbled a few words on it. He told Fu Li, “It’s better for you to do physical labor at this construction site. The chief labor contractor is one of us. Whether good or bad, you can still make ends meet.” Fu Li took the slip of paper from the elderly man’s hand. An address not too far from this location was written on it in crooked letters. After thanking the old man, Fu Li turned and left the house. The plump man shook the large palm leaf fan. Only after Fu Li left did he take out Fu Li’s information and look at it for a very, very long time. The damaged motorcycle that had been parked at the entrance to the club had already disappeared without a trace. All that was left lying on the ground was a rotten leaf. Zhou Chang had stayed at home for a full two days ever since sending the headlight of his beloved car for repair; he wasn’t in the mood to go out. As usual, he slept till nearly ten o’clock in the morning before getting up. He went downstairs and was then given a shock by his father, who was accompanying his mother to watch television in glowing spirits. His father’s sleep had been poor lately and would scold Zhou Chang every time he saw him. Usually at this time, his dad would have already left for the company. <i>Why was he accompanying his mother to watch television today? It wasn’t like it was their birthday or wedding anniversary.</i>  “Son, come sit here,” Father Zhou smiled, urging his son to take a seat. “The smell of that medicine you bought for me may not be very good, but its effects are not bad. I’ve been sleeping very well the past two days and haven’t dreamed even once.” Zhou Chang stared blankly for a long while before recalling the supplements he had bought at the pharmacy two days ago to curry favor with his dad. Did those things actually have a soothing effect on sleep? “I’m just not sure what that fishy-smelling, black-colored medicine is called. Buy a bit more of that back and send some of it to your grandparents too.” <i>Fishy smelling? Black?</i>  <i>Hadn’t he bought ginseng and lingzhi?</i> At that time, he had even specially told the housekeeper auntie that the medicine was good for his father and that she had to make sure to boil soup with it for his father to drink. <i>How did a perfectly good ginseng turn black and have a fishy smell?</i>  <i>No. This wasn’t right.</i>  <i>Could that fishy smelling thing be the fake medicine that the person who had knocked into his car given him? He wasn’t selling fake medicine, but authentic medicine?</i>  Zhou Chang looked at his father’s rosy face and high spirits. He didn’t dare to tell him that the medicine was a product of dubious origin that had accidentally mixed into the bunch of medication. <i>As for him buying more of it, where was he supposed to go to buy it?</i>  Fortunately, he still remembered the name of this medicine. It seemed to be called...; Ranyi meat? Yup, that was the name. T/N: This is one of my favorite novels, so I hope I can do it justice╭( ･ㅂ･)و Despite the modern setting, it has strong elements of Chinese folklore, so be prepared for many, many translator notes~ When Fu Li found the chief labor contractor Zhao Sanxiang, he and a few other well-built men from the construction site were crowding around a small table with arms bared, drinking beer. There were several plastic bags on the table containing braised beancurd, pork, peanuts, and so on. Seeing that he had arrived, Zhao Sanxiang put down his chopsticks and dragged out a not-very-clean plastic stool from the corner. He enthusiastically beckoned to Fu Li, “Come come come, sit and eat with us.” The few men saw Fu Li’s fair, clean appearance and his slender physique and couldn’t help teasing him. “Zhao ge, which younger generation of yours is this? Such handsome looks.” “Hi!” Zhao Sanxiang pulled Fu Li to the seat and told the men, “We’re from the same hometown. He came over to make a living with me.” “Can he do our type of work?” The men burst into laughter. Clearly, they were used to joking around. They were originally even thinking of saying a few vulgar statements but for some reason, after seeing Fu Li obediently sit curled up on the plastic stool, they felt somewhat embarrassed to voice them. “Don’t be fooled by his fair looks. His strength isn’t little,” Zhao Sanxiang patted Fu Li’s shoulder and pointed at a stone at the side. “Come, give these uncles a show.” Fu Li looked at Zhao Sanxiang, wanting to say something yet hesitating. <i>These few people hadn’t even lived as long as him, wasn’t it a little improper for him to be calling them uncle?</i>  “Don’t just stare at us. Go, let them broaden their horizons,” Zhao Sanxiang placed a chicken foot at the edge of his mouth and gnawed on it, a pleased expression on his face. “Oh,” Fu Li got up and walked over, looking at the stone on their left. <i>It seemed to be on the small side. </i>He turned his head and glanced at the stone to the right that was half a size larger before looking back at Zhao Sanxiang. Seeing his encouraging gaze, he stooped and grabbed the stone on the right, lifting it up from the ground. The few men were struck dumb. Even after a long time, they still they couldn’t gather their wits. “Zhao ge, this fellow townsman of yours should be in the weightlifting team winning glory for the nation.” Looking at the stone, it had a weight of several hundred catty! Zhao Sanxiang was also shocked. He had merely wanted Fu Li to lift up the smaller stone at the side for fun, not break the world record! Their yao world had its rules – yao could not participate in human sports and would be hauled off to prison if they were discovered by the yao world’s management bureau. “Haha,” Zhao Sanxiang gave a hollow laugh and changed the topic. “This child has had a lot of strength since young. He couldn’t make it in his studies, not like your kids who score in the top five every test.” The moment they heard someone praising their children, the few men immediately broke out into conversation, using a modest tone of voice to show off. By the time Fu Li threw away the gigantic stone and sat back down beside Zhao Sanxiang, Zhao Sanxiang was already gnawing on duck feet. If he hadn’t seen wrongly, Zhao Sanxiang’s original form was a mallard. Zhao Sanxiang polished off the duck’s feet both quickly and cleanly. The bones he spat out didn’t have the slightest bit of meat on it. Fu Li couldn’t help thinking that he was indeed a yao from the countryside who hadn’t seen the world. It turned out that ducks not only ate their own kind but didn’t let pigs, cows, sheep, and rabbits off either. After everyone finished drinking and consuming all the meat, Zhao Sanxiang brought Fu Li back to his rented house, warned him a few times, and then fell asleep snoring thunderously. Fu Li didn’t sleep very well that night. Because within the span of one night, Zhao Sanxiang went to the toilet at least five times. When the sun rose, Fu Li stood by the window and paid his respects to the sun. Upon turning around, he saw that Zhao Sanxiang was still asleep. He couldn’t help shaking his head and sighing. Times were progressing, humanity was advancing, yet the yao was on an increasing decline. The bird yao that he knew in the past were diligent and capable, paid respects to the moon before sleeping, and welcomed the sun at dawn. But now...; Sadly, the hearts of the yao had degenerated. A good-looking person would have an advantage no matter where one was, even if it was a construction site. Within a short span of a week’s time, Fu Li won over quite a few people due to his good looks, diligence, and habit of hiding in the work shed even after work had ended to read. Even the plump auntie at the construction site who made their meals would specially add two more slices of meat into his bowl when he came for his meal. “Little Hu, reading again?” Uncle Zhang who had come up to greet him was from Sichuan and would occasionally mix up ‘h’ and ‘f’ when speaking. But his character was quite good; seeing that Fu Li had given up on studying at such a young age and come out to work, he even specially got his son who was on summer vacation to bring over a few second-hand books and notes from home. “These are my son’s notes, you can take a look and see if they’re useful,” Uncle Zhang placed the second-hand books and notebook in front of Fu Li. Fu Li glanced through the books. Although they were a little old, they were very clean, and the handwriting inside was neat. He could tell that the owner cherished them. “Thank you, Uncle Zhang,” Fu Li carefully placed the books and notebook aside. “I’ll return them to you when I’m done reading.” “It’s fine, my son already completed his university entrance exams this year. He won’t need these books anymore,” Uncle Zhang’s face brimmed with happiness. “He received an admission notice from the capital’s University of Science and Technology a few days ago. Me and his mom are preparing to bring him to the capital in two days and help him settle in and familiarize himself with the environment there.” With an admission notice to a university, one would be able to attend university and upon completion, become a civil servant. Thinking of this, admiration filled Fu Li’s eyes. “Uncle Zhang, your son is so impressive.” Humans were truly amazing life forms. They only lived for a few short decades but could remember so much knowledge and attend university, unlike him who had wasted the past few years. “No, no,” Uncle Zhang was greatly pleased by Fu Li’s respectful attitude and insisted on dragging him to the place he lived for a meal. Fu Li couldn’t find any way to decline and thus could only follow him. Uncle Zhang’s family members were surnamed Wang and also worked at the construction site. The work at the construction site was both tiring and bitter, but as long as the construction company didn’t delay their wages, they could save quite a bit of money every year. The couple were often very frugal with their meals and hated that they couldn’t split a cent for separate spending. Fu Li lifted the curtain and entered, realizing that quite a few different types of dishes had been placed on the table, including a large platter of roast duck. A bespectacled youth was arranging the bowls and chopsticks. Seeing the stranger Fu Li, he stared blankly for a moment before revealing a somewhat shy smile and turning to help Auntie Wang tidy up the kitchen counter. The rented house was quite small. There were two beds and a simple table. The kitchen counter situated outside on the balcony was put together from several wooden planks. The gas tank at the corner was covered in putty. “Little Hu is here. Quickly sit, quickly sit,” Auntie Wang noticed Fu Li and stooped to wipe a plastic stool before placing it in front of Fu Li. “There’s one more dish, it’ll be ready soon.” Fu Li thanked her and sat on the stool. The electric fan on the floor emitted ‘kacha, kacha’ sounds, thought it didn’t bring a slight chill to the rented house. They hadn’t even started eating but Uncle Zhang’s back and head was already covered in sweat. Fu Li, whose entire body was dry and clean, seemed disparate in front of them. Realizing this point, Fu Li tried very hard to make his face flushed, adding a bit of perspiration onto his forehead along the way. Many middle-aged men became chatterboxes after drinking; Uncle Zhang was no exception. Despite the fact that he was now living in a worn-out rental house, his heart remained strongly attached to the nation’s ground, air, and sea territories and he hated that he couldn’t abolish hegemony in the name of the Moon. Uncle Zhang’s son didn’t seem very fond of talking; all he did was eat silently. Fu Li observed him secretly and realized that he was already on his third bowl of rice. After the meal, Uncle Zhang and Auntie Wang went out to buy watermelon, allowing the two young people to interact. Zhang Peng stole a few peeks at Fu Li. Seeing the other party beam at him, his face instantly turned red and he choked up for quite a while before managing to speak. “My dad said you’re self-studying to enter university?” Fu Li nodded. “Exactly. You humans...; The books now are too hard, I don’t understand a lot of it.” “Someone who didn’t build a good foundation when young will indeed find senior high school content a bit more difficult,” Zhang Peng started to talk more when the topic shifted to studying. “Why don’t you study junior high school content first before looking at senior high school content? That would be a lot easier.” “So, you mean that my knowledge of junior high school content is too poor?” Fu Li widened his eyes and stared fixedly at Zhang Peng. Worried that his words had hurt Fu Li’s self-esteem, Zhang Peng looked up at his large, bright eyes and regretted it even more. “Not, not really, just that...; Maybe...; It’s been too long since you learnt the content, so you forgot it. I’m not saying that you’re bad at studying.” The Zhang Peng who was this old rarely lied, so for him to have thought of a perfect excuse within the short span of a few seconds was practically a breakthrough for him. “No, I think what you said makes a lot of sense,” Fu Li nodded with understanding. “I’ll go to the bookstore now and buy junior high school books.” “Wait,” Zhang Peng stopped him. “The weather is so hot, and the bookstore may not have the textbooks either, why don’t you buy it online?” “Online?” Fu Li stared blankly. “You mean internet cafes sell these things?” Zhang Peng had thought that his knowledge of the world was already poor enough. Unexpectedly, there was someone who had seen even less of the world than him and was unaware of even online shopping. From what his father had said, this Fu Li didn’t have parents and had always lived in a remote mountain village. He wanted to study yet could only do manual labor at a construction site. His life must have been very hard. “Don’t buy them. I’ll call my friend and get him to mail over past-year textbooks,” Zhang Peng was full of sympathy towards Fu Li. “Anyway, there isn’t much use in keeping these old books.” “How could I accept that?” Fu Li said this but didn’t reject Zhang Peng’s good intentions. Because. He. Didn’t. Have. Money. Just as they were talking, Fu Li heard a groaning sound from the gas tank on the balcony. He asked Zhang Peng curiously, “What’s in that tank, why is it ringing?” Zhang Peng’s expression changed drastically. Standing up, he grabbed Fu Li’s arm and dragged him out. “Quickly, run!” When Uncle Zhang and Auntie Wang came back from buying watermelon, they saw a mass of people in front of their rented house. Shocked, the two people pushed through the crowd. “What happened?” The tenants nearby were all workers from the construction site. Seeing that the husband and wife had returned, they broke into chatter. Something about how the weather had been too hot, the gas tank exploding, and whatnot. Auntie Wang was frightened into bawling. “Mum!” Zhang Peng’s glasses were broken, so when he walked out from the crowd, his eyes seemed somewhat spiritless. “I’m fine.” In the instant the gas tank exploded, Fu Li had positioned himself in front of him, so he was completely fine apart from some broken skin on his knee. Zhang Peng’s eyes reddened as he recalled how the parentless young man who was passionate about studying had been brought away by an ambulance covered in blood. He owed the other party his life. At the yao world’s management bureau, a certain administrator received a report from a good-hearted yaoguai. “A good-hearted yaoguai called to say that there was an explosion at a construction site in the western part of the city. There was spillage of yao qi, so there is suspicion that a yaoguai is causing trouble.” T/N: Please read the notes on yao-related terminology because it’s important background info in understanding the setting! There were quite a few hospital beds in the not-so-spacious hospital room. Patients squeezed together with their family members as they discussed their daily lives – whose family’s son was disappointing, whose family’s daughter was unwilling to marry, whose family’s son got into a good university...; Fu Li sat on a hospital bed crunching on an apple in his hand. Zhao Sanxiang, who was seated opposite him, had already been silent for ten minutes. The average person would have long felt uncomfortable after being stared at for so long, yet Fu Li’s ability to adapt was quite good. Not only did he not feel a single bit of discomfort, he even polished off a banana, a peach, and a bunch of grapes. <i>Kacha kacha.</i>  The apple was almost about to be completely consumed. Zhao Sanxiang finally couldn’t take it any longer and spoke up, “You’re quite hardy, even playing the hero.” Fu Li tossed the apple core into the dustbin one meter away and replied leisurely, “It’s not like I can watch him die right in front of me.” Although that family did not have any great merits or virtues, they were not bad either. In any case, it had gone smoothly. To prevent ordinary people from realizing that there was something fishy, he had even specially used an illusion technique to create an effect and make it seem like his entire body had been riddled with injuries. He had already thought it through very thoroughly. “Sh*t,” Zhao Sanxiang flushed out a packet of cigarettes from his pocket. Before he could even light it, he was given a death stare by the auntie at the neighboring bed. “Brother, look at the wall.” Zhao Sanxiang looked up. A sign stating ‘smoking is prohibited in hospital rooms’ was hung on the wall. He pinched the cigarette in his hands and then stuffed it back into the box. Agitated, he stood up and told Fu Li, “Stay in the hospital for another two days. I’m going back to the construction site.” As he walked out of the hospital room, he vaguely heard the people in the hospital room asking Fu Li a question. “Young man, the man that left just now was your father?” “No.” “I thought he didn’t seem like it either.” Zhao Sanxiang chuckled coldly. <i>Ignorant humans</i>. He was a duck that had lived for two thousand years; he was incapable of having such a foolish son. But what type of yaoguai was this Fu Li exactly? He actually couldn’t tell despite having nearly two thousand years’ worth of cultivation. When he reached the entrance of the hospital, he looked up and immediately saw a man and woman with ordinary looks walking in his direction, prompting him to take two steps back instinctively. As the man and woman passed by Zhao Sanxiang, they turned and glanced at him. He hurriedly presented a small booklet to them. He was an innocent yao who had never done any bad things since the founding of the nation. “No need to be so anxious,” The middle-aged woman glanced at the proof of innocence in Zhao Sanxiang’s hand and smiled mildly. “We’re just passing by.” Zhao Sanxiang heaved a sigh of relief. A thought suddenly rose in his mind after he exited the hospital. <i>Were those two searching for Fu Li?</i> With a turn of his head, he looked towards the entrance of the hospital as he hastened his footsteps. As they say, it was better for someone else to die than for one to die. He should make his escape quickly. Zhang Ke and Xu Yuan walked into Fu Li’s hospital room and was just in time to see an elderly woman stuffing fruits into Fu Li’s arms. Xu Yuan sized Fu Li up carefully. The other party had a well-proportioned physique and an elegant appearance. It was impossible to tell what breed of yaoguai he was from appearance. The other party didn’t even have a tiny bit of yao qi. If she hadn’t already confirmed the other party’s yao identity, she would have assumed that he was an ordinary human. It was said that certain yao who were bestowed a chance by the Heavens could easily cultivate a human form despite having low cultivation. Their abilities didn’t differ much from ordinary people, so such yao were very easily mistaken by human cultivators and yao as ordinary humans. One other possibility was that he was a formidable yao who had already reached a higher realm and returned to his natural state, so no one could see beyond his facade nor sense the yao qi on him. But...; it was impossible for a yaoguai who could only make a living on a construction site to be a formidable yao at the level of a leader in the yao world. When they first received the report, they had thought that it was a yaoguai causing trouble. But in the end, they realize after investigating the scene that this yaoguai had protected a human at the final moment. The reason why the two of them were here was so that they could give him the money awarded to him for his heroic act. The money wasn’t much, but it was still a form of appreciation from the management bureau. After listening to them explain their purpose for coming, Fu Li happily accepted the prize money of one thousand yuan, stuffed it into his pocket, and even patted it with a hand. He had finally broken away from the state of being utterly penniless. “Thank you,” Fu Li was all smiles as he thanked the two people. He picked up two apples from the side of the bed and shoved it at them. “Come, have some fruits.” These fruits were delivered by Uncle Zhang’s family, who had also paid for the medical bills during the past few days of his hospitalization. Uncle Zhang had even wanted to give him a thank-you fee but was rejected by him. He was a yao who prized education; how could he accept the money that Uncle Zhang had saved for Zhang Peng’s school fees? There was a very good human saying – no matter how poor one was, one could not neglect education; no matter how tough things were, children could not be allowed to suffer. Zhang Ke didn’t accept the apple, but Xu Yuan accepted it with a word of thanks. “You’re welcome,” The smile on Fu Li’s face was as broad as ever. Zhang Ke and Xu Yuan didn’t intend to spend too much time on a single little yao. After confirming that Fu Li was a harmless yao, they prepared to report back to the bureau. Dragon qi was richest in the capital, thus attracting congregations of yao. With many yaoguai came many weirdos; some became internet celebrities and were then arrested for selling fake facial masks, while some became thieves and even dared to use their yao abilities to escape from the police after being discovered. There were also those who cheated others’ feelings and absconded after receiving gifts, those who used confusion techniques to swindle elderly people into buying supplements, those who sold fake medicine, and those who created fake identification. Any kind of illegal means that could be thought of existed. These types of yaoguai were still all right; all they did was scam people of their money without harming them. The most savage were evil yao who murdered humans and yao; such yao had to be put on global wanted lists and would be killed without room for discussion. The two people had just walked out of the hospital room when they received news from headquarters about the appearance of a heart-devouring yao who had already taken the lives of two people and was currently on the run. “Damn, did all these yaoguai conspire or what. They know that Captain Zhuang went out of the country recently, so they’re all coming out one after another,” Zhang Ke looked at the murder scene, an extremely ugly expression on his face. In the current world, there were already not many yaoguai who dared to commit crimes so brazenly. In the hospital room, Fu Li had gathered together with everyone to watch television. The news was reporting on a murder case that had occurred at a certain location, warning residents to take note of safety when out. “Aiyoyo, the deceased is only twenty years old.” An auntie slapped her thigh and cursed, “Murderers are really good-for-nothings. Imagine how sad the relatives of this child are.” While listening to the uncles and aunties curse the unknown murderer, Fu Li, who hadn’t watched much television, paid very serious attention to the television. He smoothly grabbed a peach from the bedside cabinet and started nibbling on it. Fu Li stayed at the hospital for another two days before making arrangements for his own discharge. Uncle Zhang’s family didn’t allow him to leave the hospital, but he didn’t want to waste money, so he could only leave the hospital on the sly. While completing the discharge procedures, he was even chastised by the principal doctor for not taking his health seriously. Fu Li heaved a sigh of relief after leaving the hospital. Humans were truly impressive life forms. He remembered how a very long time ago, the physician’s legs would tremble upon seeing him. Now, they even dared to criticize him. Furthermore, not even a single statement of criticism was repeated. He glanced at the sky. The setting sun painted the entire land a red so intense that it was a little strange. Fu Li switched to carrying the plastic bag with one hand and then walked into a small alley. Quite a few people were seated in front of a food stall, including middle-aged men in flower shirts, elderly men in sleeveless garments, and even dolled-up young ladies. Fu Li’s appearance caused many of these young ladies to steal countless peeks at him. Those with more courage even took out their phones to take photos of him. Fu Li was aware of these girls’ gazes. He held fast to the principle of not looking at what was contrary to propriety and silently ate his noodles with a lowered head. The food made by humans was also becoming more and more delicious. They were truly an extraordinary race; forever improving and raising the respect yao had for them to a whole new level. Fu Li held up the huge bowl and drank all of the noodle soup, down to every last drop. Then, he took out a shoddy paper napkin from the napkin box and wiped his mouth. He had just stood up to pay when a bowl flew to the side of his foot. Fu Li turned around. Several youths with multi-colored hair were surrounding the girls and saying something, even going so far as to snatch one of the girls’ handphones. “Ge just wants to make friends with you, yet you don’t give us any face. Isn’t that a bit too unreasonable?” The girls were scared into sobbing. The boss at the side let out a few words of persuasion, but the few hooligans turned a deaf ear to him. A ladle clutched in his hand, the boss wanted to step up and stop them, yet was somewhat fearful. The other diners didn’t dare to provoke the hooligans either, causing the atmosphere to become incomparably rigid. “You already lost all your face by doing something like bullying girls, what more face do you want?” Fu Li stepped in front of the girls who had been scared into trembling and slapped aside the fingers the hooligans were pointing at the girls. “A civilized person should behave civilly.” “Where did this nosy idiot come from? Scram,” The hooligan in the lead just finished cursing when his entire body rolled out. The color of Fu Li’s eyes was very light. Under the mandarin yellow light of the streetlights, there seemed to be a faint layer of gold light over his pupils. He smiled broadly at the few hooligans. “Scram in this way?” The hooligans who only dared to bully girls took a few steps back in fear. Two minutes later, the hooligans were all tied up awaiting the arrival of the police. Out of all the rescued girls, the girl with the most courage was called Ting Ting. Seeing that Fu Li was leaving, she hurriedly stopped him. “Handsome, what’s your name?” The corner of Fu Li’s mouth curved upwards. He raised his chin and said profoundly, “Please call me Lei Feng.” Ting Ting, “What?” By the time she came to her senses, the handsome guy calling himself ‘Lei Feng’ had long since disappeared to who-knows-where. Fu Li walked through the dimly lit alleys, his head swimming from the complicated roads. He rifled through his pockets and took out a Migu Branch. He tapped the edge of the branch and the branch turned, pointing towards a direction. The Migu Branch seemed to have pointed Fu Li towards a shortcut, so certain roads he passed by were extremely narrow and had practically zero signs of human habitation. <i>Bang</i>. When a human suddenly fell in front of him, he halted his footsteps and stooped over to take a look. <i>Wasn’t this the person who gave him the prize money two days ago? Why did he fall from above?</i> He looked up. A tall and sturdily built person was standing on the fence, a strange red light in both eyes. “Quickly, go!” Zhang Ke recognized Fu Li. He forced himself to stay calm as he stood up and blocked Fu Li. “You aren’t his opponent.” “Nobody is allowed to leave. All will remain and be my dinner,” The evil yao let out a joyful laugh and jumped off the fence. There even streaks of blood on his white, furry face. Fu Li cocked his head, once again sighing at how the yao world had degenerated. In this age of peace and prosperity, even a Zhuyan dared to come out and bully others. They had degenerated, truly degenerated. The yao world’s face had been completely lost by these disappointing things. In the dark alley illuminated only by moonlight, the evil yao’s peculiar appearance appeared even more terrifying. Zhang Ke spat out two wads of blood in succession and glanced at the slender-limbed Fu Li standing in front of him. A wave of despair rose in his heart. Never had he thought that he, an outstanding disciple of the magnificent Qingxiao Sect, would perish in this derelict alley and even have his heart dug out by an evil yao. <i>No wait. Hadn’t he been blocking Fu Li? How had he appeared in front of him in a blink of an eye?</i>  <i>He still wanted to play hero at this time?</i>  “Stop putting up a pretense. The blood you spat out can even fill a bowl, aren’t you tired of standing?” Fu Li looked back at Zhang Ke and pointed at some stone steps. “Is sitting bad?” <i>Sit your ass. They were about to lose their lives and he still wanted him to sit?</i>  Zhang Ke was nearly angered into spitting out yet another mouthful of blood. <i>Did this little yaoguai know exactly what danger was?</i> Just as he thought this, the evil yao’s hands suddenly transformed into claws. The sharp claws attacked Fu Li’s chest with a swiftness that left him with no chance to even let out a ‘ah’ sound. The next second, he felt his body lifting off the ground as something hooked around his belt. By the time he regained his wits, he was already standing on the fence. “The human rules here promote civilized behavior and good social practices. Making a move without a single word doesn’t seem to align to the rules,” Fu Li was carrying Zhang Ke as if he was a small chick. Zhang Ke looked down at the unstable fence beneath his feet, not daring to move recklessly. If the fence collapsed, he would be blamed for it after going back. Forget it. It would be a miracle if he could still make it back to be blamed at this juncture. He wiped away the blood at the corner of his mouth with the back of his hand and took out a pile of talismans from his chest. He spoke to Fu Li, “Go call for help, I’ll hold him off here.” Fu Li shot a glance at the talismans in Zhang Ke’s hands. <i>The humans had simplified their style of writing, but had talismans also been simplified? Why were they all not drawn to completion? There was only so much power that could be in those talismans</i>. It was no wonder that national advancement through science and technology was the catchword of the humans today. With the lazy attitude of the cultivation world towards even things like drawing talismans, they couldn’t be relied on even if something major were to occur. “I don’t have any helpers,” Fu Li flung Zhang Ke towards the area outside the fence and spoke to him as he towered above him. “You can call for help. I’ll handle him here.” “Nobody’s allowed to leave,” The Zhuyan saw that these two humans were actually treating him as if he was invisible and advanced forward swiftly, aiming straight for Fu Li’s mingmen. Seeing him rush over, Fu Li flipped off the fence and grabbed Zhang Ke. “Forget it, let’s just escape together.” Zhang Ke had just opened his mouth upon hearing the word ‘escape’ when wind poured into it. He could feel himself hanging off Fu Li and the bounds and leaps that they were taking while he was lugged along. The speed at which they moved was so quick that he was on the verge of vomiting. <i>This Fu Li jumped so quickly, was his original form a rabbit?</i>  Every time the evil yao caught up to them, Fu Li would coincidentally dodge the evil yao’s attacks. Zhang Ke’s originally panicked breathing morphed into silence afterwards. His ears were filled with the whistling sound of the wind while the crescent moon shone brightly above him. Zhang Ke had never before felt so unconcerned whether he lived or died. Just as Zhang Ke was thinking that Fu Li would continue running, he came to a stop and threw Zhang Ke onto the ground. Zhang Ke lay sprawled on the ice-cold ground, raising his head to glance at their surroundings. There was a not-very-clean stream behind, and uncultivated land stretched all around them. Very good, the both of them would die here. At least there was one advantage about this – they wouldn’t arouse panic among the ordinary civilians. “Continue running, why aren’t you running anymore?” The evil yao’s voice wasn’t very pleasant to the ears. Its voice even carried an accent. At this moment, the thought that flashed through Zhang Ke’s mind was that this yao definitely wasn’t local. “Zhuyan, what are you doing running out here and not staying properly in your Xiaoci Mountain?” With a wave of Fu Li’s hand, the cap on the Zhuyan’s head fell to the ground, revealing his white head. A human-like face on its furry white head made for an unspeakably terrifying sight. Zhang Ke nearly thought that something had gone wrong with his ears upon hearing the word ‘Zhuyan’. <i>Wasn’t that a yaoguai that existed in legends, it actually existed in this world?</i>  The Zhuyan hadn’t expected anyone to actually recognize him. He stared at Fu Li for a very long time with narrowed eyes. After confirming that he hadn’t seen this yaoguai before, he laughed strangely. “You know who I am, and you still dare to run?” In the myths, the Zhuyan was a famous fiend that yao fled from on sight. As a human cultivator, Zhang Ke had naturally heard of the legends surrounding the Zhuyan. The him now wasn’t even moving anymore; he was ready to change to a comfortable position to wait for death. “Isn’t it you who’s good at running away?” Doubt appeared on Fu Li’s face, as if he was seriously discussing this issue with the Zhuyan. “You even forgot your own nature after all these years?” This statement of Fu Li’s made the Zhuyan recall the days when he had been bullied by the ancient yaos into hiding. A fierce exclamation erupted from his mouth immediately, “Who are you?” “I am but a nameless little yao who just happened to hear of king Zhuyan’s story,” Fu Li looked down at Zhang Ke, who was lying motionlessly on the ground. He touched the prize money in his pocket and decided that it was still better for him to be a good yao who repaid kindness. “The spirit qi in the human world is muddy. Why did the king abandon Xiaoci Mountain and come here to eat people?” “Xiaoci Mountain, how is there still a Xiaoci Mountain now!” The Zhuyan flew into a rage. “I merely went to wander the sea for a while but when I returned, Xiaoci Mountain had already been hollowed out by two beasts. Even this king’s red copper and white jade bed was not let off!” Fu Li glanced down at Zhang Ke. Zhang Ke covered his face in silence. This wasn’t any of his business. “The two beasts destroyed my territory, so I ate their hearts. That is only right and proper.” “This matter doesn’t have any relation to this human. Why don’t you give me some face and let this matter go...;” “Give you face? There are many little yao who have fawned over this king the past few years. I really haven’t seen anyone with skin as thick as yours. Who are you to dare to ask this king to give you face?” The Zhuyan mocked. “Anyway, I don’t have any territory now because of those two beasts, so he’ll be a nice feast!” “At first, I thought that this human was at fault, so if I compensate you with some things on behalf of this human, you’ll smoothly go back into hiding in the mountains,” Fu Li tugged on the sleeve of his shirt. “But your refusal to give me any face has made me unhappy.” “Hahahahaha,” The Zhuyan only felt that it was very laughable. “You’re just a tiny yao. What can you do even if this king doesn’t give you any face?” Zhang Ke suddenly saw Fu Li leap. He hadn’t managed to even get a clear glimpse of the other party’s movements when the Zhuyan was sent flying. He fell into the foul stream with a huge splash. <i>Bo-Boss?</i>  “Take this and tie him up,” Fu Li stuffed a whip into Zhang Ke’s hands. Zhang Ke took the whip that neither looked old nor new and rushed into the filthy stream without looking back. A moment later, he finished tying up the Zhuyan. Glancing at the Zhuyan who was obediently following after him, Zhang Ke couldn’t help suspecting his identity as the fiend in the legends. Fu Li smelt the stinky scent on Zhang Ke and took two steps back. It looked like it was a wise choice to let this human tie the Zhuyan up. “I wasn’t aware that senior was an ancient yao. This younger generation failed to recognize this esteemed senior, may senior please forgive me,” Zhang Ke’s first statement after climbing back ashore was an apology to Fu Li. Fu Li glanced at him in confusion. “What ancient yao. All I did was rely on this yao-beating whip to control him.” “You’re...; not an ancient yao?” Zhang Ke scrutinized Fu Li skeptically. From his appearance, he didn’t seem like the type to lie. Only then did he heave a sigh of relief. “Then what yao-beating whip is this?” “Oh, this?” Fu Li gave a brief description, “Two yao kings in the past were fighting. In the end, one of them was beaten to death and the other died after being struck by thunder. So, I conveniently picked it up.” Zhang Ke, “...;” That was sure convenient. The Zhuyan who was bound by the yao-beating whip let out a pained chuckle. Because of the yao-beating whip’s restriction, his original form was revealed. He had a snowy white head, an ape-like figure, and four red feet. He grimaced as he kneeled on the ground. “You’re yao, yet you wallow in the mire with two-legged creatures,” His scarlet eyes stared fixedly at Fu Li as his corners of his mouth pulled back, revealing sharp teeth. “The emperor of my yao race has finally awoken and will seize the land that belongs to us.” Half the moon in the sky was obscured by clouds. Zhang Ke didn’t know if it was just his misperception, but he felt that the moon seemed faintly red. “Stop thinking about groundless things,” Fu Li rapped the Zhuyan’s furry head heavily. “A feudalistic society governed by imperial power has long since been overthrown, what emperor are you talking about? All you yaoguai who come out from deep within the mountains just haven’t seen the world. Don’t you know that times have progressed and that society is improving?” He might be a yaoguai from the countryside, but he had already started to learn human knowledge, so he harbored a strange kind of pride in this area. The moment Fu Li voiced this, the frightening aura emitting from the Zhuyan instantly vanished without a trace. Zhang Ke told the Zhuyan, “Evil yao Zhuyan, you have violated the first and third regulation of the yao world by ruthlessly murdering four humans and violated the eighth and twelfth regulation by using humans as food. You will be arrested and brought to justice by the yao world’s management bureau. Come with me.” The Zhuyan laughed coldly, taking exception to these words. In the past when he feasted on thousands of people, these two-legged creatures had even obediently sent him offerings. “Hey, wait a moment,” Fu Li called after Zhang Ke. “Relax, after we lock up the Zhuyan, our bureau will return the yao-beating whip to you,” Although Zhang Ke felt that the yao-beating whip was quite a rare item, he didn’t have any intention to steal others’ treasures. “Who cares about that toy,” Fu Li waved a hand. “I wanted to say that I can be considered to have helped you out tonight. Will there be...; prize money or something?” Zhang Ke was silent for two seconds. “Don’t worry, I will help you apply for it.” “That’s good,” Fu Li was reassured. He hadn’t busied himself this night for nothing. At this moment, a girl called Ting Ting was walking out from a police station with her friends. She found the photo she had secretly captured on her phone and clicked open an online social platform. Hopefully with the power of the internet, she could find this kind person who had helped her and her friends. Although in the picture the young man wearing a shirt was seated on the inside of the food stall, his elegant appearance couldn’t be covered up. The weibo post that Ting Ting sent out in search of this person was forwarded by the local official police’s weibo, which praised his willingness to help others while simultaneously calling for men to respect women. Before two days had gone by, this weibo post had garnered the attention of many netizens. Many people were guessing the identity of the young man who called himself Lei Feng. “Little Hu, push this cart of cement over, quick!” “Kay,” Fu Li dragged the cart over. He moved at lightning speed the entire way, causing dust to fly all over the construction site. The liveliness on the internet couldn’t compare to the construction site’s chief labor contractors who had managed to secure work. Many chief labor contractors had a group of men under them and also had to acquire some connections on the construction company’s end. The occasional drinking and eating for the sake of securing work was unavoidable. Zhao Sanxiang was very good at this. It hadn’t been long since the completion of the work at this construction site, but he had already received the salary. At the same time, he had also bagged a new project. The men who followed him very willingly called him Zhao ge. Ever since the matter about Fu Li rescuing Old Zhang’s son spread throughout the construction site, Fu Li had become quite familiar with the older workers. He didn’t know if it was because Old Zhang’s error had spread, or if everyone had the same issue with pronunciation as Old Zhang, but the entire construction site was now calling him little Hu. Fortunately, Fu Li didn’t mind such things; there was no difference whether it was little Fu, little Hu, or little Hua. At noon that day, Fu Li was drinking the pig trotter soup Zhang Peng had sent over when a loud siren sounded outside. He lifted up the curtain to the shed curiously and saw that the rest were running outside. He asked at the top of his voice, “Where are all of you going?” “There’s someone attempting suicide at the construction site in front, do you want to take a look?” The man who replied Fu Li was surnamed Chen. He was fast approaching the age of forty but hadn’t wedded a wife, so he was called Old Empty Chen by everyone else. He didn’t mind it either, even happily responding when others called him that. He had good relations with the people at the construction site. Fu Li happened to be bored, so seeing that everyone else was going to join in the action, he figured that he should also behave in a way that was consistent with the crowd. “Sure, let’s go together.” A middle-aged woman in a flower-patterned shirt and black slacks was sitting at the edge of the top floor of an incomplete building. The ground that was overgrown with weeds was jam-packed with people. Peng Hang, who had rushed over after receiving the alert, tugged at his sweat-laden police uniform as he instructed the rest to ready the inflatable cushion. The ground at this abandoned construction site was craggy and uneven, and some grass had grown so tall that they were even taller than a person. The ambulance couldn’t enter, so the rescue equipment could only be carted in by people. Dajie, look at the hot weather, if you have something to say come down first. As the saying goes, find the police in times of trouble. As long as you come down, we will definitely help you,” Peng Hang gestured at his colleagues from other departments, indicating for them to stealthily enter the building. The woman’s emotions were very unstable. She sobbed while apologizing to Peng Hang, saying that she didn’t want to trouble everyone but didn’t have any choice. As she was too emotional, her body constantly leaned forward. A moment of carelessness could cause her to fall from the building. It turned out that the woman’s partner had passed away from illness two years ago and she had a child who was still schooling. She lacked a specialized skill and thus could only come to the construction site and work as if she was a man. Who would have expected that after working half a year, the chief labor contractor took the money and fled. Now, her child was severely ill and the hospital had started to press her for the hospital fees. Even after pleading with every person she could find, she still didn’t manage to pool enough money. With no other choices, it was impossible for her to live on. The woman who wasn’t even forty years old had a dark-skinned, thin, and shriveled appearance, her entire body resembling pickled radish drained of all its moisture. The sound of her weeping was both mournful and intense, making Peng Hang feel a little upset. He wiped the sweat on his face and ranted in a low voice to his colleagues. “The capitalists today are really good-for-nothings!” Then, he turned and glanced beyond the police cordon. Putting his hands on his hips, he gave a mocking smile. “Such a hot day, yet there are still people who come to watch the excitement. Tell all those watching not to jeer. It’ll be bad if they stimulate the person involved and cause the loss of a life.” “Boss, the people outside are temporary workers at the nearby construction site. They usually don’t have much entertainment, so now that something like this is happening, how can they not join in on the excitement?” His colleague Xiao Yang made a sound of agreement and went to speak to the onlooking workers. Old Empty Chen placed his palm against his head, sighing as he spoke to Fu Li, “Ai, this sort of chief labor contractor who runs after taking the money really isn’t anything good.” Fu Li didn’t say anything, because he really didn’t understand why humans would sacrifice their everything for the sake of others. “Fellow countrymen, we’re currently attempting to convince the person involved, please take care not to say anything provocative,” A very young police officer walked over, his face and head dripping with sweat as if he had just been dunked in water. “She still has a child who is severely ill. If anything happens to her, the child will be in a pitiful position.” The scene quietened. Only after a long while did one of the workers speak up, “This sister doesn’t have it easy either. Fellow officer, you must arrest that person who ran with the money.” Xiao Yang smiled bitterly. Faced with the various faces smeared with black grease, he nodded and replied, “Don’t worry, we will definitely put in our best efforts.” The negotiations didn’t seem to have gone very well. It was unknown what the woman had thought of, but she stood up. It was evident that she genuinely didn’t intend to continue living. Alarm swept through the people present and Peng Hang roared in a moment of desperation, “Dajie, think of your son. He’s still waiting for you to go back and see him.” The woman covered her face and sobbed, “It was me who let him down. I’m useless.” After saying these words, she wiped dry her tears, closed her eyes, and prepared to jump. “I have a panacea passed down from my ancestors that can cure your son!” This voice was loud, clear and extremely piercing. It was unknown if it was everyone’s misconception, but they could feel these words penetrating their eardrums, drilling into the depths of their hearts. The woman opened her eyes again. She cast a searching gaze all around her as if attempting to find the person who had spoken. Peng Hang heaved a temporary sigh of relief. Lying at this moment wasn’t considered cheating but tactics. Fu Li squeezed over the police cordon and looked up at the woman, his gaze meeting hers. “Come down. I guarantee that your son will be cured.” Peng Hang glanced at the youth in front of him. The youth was wearing an Aidadas t-shirt with a mountain on it and flower-patterned shorts. There was a layer of dust on his slippers. He was probably one of the workers at the nearby construction site. But this child was truly too honest. It would be strange if this bald-faced lie of his actually succeeded in coaxing the woman to come down. Who would have expected the woman standing at the top floor to sway and then turn around the next instant, heading down. The firefighters hiding by the windowsill downstairs hadn’t even reacted at this time. Two minutes later, a dark and thin woman ran out from the corridor. Her dried up palms clung tightly to Fu Li, a raging flame in her eyes. If this flame was extinguished, she probably wouldn’t be able to live on. “Of course,” Fu Li nodded. “I never lie.” Xiao Yang moved closer to Peng Hang, not knowing whether to laugh or cry at this scene. “Boss, what should we do now?” “What else can we do? Accompany them to the hospital first. The woman’s emotions aren’t stable yet. If we leave now, she might not be able to pull herself out of it,” He took a deep breath, the hot sun causing him to grimace. “Let’s go. Saving people should be done to the end; Buddhas should be sent to the West. We’re already under the sun, making one more trip isn’t anything much.” He turned around and glanced at the youth who was being held in a death grip by the woman. Worry was written all over Peng Hang’s face. W<i>here were they supposed to go to help the youth find the ‘panacea passed down from ancestors’?</i>  The yao world’s management team and cultivator management team were located in the same office building. One was responsible for managing non-human entities, while the other managed humans. From time to time, they would encounter a clash in opinions in private, although they didn’t dare to make too huge of a fuss. Zhang Ke’s arrest of the evil yao attracted the attention of the entire building. The workers in this office building consisted of humans and yao. However, quite a few workers had suffered injuries the past few days in order to capture this evil yao. Zhang Ke was an outstanding disciple of the Qingxiao Sect, but his cultivation was shallow. When had he become even more powerful than the pillars of the management bureau? “May the Three Pure Ones bless me,” When the cultivator management team’s Old Huang saw the evil yao’s complete form, he took two or steps back in succession. “The white head, human face, and red feet seems like one of the fiends in the legends.” “Seems like what?” Xu Yuan wasn’t accustomed to Old Huang playing the profound thinker. She scoffed, “Who cares what he is. Anyway, he was captured by our yao world’s management team.” “Don’t be anxious, Miss Xu,” Old Huang chuckled gently as he stroked the sparse strands of hair on his chin. “This type of fiend is called a Zhuyan. It’s reportedly said to be extremely powerful. However, records of it came to a stop after the Han and Tang Dynasty. I didn’t expect such a yao to actually exist in this world.” “I was still wondering who you are; turns out you’re nothing more than a weasel,” The Zhuyan was bound so tightly that his entire body couldn’t move. His eyelids drooped as he shot a glance at Old Huang, the arrogance of an ancient yao king plainly visible. “Such a plaything is only fit for this king to kill for fun.” Old Huang wasn’t angry. He continued speaking with a huge smile, “Rumors say that the Zhuyan has an extremely vicious nature. In the unofficial records of the Han Dynasty, the Zhuyan once fought with the armies of two countries in a moment of unhappiness, causing a death toll of several hundred thousand.” The audience sucked in a breath. <i>Were the lives of several hundred thousand people a trifling matter in the eyes of this yao beast?</i> The next time they looked at the Zhuyan, there was an extra layer of fear in their eyes. “Mister Zhang, did you encounter the help of an expert?” Old Huang pointed at the black whip binding the Zhuyan. “What are the origins of this whip that can restrain even a fiend?” Zhang Ke glanced at the whip in his hands. “The yaoguai who lent me this whip called it a yao-beating whip.” Old Huang thought for a very long time but couldn’t recall the origins of the yao-beating whip. He sighed with emotion, “So, it’s an expert doesn’t come out often. We should be grateful to him.” “The expert said that there’s no need for thanks. It’s enough for us to send him the prize money for carrying out a heroic act,” Zhang Ke laughed dryly. “And he’s no expert. He picked up this yao-beating whip by chance.” <i>What true expert would be so concerned about this little bit of prize money and even need to do manual labor at a construction site to earn money?</i> From what he knew, true humans or yao who had high cultivation only needed to absorb the essence of the sun and moon without needing to consume ordinary food. Only those with imperfect cultivation needed to ingest food to allay hunger. After voicing everything he knew, everyone was in agreement with giving the good-hearted yaoguai the prize money, even wanting to add on a spirit cultivation pill. Cultivation was a difficult process; although the actions of this good-hearted yao weren’t enough to warrant the pill, this sort of utterly fearless, daring to help even in the face of danger mentality was worthy of praise. Nobody dared to release the Zhuyan from the yao-beating whip. In the end, they decided to temporarily shut it in the spirit lock formation and wait for Boss Zhuang to return before dealing with it. In the spirit lock formation, the Zhuyan’s red eyes glowered at the people outside of the formation. “My emperor has finally returned.” Hearing him repeat this statement in a foreign accent, Xu Yuan cracked open two melon seeds and commented, “I didn’t think that yaoguai with eighth-grader syndromes existed.” In television dramas, villains who harped about their bosses turning the tables often didn’t live past the third episode. In the train station bustling with activity, there were fashionably dressed young people as well as middle-aged people carrying bags of all sizes. Their pace was hurried, as if isolated from the surrounding people yet still a member of the dense crowd. People of all walks of life could often be found in train stations. Although they were managed extremely strictly now, and cameras could be found everywhere, there still existed people who sought to obtain ill-gotten wealth through their ‘daring skills’. The train had just arrived at the station when an elderly man asked loudly if anyone had seen his carry bag. The passengers moved hastily; some left without even looking back while others glanced at him with pity, though they too did not stop for him. The elderly man’s skin was dark, and his face was lined with wrinkles left by years of hardship. The clothes he was wearing had been washed so often that the color had been washed out and the edges of the fabric had roughened. One could tell that his life was not a prosperous one. The sounds of his cries attracted the attention of the train station’s security guard. Fearing that the elderly man would collapse from anger, the security guard helped him to a seat at the side. Amidst the busy crowd, someone passed a paper napkin over while another handed a bottle of water to him. Their footsteps continued to remain hurried, unable to find the time to take a few more looks back. An idle person stood a distance away, watching the excitement. Turning, the person prepared to follow the stream of people out. However, he hadn’t even managed to take two steps when someone clapped his shoulder. A tremble shook through the person’s body, and the person ran forward without a single look back. “What are you running for?” A man in a suit and tie aimed a kick at the person’s ankle, causing the person to bang into the wall uncontrollably. A few wallets and handphones fell out. Seeing that he had been exposed, the person forgot about crying out in pain and instead scrambled frantically in a bid to escape the scene. But this handsome, elite-looking man with neatly combed hair who had popped out from nowhere actually used a single leg to press him down, preventing him from even crawling up. “Daring to steal even an old man’s money, aren’t you afraid of losing hidden virtue?” Zhuang Qing hauled the thief up and passed him, along with the wallets and handphones on the ground, to the security guard who had rushed over. A small plastic bag amidst the bunch was especially eye-catching. Zhuang Qing patted the dust off him before walking to the elderly man. “Daye, does this belong to you?” The elderly man took the plastic bag and opened it, trembling. Other than a few negative invoices, the rest were ten or single dollar bills. They formed a large pile, but in truth, the money was not much. “Thank you, thank you!” Moved, the elderly man thanked Zhuang Qing continuously. Even the passersby applauded in excitement. Zhuang Qing squeezed out of the crowd watching the excitement, shook the branded suit he was wearing, and then walked to the lobby of the train station. “Boss, need a taxi?” “No.” “Handsome, you’re going to Dongcheng? That’ll be seventy-five yuan. I’ll send you to the doorstep of your house.” “Not going.” Zhuang Qi ignored the numerous drivers who were soliciting customers. His gaze swept through the place before he headed towards a black car. With a knock on the car window, the window opened, and a bald head stretched out. “Boss, you’re finally back.” “The train was a bit late,” Zhuang Qing threw his luggage into the back of the car before pulling open the car door and sitting down. Immediately, his brows furrowed. “How can cultivators seek enjoyment? Switch off the air-conditioner.” Baldy turned around and looked at Zhuang Qing hesitantly. “Boss, it’s almost the end of the month. Our department’s transportation expenses for this month haven’t been used up yet, is there a need to be so stingy?” “What does this have to do with being stingy?” Zhuang Qing’s expression was solemn. “Cultivators do not fear the cold or the heat, that is the great Dao!” “But I’m just a heat-fearing fish...;” All of a sudden, a frightening pressure barreled towards him. Swallowing, Baldy switched off the air-conditioner. “You’re right, I need to overcome my natural instincts in order to become a strong cultivator.” “En,” Zhuang Qing closed his eyes and leaned against the backseat. His handsome features resembled that of a god cast in metal, so perfect that not a single flaw could be picked out. They ran into a traffic jam halfway. In the almost-forty degrees heat, not a single bit of sweat could be seen on the two people inside the car, as if the sun hanging in the sky was merely a light bulb that emitted no heat. “Has the evil yao you reported to me a few days ago been captured?” “Yes,” Chu Yu had a mild disposition, so he didn’t have much of a reaction despite the traffic jam. “That youngster Zhang Ke caught it, reportedly with the help of an expert. The yao-beating whip is still binding that evil yao. Our cultivation isn’t high enough; we didn’t dare to move him rashly, so we waited for you to return.” Chu Yu couldn’t help asking at this point, “Boss, why did you take the train back?” “There wasn’t a direct flight from that place.” “Then you could’ve transferred to a plane after reaching the Ocean City.” Chu Yu then offered him a tiny bit of flattery, “If not for all the radar and surveillance cameras, given Boss’ cultivation, flying back from overseas can be done in a blink of an eye.” The car was quiet for a moment. Zhuang Qing opened his mouth leisurely, “There’s no reimbursement for plane tickets from the Ocean City.” Chu Yu, “...;” In the hospital, Peng Hang watched Fu Li simply and crudely throw a weird-colored object into a cup. He casually poked it twice with a spoon, poured water in, and then prepared to give it to the patient in the hospital room. Shocked, Peng Hang stopped Fu Li. “Little comrade, you’ll be sent to jail if something happens after feeding someone cheap counterfeit medicine.” “But this is real medicine,” Fu Li shrugged off Peng Hang’s hand. “A gentleman’s promise weighs more than a thousand catties; I never go back on the promises I make.” <i>Was this young man not right in the head?</i>  “There’s a malignant tumor in his stomach. It can’t be cured with any flower or plant,” Peng Hang caught up to him and pulled on the corner of Fu Li’s clothes. “Brother, stop joking around. Let us police handle this matter. I’ve already called the station; we’ll help contact her household members, charities, and apply for a special financial assistance fund. Don’t behave foolishly, you won’t be able to bear the responsibility if anything happens.” Fu Li hesitated. He had practically zero contact with humans the past few years and had only occasionally ventured into human society in recent years. Moreover, he had mainly gone to human houses so that he could steal a few peeks at &lt;News Broadcast&gt;. If there had been a change in the human constitution, it was possible that the medicine might not have an effect. But suddenly, the door to the tearoom banged open. The dark, skinny woman who had been ready to jump off the building caught sight of the cup giving off a medicinal scent in Fu Li’s hands and snatched it at one go before turning and running in the direction of the hospital room. “Ai, wait!” Anxiety was about to overwhelm Peng Hang. He wanted to stop the woman but was held back himself. “Don’t be so anxious, it might be effective.” “There is no ‘might’ when it comes to human life!” Peng Hang roared in anger and irritation. “The person lying on the hospital bed is just a child!” He pushed Fu Li aside and rushed ahead in large strides. Fu Li glanced down at his hand that had been fiercely pushed aside. He had seen the bailiffs in the human world before, did all those bailiffs have such guts? The strength of a mother in despair could not be underestimated. By the time Peng Hang reached the hospital room, half the medicine had already been consumed by the child. He didn’t know if it was his misperception, but he felt that the fake medicine did indeed smell quite fragrant. Perhaps some flavoring that was detrimental to the body had been added to it. Faced with the woman’s expectant gaze, Peng Hang was unable to say that the medicine was fake. He turned and gestured to his colleague to call a doctor over. In case anything happened, they would still be in time to rescue the child. The principal doctor received quite a bit of shock upon hearing that someone had fed a patient unknown medicine. Immediately, the doctor threw away the bento box that he had only managed to eat two mouths of and raced towards the hospital room. It wasn’t that they were making a fuss over nothing. In the past, the relatives of a patient had heard about the effectiveness of some home remedy and brought it over for the patient to try. In the end, the patient couldn’t be rescued in time and lost their life. The principal doctor reached the entrance to the hospital room while panting. Leaning against the doorframe, he hadn’t even wheezed out a breath when he heard the nine-year-old patient say something. “Mummy, my stomach doesn’t seem so painful anymore.” The principal doctor thought, <i>could the medicine have painkilling effects? </i>The drug swindlers nowadays really weren’t anything good; everything they did was full of evil. He panted twice and then walked over to the bed to give the child patient a basic check-up. There were no abnormalities in the child’s heart, pulse, or pupils. When he pressed lightly on the patient’s abdominal area, the patient didn’t reveal a pained look either. “What did you feed the child?” The principal doctor looked at the skinny and small woman. The woman shook her head blankly. She looked out the door yet didn’t see the youth from just now. Where was he? “Boss!” Driver Chu Yu’s expression changed abruptly. He asked the man seated behind, “Did you smell that?” His original form was that of a fish, so his sense of smell wasn’t very impressive. But he wouldn’t be able to ignore such a rich meat lingzhi scent even if he wanted to. Zhuang Qing, who was resting with his eyes closed, slowly opened his eyes. Turning, his gaze fixed on the hospital at the side. He uttered in a low voice, “Taisui...;” Meat Lingzhi ripened once every thousand years and could cure any illness. Unfortunately, most humans and yao could not enjoy it. Among those who consumed it, the less severe cases were stricken with serious illness while the more severe cases resulted in death. As time passed, a rumor spread in the human world – someone with bad fortune would be teased for having offended Taisui. However, the Taisui that he was smelling had a very strange scent. There was no resentment, balefulness, or even karma in it. The cultivation world was in decline now and every generation of cultivators could not compare to the previous. Anyone who had this sort of Taisui that didn’t carry any karma would definitely be chased by innumerable people. Yet, why was it taken out so easily? The scent of the Taisui dissipated very quickly. No trace of it could be found in a matter of a few whiffs. Zhuang Qing wasn’t someone who had never seen good stuff, so he very quickly lost interest in such a thing. “Ai, our yao comrades don’t have it easy now either,” Chu Yu snapped out of the shock and pointed at the young man near the hospital entrance who was picking up plastic water bottles. “They’ve even fallen to the point where they need to pick up plastic bottles in exchange for money.” Zhuang Qing looked up and saw a youth wearing a t-shirt picking up plastic water bottles and throwing them into a plastic bag he was carrying. “If you don’t cultivate well and end up being expelled from the bureau, you’ll have to compete with him for work.” <i>The scent of dragon?</i>  Fu Li looked up at the blisteringly hot sun. In the past, when dragons passed by and found that the weather was hot, they would still summon a few droplets of rain and give the common people a good period of rain. The dragons now were becoming more and more stingy. Even an intrinsic characteristic like being able to call down rain had been forgotten by the dragons. Each generation truly couldn’t compare to the previous. Zhuang Qing didn’t return home; he got Chu Yu to drive directly to the Bureau. Upon hearing that their boss was returning, the bureau’s people put away the tables and shifted the stools. The disorderly documents fluttered in the air, very quickly becoming neat and tidy. The workers who were sprawled over their tables all sat up straight as if they were soldiers waiting for an inspection by a senior official. <i>Tap tap tap.</i>  As the sound of footsteps grew louder and louder, the expressions on everyone’s faces became more and more serious. The moment Zhuang Qing appeared, everyone called out ‘Hello, Captain’ in unison. Zhuang Qing’s gaze swept across everyone. Only a while later did he open his mouth lazily. “All of you know how to be scared now?” Everyone lowered their heads in shame. Quite a few people had died this time in the chaos caused by the evil yao. Ultimately, it was their fault for not having cultivated well enough. The nation was vast and there was a great number of people, but that didn’t mean they could be treated as rations for yao. Chu Yu thought about the girl whose heart had been eaten and how she had only been twenty over years old. After that girl’s mishap, her family members had nearly fainted from crying. Thinking of this, Chu Yu felt exceedingly distressed. “I’ll go see this ancient yao,” Compared to when he was scolding people, Zhuang Qing was even scarier when he showed no emotion. There was not a single person in the management teams who breathed loudly. Hearing that Zhuang Qing was going to interrogate the Zhuyan, Old Huang hurriedly revealed a fawning smile and walked in front, leading the way. There was a spirit lock formation in the basement of the bureau that was specially meant for imprisoning cultivators who had broken the law. This formation was drawn using Zhuang Qing’s blood and talismans that suppressed yao qi were also placed at all four corners. Yao who had poor cultivation would feel discomfort all over even if they entered this place, much less enter the spirit lock formation. The Zhuyan had been locked in this place for quite a few days, but his arrogant attitude hadn’t diminished. Seeing people enter, he proceeded to mock, “Incompetent humans and yao.” Zhuang Qing took off his blazer that was suffused with the scent of the elite and handed it to Chu Yu, who was behind him. “Hold it properly, don’t let blood get onto it.” Chu Yu was very obedient. Carrying the blazer, he took multiple steps back. Fortunately, a barrier had been set up in front, thereby guaranteeing that no dirt would land on this branded suit. “Zhuyan,” Zhuang Qing stepped into the spirit lock formation, looking at the Zhuyan who couldn’t maintain his human form nor move a single finger. “Ancient yao.” “Even the dragon clan’s younger generation dares to show off their claws in front of this king,” The Zhuyan glanced at him from the corner of his eyes, contempt emanating from him. “All you ignorant young ones have truly caused the might of my yao clan to degenerate.” Zhuang Qing turned a deaf ear to his nonsense and stretched out a hand, tugging on the yao-beating whip. The whip fell off the Zhuyan’s body. Seeing that the thing binding him had been released, the Zhuyan’s body morphed into a ray of light, about to fly out of the spirit lock formation. The Zhuyan had always been very confident in his speed. During those years when ancient yao were as numerous as dogs, he had relied on his exceptional escape ability to survive to this day. Yet, he miscalculated. Just as he was about to fly out of the door, golden light flashed past, locking him heavily back into the spirit lock formation as if his entire body had been struck by a thunderbolt. “Did I say you could leave?” Zhuang Qing’s arms were crossed across his chest as he towered over the Zhuyan. “According to the new law of the yao world’s management bureau, you have committed a huge offence by consuming humans as food.” The Zhuyan lay slumped on the ground. The single attack just now was too powerful; he still hadn’t fully regained his senses. The Zhuyan was a yao with plenty of tact; whenever he encountered an opponent he really couldn’t defeat, he would always choose one of two choices – kneel and acknowledge the opponent as king or turn and flee. Now that he couldn’t flee, he could only very tactfully concede defeat. He no longer side-eyed Zhuang Qing, the icy smile on his face disappeared, and he obediently laid curled up on the ground and pretended to be an ordinary ape, albeit one whose appearance was a little strange. “Who is the yao emperor?” Seeing that the Zhuyan had become well-behaved, Zhuang Qing patted the leg of his pants, his mood taking a turn for the better. The Zhuyan’s eyes met Zhuang Qing’s eyes before evading his gaze somewhat guiltily. “Act- Actually, I haven’t seen that yao either.” Chu Yu spoke from the corner, “Boss, he’s lying to you. Before you came back, he was still harping about how his emperor had returned. How could he have never seen this emperor before?” <i>Bang.</i>  The Zhuyan slammed into the wall before landing heavily on his original spot. Somebody who didn’t know what was going on would even assume that Zhuang Qing was playing a game of boomerang. <i>Heavens’ Justice, how was the dragon clan cultivating now, why was their cultivation so profound?</i> The Zhuyan spat out a mouthful of blood. Fearing that Zhuang Qing would continue to hit him, he said hastily, “I didn’t lie, I really haven’t seen the yao emperor before. I’ve only heard of the rumors surrounding him.” “Speak.” “A long time ago, the Zhongdiao and Zheng didn’t get along and got into a fight at the Wei River. Unexpectedly, they enraged the yao emperor, and in one move, the yao emperor stripped the two yao kings of their near ten thousand years’ worth of cultivation. From that moment onwards, these two yao kings vanished without a trace, never appearing again in the human world. It is rumored that the yao emperor has profound cultivation and an unstable mood. Nobody has ever seen his original form, but those who have either lost their lives or didn’t dare to mention a single word related to it. To express our reverence towards him, our yao world addresses him as emperor. A thousand years ago, a rumor spread in the yao world that a thousand years later, the fate of the country on this land will prosper and the yao emperor will reappear.” “This rumor...; why have I not heard of it?” Old Huang retorted. “Hehe,” The Zhuyan side-eyed him. “What does a tiny youngster like you know?” Old Huang stroked his beard and smiled mildly. “Boss, I don’t think he’s saying the truth. Give him another beating.” “Everything I said was the truth!” The Zhuyan looked down on Old Huang, but feared Zhuang Qing very much. “Oh right, I remembered something else. Two thousand years ago, there was a dragon who went down south and caused countless rainstorms. At that time, he didn’t know the yao emperor was nearby. He flooded the local lands and even the yao emperor’s immortal residence. Subsequently, the yao emperor broke the ends of that dragon’s horns and scraped off his dragon scales. After that, multiple people from the dragon clan went to seek revenge for him. In the end...;” He shot a glance at Zhuang Qing. Thinking that he was also of the dragon clan, he chose to phrase his words more tactfully, “In the end, they suffered quite a few losses.” How could it just be a few losses? The dragon clan had practically been subjected to extraordinary shame and humiliation. It was said that the dragons who went to fight with the yao emperor came back bald and didn’t have the nerves to come out of the sea even after a hundred years had passed. In the Nurturing and Relaxation Club for Elderly, Fu Li was seated beside the not-new-yet-not-old wooden table with a bag on his back as he watched a few elderly men and women play mahjong. These elderly men and women were the cultivation world’s retirees. When they played, they even resorted to pinching their fingers together to tell the future and using the Heaven and Earth Great Shift. “Little Fu,” Wang Cuihua was in a good mood from completing a winning hand. Ever since Fu Li sat beside her, she felt that her luck had become quite good, so she gave a melon seed to Fu Li. “I heard you don’t want to work at the construction site anymore?” “En,” Fu Li nodded. “I used medicine from the mountain and helped cure a human child of illness. I’m scared it’ll invite trouble, so I resigned.” Wang Cuihua suddenly understood. It was very normal for countryside yao who lived deep in the mountains to have some good medicine like ginseng, but it was indeed inconvenient to be asked about it. She picked up a few good tiles consecutively and said, “One of my clan’s younger ones is a manager at a large supermarket. I’ll help you ask if he has any good job openings there.” She glanced at Fu Li. “You’re good looking; finding a job shouldn’t be very difficult.” “Zhao ge said that yao like me who don’t even have a high school certificate will have difficulty making a living,” Fu Li recalled how Zhao Sanxiang had asked him to return to the countryside when he left the construction site, and felt that he had been looked down on. “You have good looks; you can go learn from those little yao and be...;” Wang Cuihua suddenly paused and lay down the tiles in her hand. “Same suit.” Amidst the complaints of the people at the same table, Wang Cuihua was a little delighted. She pressed the money she had won under the tablecloth and turned, continuing to speak to Fu Li, “It’s said that those internet celebrity things can earn quite a bit. All you yao have lived for at least a few hundred years and should know some of the four arts. Even if you’re no good at them, you can still identify antiques. That’s also a way to make a livelihood.” Fu Li shook his head. “In the past, there were some yaoguai around me who knew those, but I don’t know them.” Wang Cuihua stared blankly for a while. She sighed meaningfully. “Young yao should learn a few different skills. As the saying goes, more skills will never hold one back; one will be able to live well no matter where one lives. You can’t continue like this.” Fu Li pressed a hand to his face in distress, his large eyes staring straight at Wang Cuihua. His obedience didn’t allow her to say a single angry word. “You can’t be blamed for that either. Perhaps the place you lived at was an old forest deep in the mountains. You didn’t have the opportunity to come into contact with such things, yes?” Wang Cuihua patted Fu Li’s shoulder. “Leave the job-finding to me, I’ll get someone to open the back door for you.” “Thank you, cultivator Wang,” Fu Li glanced at the table and smiled broadly. “I hope you’ll win every day for the next few days.” “A piece of cake, a piece of cake,” Wang Cuihua’s smile became even more kindly. After growing older, she couldn’t stand seeing these good-looking and obedient youngsters being wronged. It was no wonder that there were sayings of ‘yao-like enchanters’ in ancient texts. Even she, an old lady in her seventies, had no resistance against them. The news of a child patient with a malignant tumor in the stomach making a full recovery after consuming some unknown medicine started to circulate within the hospital. However, anyone who had even a bit of understanding of medicine knew that such a thing was impossible. There was a probability of eight or nine tenths that there had been an error in the hospital’s check-up, and they were now intentionally releasing this sort of news to deceive the common people so that they could retain the hospital’s dignity. The doctors from other hospitals secretly cursed this hospital for its lack of moral principles. Coming up with such a lie just for fame; they didn’t have any medical ethics nor moral standing! Peng Hang also nearly believed that the youth had fed the child some mysterious spiritual medicine. But when he went to the construction site in search of him, he realized that the youth had already slipped away. Moreover, after the explanation a doctor-friend gave him, he too felt that this was just a coincidence. Perhaps the real reason was that the damned hospital had made an error in its examination, while that youth was aware that he had cheated others, so he fled out of guilt. If that medicine was truly so magical, why would he run off? He could casually take out a bunch to sell and he would become a millionaire, why would he still need to do manual labor? Wang Cuihua deserved to be called a senior of the cultivation world. Within two days, she helped Fu Li find a new job as a security guard at a hotel set up by one of the cultivation world’s younger generations. Because the cultivation world had a policy of assisting job-finding yaoguai from the countryside, Fu Li’s salary was the same as the other security guards despite not having a high school graduation certificate. On the first day of work, Fu Li put on his uniform and stood in the lobby of the hotel. Immediately, the security guard opposite him looked like a pumpkin in contrast. After a few days of work at the hotel, Fu Li still hadn’t seen the younger generation cultivator boss of the hotel. However, he did receive quite a few tips. This hotel was a top-grade one and many service staff or security guards had to help customers carry their luggage as part of their service duties. Fu Li had considerable strength and protected the customers’ luggage very well, so he had received numerous tips. Many customers even specially praised Fu Li in the suggestion book when they left. Thus, despite working for only half a month at the hotel, he was named and rewarded by the lobby manager during the staff meeting. After the meeting ended, Fu Li faintly heard statements like ‘boy toy’ and ‘bedwarmer’. When he turned around, those people didn’t dare to open their mouths anymore. The manager of the security department came over and patted him on the shoulder, smiling. “Little Fu, little He’s wife is going to give birth. Help him cover his shift tonight.” The reproduction of a species was a major event; Fu Li agreed without even thinking. The manager smiled even more happily. As a superior, he was naturally very satisfied with this newcomer who was steadfast, capable, and obedient. For top-grade hotels like Affinity Moon, checking-in of guests took place twenty-four hours on a daily basis, including the provision of food, beverage, leisure, entertainment and accommodation. Therefore, the employees at this place worked according to a three-shift system in order to ensure the customers could enjoy service of the highest quality at any time. After night fell, the sky became somewhat gloomy. Fu Li glanced at the sky and told the cleaner auntie who was in a rush to get home, “The weather isn’t very good. Go home earlier, don’t tarry on the way back.” “Ai, okay,” The cleaner auntie took out a box of sweets from her bag. These were the leftover sweets from the wedding in the hotel today. The customers didn’t want them, so they were distributed to the workers. “Little Fu, eat some sweets and let the happiness rub off on you. Quickly find a girlfriend that’s to your liking.” “Thank you,” Fu Li didn’t reject her. He took the box of sweets and stuffed it into the pocket of his pants. Then, he went to the front counter and loaned an umbrella, passing it to the cleaner auntie. “Use it on the way back.” The cleaner auntie didn’t intend to bring it along, but seeing Fu Li insist on it, she felt that she shouldn’t waste the kindness of a young man and thus brought it along. Midway, the cleaner auntie saw that the nearby supermarket was giving a discount on vegetables and fruits, and thus went in to buy some. She had just walked out of the supermarket when a gale abruptly arose outside. Rain and hail pitter-pattered as it struck the ground chaotically. This place was only a few hundred meters away from her house. She opened the umbrella Fu Li lent to her, blocked the frightening hail, and brisk walked towards her house. The her who was anxious to return home didn’t realize that the large hailstones that landed on her umbrella all transformed into rainwater. Neither did the strong winds overturn the seemingly poor-quality umbrella. The longer the rain went on, the stronger it became. The entire city was immersed in torrential rain. The Affinity Moon hotel was on higher ground, so no rainwater had seeped in for now. But outside, there was a dense mass of gale, sudden claps of thunder, heavy rain, and hail. It was a somewhat frightening sight. The few ladies at the front counter huddled together and beckoned Fu Li, who was standing at the entrance, to come over and hide from the rain. They were all aware that Fu Li didn’t have high academic qualifications and had come from the countryside, but because he was good-looking and polite, their good opinion of Fu Li wasn’t affected. “Do you think some almighty figure is undergoing a tribulation?” One of the front counter ladies joked. “This weather is too abnormal.” “Maybe it’s zoujiao?” “What’s zoujiao?” The front-counter ladies were all young and had a strong sense of curiosity. “Jiao who want to transform into dragons will attract thunder and rain. Then, he will find a fated person by the road to confer him a title by asking him if there are dragons or snakes in the waters,” Fu Li observed that the ladies seemed to be very interested in this, so he continued. “If the fated person answers snake, then the Jiao will fail to transform into a dragon. If the fated person answers dragon, then the Jiao will be able to soar into the skies as a dragon.” “What about the fated person then?” The front-counter ladies grew even more interested. “Will Jiao who become dragons repay the act of kindness?” “A kind Jiao turned dragon will naturally repay the debt of gratitude, but if it’s an evil Jiao...;” Fu Li suddenly stopped. “What will happen?” The front-counter ladies continued to ask. “The fated person will be eaten, concluding the circle of cause and effect.” The revolving door was pushed open, and a man wearing a black top and pants walked in with large strides, soaked from head to toe. His gaze swept across Fu Li and the rest. “The rain is very heavy, I’ll book a room.” The front-counter ladies took the identification card he handed over and started on the accommodation procedures. The black-shirt man looked at Fu Li and teased, “The rain today is so heavy, could a dragon have soared into the skies?” “There are no dragons,” Fu Li looked at the man with a calm expression and glanced at the thunder and lightning that flickered unceasingly outside. “This is a scientific society. All myths are scams.” The black-shirt man was originally smiling very cheerfully, but the next moment, his complexion darkened. He snatched back the identification card from the front-counter lady, his pitch-black eyes staring fixedly at Fu Li. He turned around and left. The front-counter ladies were very puzzled by this change. Wasn’t he going to stay in the hotel? Why was he still running outside when there was such heavy rain? “Maybe he forgot to bring his wallet,” Fu Li stood up and picked up the mop at the corner, mopping the wet footprints the customer had left behind till there wasn’t a single speck of dust left. The rainstorm continued for an entire night. When Fu Li got off work in the morning, the rain still hadn’t stopped. The rented house he lived in was quite a distance away; he still had to walk for another twenty to thirty minutes after taking public transport. Practically no one would walk along a narrow alley when there was heavy rain in the morning. Fu Li wasn’t the least bit surprised when he saw the man in black clothes standing in the alley. The man’s face was filled with anxiety. Staring at Fu Li, he repeated, “The rain today is so heavy, a dragon must have soared into the skies.” “No,” Fu Li was a principled yao. If he said there wasn’t, then there wasn’t. A gale rose immediately, producing dreadful whistling sounds in the alley. The man’s eyes turned red and a frightening black-veined pattern appeared on his face. “I’m going to eat you.” He had cultivated for a thousand years and consumed countless virgin girls and boys in his early years for the sake of becoming a Jiao. All his days were spent hiding from monks and Taoist priests, yet all of it had been ruined by this one human. Once he failed to become a dragon, he would need to cultivate for a few more centuries. Who knew whether he would lose his life to a human cultivator in this several hundred years? The yao transformed into a black Jiao and moved to attack him, prompting Fu Li to stretch out his umbrella to block it. He was the least fond of this sort of furless animal whose entire body was smooth and cold. Just a few glances at it was enough for goosebumps to rise on his skin. The occurrence of a yao who transformed into his form and started creating havoc caused anxiety to form in the hearts of all the yao in the city. The cultivators’ management bureau had rushed around for an entire night. They hadn’t even had the chance to pant a few times when they realized that the flickers of thunder and lightning in the western part of the city had already exceeded the scope of natural phenomena. “This is bad, a yao’s zoujiao failed and it’s having difficulty calming down its fury. It’s about to commit evil,” Xu Yuan put her fingers together and calculated. Pulling open the window, she jumped down from the fourth floor. In the alley, Fu Li held up the umbrella, not a single raindrop on his body. The black Jiao transformed back into his human form, a bruise on its forehead. There was a few meters’ distance between the two people. Nobody moved. “So you’re also a yao. Since we’re both yao, why didn’t you lend me a helping hand?” Fury filled the black Jiao’s eyes. “Why should I help you?” Fu Li was bewildered. Transforming into a dragon through zoujiao was inherently an opportunity given by heavenly law. This human-eating evil Jiao had identified him as his fated person and failed to be conferred a title, meaning that heavenly law was unwilling to help him. “You used human flesh and other little yao as food. There is no chance for you to become a dragon.” “That was hundreds of years ago!” The black Jiao wasn’t resigned to this outcome. “Even if I didn’t eat those people, they would have died very early on. The yao world has always been about the survival of the fittest. They deserve to be eaten by me.” Since the founding of the nation, he had never again eaten any humans. <i>For what reason should all that boring old stuff from his early years be investigated?</i>  “Heavenly law is just. It will not erase the things you have committed in the past just because it happened a long time ago,” Fu Li looked up at the continuously roiling black clouds in the sky. “Leave, you won’t become a dragon.” <i>If he still didn’t leave, all the buns at his favorite steamed bun stall would sell out.</i>  “Ignorant yao, don’t spout rubbish,” The black Jiao could no longer hold back his rage and wild nature. “I will eat you.” Fu Li sighed. “I really can’t understand all you city yao. In the past, you would kill yao for saying one sentence that you disagree with. Now, if you can’t come to an agreement within a few sentences, you still want to eat yao. Are you trying to bully us countryside yao for not having seen the world?” Fu Li believed that he was good-tempered and reasonable. However, he disliked others bullying him without any cause or reason. Countryside yao had their limits and face too. Xu Yuan’s driving skills were quite good. But no matter how good her driving skills were, she couldn’t contend with the traffic congestion in the capital. The situation at the western part of the city was changing by the minute. Stricken with anxiety, she hated that she couldn’t step onto her flying sword and directly fly over. “It’s no use being anxious,” Zhang Ke advised. “Xu jie, the capital is the land where national fate prospers. Moreover, it is overseen by a golden dragon. That evil Jiao shouldn’t have enough guts to come out and create a ruckus.” “I’m scared that he failed at obtaining his title and vented by killing the fated person,” Xu Yuan looked back at the silent Zhuang Qing seated at the back. “Boss, what should we do now?” Zhuang Qing looked at the skies over the western area of the city. The yao qi there was overflowing, and black clouds were roiling, as if a sudden clap of thunder could arise at any point in time. He took out his handphone and called the local police station in charge of public security at the western areas of the city. “Little Peng,” The chief walked out and spoke to Peng Hang, who was drinking soy milk and eating steamed buns. “Bring a team to search through all the alleys immediately. The masses have reported a suspected murderer there.” “Murderer?” Peng Hang stuffed the remaining half bun into his mouth and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand. “Chief, are you joking with me?” <i>The masses now could even tell using their naked eyes which passerby was a murderer? Most importantly, their station didn’t seem to have taken on any huge case recently?</i>  “Don’t talk so much rubbish, quickly go over and take a look,” The chief couldn’t say that it was a call from national security, so he could only let the masses shoulder the pot. Anyway, the masses comprised of so many people, who would know which person it was? Peng Hang and his colleagues went to multiple places without finding the supposed murderer. Although along the way, they did encounter two men and a woman with stern expressions who were racing towards a certain alley. After thinking about it, he and his colleagues went over as well. A young man carrying an umbrella stood in the alley, a black snake as thick as the rim of a bowl lying beside his feet. It wasn’t clear if the snake was dead or injured; it lay in a puddle of rainwater motionlessly. The young man noticed their appearance and pointed at the snake. “There’s an injured python here, does it need to be sent to the zoo?” Peng Hang propped himself up against the wall. <i>F*ck, wasn’t this the stinky brat that scammed someone using fake medicine?</i> Zhang Ke recognized Fu Li as the little yao who had lent him the yao-beating whip. He was about to happily go up when Zhuang Qing stretched out a hand and held him back. “Boss?” Zhang Ke looked at Zhuang Qing in confusion. He didn’t understand why he would hold him back. Zhuang Qing paid no heed to him. His gaze swept across the long and smooth black python lying on the ground as he spoke to Fu Li, “Many thanks to this friend for lending a helping hand.” “What happened here?” Peng Hang wasn’t clear on the origins of the two men and woman, but subconsciously felt worried that the youth who had lied and used fake medicine to rescue someone would be at a disadvantage. Thus, he fished out his police identification. “May I know what happened here?” “Police uncle, it’s you,” Fu Li pointed at the black python which hadn’t even twitched from start to finish. “I passed by this place after work and realized that there was a snake lying on the ground.” Peng Hang: <i>Who’s your uncle?</i>  He took a few steps forward and stood beside Fu Li. The entire body of the large snake was jet-black, and there were wounds on its tail and abdominal section. It had probably been struck by thunder; its wounds were a scorched black. Peng Hang hurriedly took out his phone and contacted the forestry bureau, arranging for them to send people over. After hanging up, Peng Hang turned and glanced at Zhuang Qing’s group of three not too far away. Furrowing his brows, he asked, “Who would you be?” Zhang Ke and Xu Yuang were a little stunned. They hadn’t at all expected for the evil Jiao to have been struck by thunder to this extent. Its cultivation had practically been dispersed. It would probably be unable to change into a human form without cultivating for a couple more centuries. What evil deeds had this Jiao done in the past to have been so ruthlessly struck by thunder? Anyway, the yaoguai that they were going to catch was going to be taken away by the forestry bureau. How should they deal with this? Fu Li looked at Zhang Ke. Recalling how the other party had promised to apply for the special reward for him, he told Peng Hang. “They’re my friends. They heard that I ran into a large snake, so they came over to join in the fun.” “The rain is very heavy now. Even if you want to take a look at the fun, you should still pay attention to safety,” Peng Hang had long grown accustomed to the common people’s natural fondness for going where the fun was. After ‘educating’ Zhuang Qing’s group for a while more, he spoke to Fu Li again, “Wait here for the people from the forestry bureau. I still need to patrol nearby.” “Okay,” Fu Li nodded obediently. Peng Hang wanted to give Fu Li a few more words of advice so that he wouldn’t give others anymore so-called panacea passed down from his ancestors to drink. But out of consideration that Fu Li’s friends were present, he restrained himself from doing so. Young people always wanted to present a good image of themselves in front of their friends; these words could be said later on. After Peng Hang left, the atmosphere in the alley started to become awkward. Zhang Ke wiped the rainwater on his face. Seeing that his boss didn’t have any intentions of speaking, he smiled dryly and introduced them. “Boss, this is the daoyou that lent me the yao-beating whip.” Zhuang Qing cast several interested glances at Fu Li before thanking him, “Many thanks to this daoyou for your help.” “You’re welcome,” Fu Li shook his head, unconcerned. “When will my prize money be sent to me?” “Two days later,” Zhuang Qing took a few steps forward. The raindrops that landed on him slid to the ground directly; not a single part of his clothes was wet. His legs were extremely long and slender. Within a few steps, he reached Fu Li. “I’ll write out an invoice for you later.” The yao qi on Fu Li was very weak, which seemed to have given him the opportunity to take on the form of a human being. Although this sort of yao had low cultivation, heavenly law had bestowed them a gift, so unless they voluntarily told someone their identity, they would be considered an ordinary human in the eyes of human cultivators. In the early years when humans and yao did not co-exist, this sort of yao could escape from the pursuits of religious orders, hide among the humans, and peacefully live their lives. Although humans and yao were already in harmonious co-existence in the current cultivation world, yao like Fu Li who were formed through the cause and effect of heavenly law were still an extremely rare existence. Even Zhuang Qing could barely sense the yao qi on the other party. Only then could he be sure that the other party wasn’t human but yao. A black python without cultivation was no different from an ordinary snake. Zhuang Qing took a mere two glances at it before losing interest. He turned towards Fu Li. Fu Li tilted the umbrella backwards, a pair of limpid eyes meeting his. His dark eyes were reminiscent of a night sky without moonlight or starlight. “This is an evil Jiao. It was lying here when you arrived?” Zhuang Qing looked at the surrounding environment. There were no traces of a fight. “He was still in his human form when I came,” Fu Li shook his head honestly. “He said he wanted to eat me and was struck by thunder.” Hearing this, Zhang Ke who was standing at the side revealed a somewhat nervous expression. “Are you okay?” This person was his savior; cold sweat couldn’t help seeping out of his back as he thought about how the other party had nearly lost his life in an evil Jiao’s mouth. “Why did he want to eat you?” “He asked me yesterday night whether a dragon could have soared into the skies since the rain was so heavy,” Fu Li squinted his eyes in a smile. “I said that this was a scientific society and that there was no such thing as dragons soaring into the skies.” For a moment, Zhang Ke didn’t know what he should say. During zoujiao, humans had to be the ones to confer the title. This black Jiao’s vision was a little dull; after choosing here and there, he actually asked a yao. Even if Fu Li had replied that there were dragons soaring into the skies, he wouldn’t be able to transform into a dragon. This Fu Li was also so honest. <i>What was wrong with saying that dragons were soaring into the skies?</i> In any case, it wouldn’t come true. As a young human cultivator, he still didn’t quite understand how the minds of these yao worked. “You’re right, there hasn’t been any Jiao who transformed into a dragon in the past few decades,” Zhuang Qing’s tone of voice was very flat when speaking about dragons, as if this clan had no relation to him. “There’s no longer any use for this black python, sending it to the zoo is also a good choice.” Xu Yuan sneezed. This yao who had a millennium’s worth of cultivation not only had all of its cultivation stripped but would even be regarded by the humans as an ornament to marvel at, as if it was an animal without intellect. This was practically a double whammy to the heart and the body. “It can even generate revenue for the zoo,” Fu Li nodded. Bringing joy to humans would also allow it to redeem some of its past sins. The black Jiao lying on the ground slowly raised its head. It had an innate reverence towards those of the dragon clan, so when it sensed Zhuang Qing’s existence, the head that hadn’t yet been completely raised shrank back, and its forked tongue withdrew back into its mouth. “Looks like it really didn’t die,” Fu Li crouched down, picked up a tree branch from the side, and prodded the black snake’s head. “Behave well when you’re at the zoo and you may be able to obtain better food and lodging conditions.” There was no reaction from the evil Jiao with black history as it allowed Fu Li to poke it here and there. The people from the forestry bureau rushed over very quickly and confirmed that the black python still had vital signs. Coupled with the fact that it was a rank one protected animal in the country, they specially rewarded Fu Li, Zhuang Qing, and the rest. They even took a photo with them before leaving with the black python. Two days later, the capital’s forestry bureau posted on weibo. Two pictures were attached to the post – one was a group photo with a group of warm-hearted bystanders, and the other was a picture of the black python curled up in a glass tank. However, the forestry bureau didn’t have many fans, so other than the routine likes given by their own staff members, not a single passerby had forwarded or commented on it. Fu Li didn’t know that he had been thanked by the forestry bureau. He had to transfer thrice on public transport before finding the office building of the cultivation world’s management bureau. However, the sign hung on the outside of the building didn’t list the bureau but some Chang Long biotechnology research company. The signboard was done up in a very dazzling manner. Even the front of the building contained shiny glass that refracted dazzling light under the rays of the sun. The guards at the entrance were two ordinary-looking young men whose advantages lay in their sturdy physiques; they had a lot of attitude. But, Fu Li could tell in one glance that their original forms were that of a sea prawn and a crab. Anyone with a dream was extraordinary. Who said that a sea prawn’s human form had to be short and small? After entering, he met quite a few ‘people’ along the way, though among these few ‘people’, some were yao and others were human cultivators. Fu Li had the bureau’s signed invoice, so he found the finance department of ‘Chang Long biotechnology’ without encountering any obstacles along the way. The mixed-blood dragon he met a few days ago had said that he could use this signed invoice to receive his reward at the finance department. The yao world had always paid particular attention to the purity of their lineage. A dragon who was part human and part dragon like the one a few days ago was very much not welcomed. Fu Li was a little moved as he thought of this. That mixed-blood dragon must have put in a lot of effort to have become a ‘small ringleader’ in the cultivation world today. The employees of the finance department were all human cultivators who had studied accountancy professionally. Their cultivation might not be high, but their ability to balance the accounts was very impressive, thus they were very respected within the management bureau. Upon seeing Fu Li enter, they asked a few questions in a very careless manner. However, the moment they saw the name signed on the invoice, all of them immediately sat up straight. “Is this the reward Boss specially wrote out?” Employee A of the finance department got up and poured Fu Li a cup of water. “Please wait a moment, we will fetch the prize money and goods right this moment.” Fu Li looked at the steaming-hot tea in front of him and only then realized that the mixed-blood dragon who had signed his name for him two days ago was this place’s boss. He turned around and glanced at the finance department’s very imposing furnishings, feeling somewhat envious. During the times he concealed himself and went to human houses to watch news broadcasts, he had heard humans mention that all people who worked in an office were top-class talents. Many young humans put in their blood, sweat, and tears all for the sake of becoming a civil servant. They worked even harder than those scholars in the past who took the imperial examination. The employee in charge of attending to Fu Li saw him remain silent, so he smiled cooperatively. “We weren’t aware that you were specially sent over by the boss. If we offended you in any way just now, please don’t take it to heart.” Fu Li stared blankly for a moment before realizing what the other party meant. However, he hadn’t taken such a minor thing to heart at all. He had encountered even more excessive incidents in the past where there was no space to even negotiate. As long as they could hand him the prize money, no other issues existed. The prize money was very quickly delivered by the employee. Other than the money, there was also a certificate of merit with the words ‘Outstanding Good-hearted Yao’ written on it, an unremarkable sandalwood box, as well as a black wooden box containing his yao-beating whip. Fu Li opened up the sandalwood box and found that it contained a pellet emitting spirit qi. “This is a Spirit Cultivating Pellet. Make sure to keep it close to you,” The employee was a little envious. This was a <i>Spirit Cultivating Pellet</i>; even his annual salary would only be enough to pay for half of it. Feeling somewhat doubtful, Fu Li placed the pellet emanating a medicinal scent back into the box. <i>What was a Spirit Cultivating Pellet? Was that the term of address for the product produced when the Spirit Gathering Pellet failed in the process of fire refining? The cultivation world nowadays was really frugal. Even this sort of pellet created from a refining failure was also taken out to consume.</i>  Fu Li casually threw the yao-beating whip and Spirit Cultivating Pellet into his bag, glanced into the envelope containing the prize money, and then uttered a word of thanks with a wide smile. He kept the money and certificate properly before walking out of the finance department’s office. He had just reached the entrance when he saw Zhuang Qing walk towards him. He thought about it and decided to halt his footsteps. “Fu daoyou.” Zhuang Qing still had an impression of Fu Li. A yaoguai who could transform into human form by the will of the heavens and even pick up the yao-beating whip could be considered the darling of heavenly law. Heavenly law had always favored humans. In comparison to humans, the yao were merely complimentary products that came along with the humans. So, their fate and fortune were much poorer in comparison to human cultivators. This Fu Li could probably be counted as an unusual existence among the yao. “Zhuang daoyou,” Fu Li revealed a smile. “Many thanks for the prize money given by Zhuang daoyou.” Although the Spirit Cultivating Pellet didn’t have much use, the prize money was equal to two months of his salary. “No need for thanks. It was taken from the funds allocated by the country; it’s not my money,” Zhuang Qing was very calm. “If you hadn’t lent a helping hand then, my teammate would have lost his life to the Zhuyan.” “This is a harmonious society; help should be given proactively during moments of injustice,” Fu Li tugged on his backpack. “Goodbye.” Zhuang Qing nodded and took a step to the side. Just as Fu Li was about to walk to the stairs, he stopped Fu Li. “Don’t let others know about Fu daoyou’s yao-beating whip.” This sort of formidable magic tool had enormous allure in the cultivation world. If someone were to have the intentions of snatching this treasure, this yaoguai called Fu Li might not necessarily be able to protect it. “You mean this thing?” Fu Li took out the yao-beating whip and presented it to Zhuang Qing after a moment of contemplation. “For you.” Zhuang Qing furrowed his brows, not quite understanding Fu Li’s intentions. “I heard from a yaoguai before entering the city that your bureau functions as a bailiff in the cultivation world. I don’t have much use for this yao-beating whip even if I carry it on me, so I might as well give it to you and let it be put to good use,” Fu Li stuffed the whip into Zhuang Qing’s hands. “Morality in this world is much better now compared to the past, but bad humans and yao will never go out of existence.” For this mixed-blood dragon to have reached such a high position, he must not have had it easy either. Seeing as how he had specially given him the prize money, he would give him the whip and help him attract the will of the people. “I don’t need it,” Zhuang Qing didn’t quite understand the way this little yao thought. He was so poor that he even needed to pick up plastic bottles in exchange for money, yet he so readily gave away this priceless magic weapon. <i>Was he right in the head?</i>  “If you don’t need it, you can give it to your teammates to use,” Fu Li felt that this mixed-blood dragon was a little slow. <i>Without giving his underlings some benefits, would his position be stable?</i> In the mountain he had resided in a few hundred years ago, the king of the mountain was a pig yao. After the pig yao became the king, he still knew to let the yaoguai on the entire mountain drink and nibble on some sheep meat every few days. “Take it.” This mixed-blood dragon must have put in significant effort in order to climb to this position. Fu Li admired this sort of yaoguai who possessed such energy and vigor. Zhuang Qing silently held onto the yao-beating whip for a long time before plucking two strands of hair from his head. When the strands of hair landed on his palm, they morphed into two dragon’s beards that emanated golden light. The dragon’s beards flew onto Fu Li and very quickly vanished without a trace. Fu Li could vaguely feel a strand of dragon qi attached to his body. There was even a nearly imperceptible wisp of virtue. <i>No wonder he couldn’t make out this dragon’s cultivation base. It turned out this mixed-blood dragon had not only taken on a leader’s position in the cultivation world but had even secretly joined with the fate of the nation.</i>  He really hadn’t realized that Zhuang Qing was a cunning dragon! Humans were the darlings of heavenly law, the chief of all living creatures. Therefore, no matter whether one was human or yao, one’s cultivation base would increase by a large amount if one received human recognition and worship. But, the number of yao within the past five thousand years who had received the recognition of the fate of the nation didn’t amount to even a few. If this sort of major chance actually appeared, the dragon clan would definitely have fought for it till blood flowed. How would a mixed-blood dragon have obtained the chance? <i>So, what was so extraordinary about that dragon clan that turned up their noses to the yao and acted wantonly in public? At that time, they had even mocked him for having an ugly appearance and low cultivation. If they were so capable, why did they still lose to a mixed-blood dragon when it came to vying for this major opportunity?</i>  Fu Li, who had originally only admired Zhuang Qing for his dauntless spirit, had now kicked Zhuang Qing out of the dragon clan’s circle. “With the protection of my dragon qi, other yaoguai won’t dare to touch you,” Zhuang Qing decided to accept the yao-beating whip. “Just regard our management bureau as having borrowed this yao-beating whip. We’ll return it to you again when you need it.” With a flip of his hand, an additional jade box appeared in Zhuang Qin’s hands. “This is the rent.” Fu Li took the jade box. The box contained a Spirit Gathering Pellet of the highest quality, which was emanating lines of golden light. He thought about it and handed the jade box back to Zhuang Qing. “I don’t want pellets, give me money instead.” Zhuang Qing, “...;” <i>Did this little yao have such low cultivation not due to a lack of knowledge but because there was an issue with his brain?</i>  Nowadays, panacea was rare and refining a top-quality Spirit Gathering Pellet was also difficult. <i>Yet, the other party didn’t want the pellet, but instead wanted money?</i> Zhuang Qing, who was rarely this generous, couldn’t help doubting internally if it was him who was the fool, or if was this little yao who was the fool. Fu Li noticed the odd look on Zhuang Qing’s face and assumed that he couldn’t bear to part with the money, so he heaved a sigh. “Forget it, forget it.” The yaoguai were all keeping up with the times, only the dragon clan’s stinginess hadn’t changed no matter the number of years that had passed. Out of the ten dragon clans, nine of them were stingy, and one out of these nine was immensely stingy. It wouldn’t be good for him to haggle with this sort of younger generation. Moreover, the other party had already joined with the national fate; he couldn’t afford to provoke him. For some reason, Fu Li’s ‘won’t haggle with you’ expression caused Zhuang Qing to choke up till he nearly couldn’t breathe. Zhuang Qing turned and left, not wanting to continue talking with this sort of little yao who didn’t want to work hard and only thought of using human money to enjoy a life of debauchery. Fu Li didn’t sense the abnormality in Zhuang Qing’s attitude. He exited Chang Long biotechnology research company through the main entrance and then went in search of the nearest public transportation station. Zhou Chang had been very gloomy lately. After much difficulty, he had finally done something praiseworthy in the eyes of his family members. But in the end, he didn’t manage to find the so-called Ranyi meat even after going to the various large medicinal stores, causing his family members to think of him as an unreliable liar. In all honesty, he might not attend to his proper duties and was happy to partake without doing any work, but he wouldn’t make fun of his family members. He was so angry that it became unbearable, so he specially invited an expert in Chinese medicine and inquired if there was indeed something like the Ranyi meat in this world. The expert finished listening to Zhou Chang’s description and remained silent for a long while before saying, “Mister Zhou, there is indeed a fish called Ranyi in our country’s ancient texts. The legends say that this type of fish meat has the mysterious effect of warding off evil spirits and calming the spirits.” “It really exists?” Zhou Chang was shaken. “Where can it be bought?” The expert was very tolerant towards such ignorant rich second generations, because the reward the other party gave was very high. Thus, no matter how stupid the question the other party asked, he would still reveal a mild and polite smile. “Mister Zhou, this type of medicine cannot be bought.” “Why?” Zhou Chang was unhappy again. <i>If it couldn’t be bought, then what was the thing he received the other time?</i>  “Because Ranyi fish meat doesn’t exist; it only exists in the legends. There is no such mystical animal in this world,” The expert pushed the glasses on the bridge of his nose, a trace of sympathy concealed in his eyes. “I think you might have met a liar peddling fake medicine. The effect that you assumed it had was merely the effect caused by other medicine, and not the supposed Ranyi meat.” “The fake medicine peddlers nowadays have particularly huge guts. They dare to say anything – their bragging can turn beef into dragon meat, a mountain chicken into a phoenix, and any roadside grass into a product of the Jade Lake,” The expert sighed. “In recent years, there were countless people who fell for such things, so the country has started to take severe measures against these illegal acts during the past few years. Information on such things has also been disseminated to large communities, so very few of such liars have been seen the past two years.” Of course, there were very few fools who fell for it in the first place. Unaware that the expert had felt sorry for his IQ, Zhou Chang walked out of the expert’s office with complex feelings. He didn’t want to admit that he had mistaken fake medicine as a panacea yet couldn’t persuade himself that such a mystical object actually existed in this world. He drove aimlessly all over the place. After the gloominess in his heart had finally dispersed a little, Zhou Chang parked the car at the roadside and took out his phone in preparation to give his parents a call and explain that such medicine couldn’t be bought. He still felt somewhat unwilling to admit that he had been cheated. His call hadn’t gone through yet when he caught sight of a person along the sidewalk. That person was the one who had given him the Ranyi meat. Hanging up, Zhou Chang pulled open the car door and chased after him. He didn’t even have the time to lock the car. “Wait!” Zhou Chang ran for a while before he started to gasp for breath. <i>This young man didn’t seem like he was walking very quickly, but why was it so hard to catch up to him?</i>  Fu Li had just reached the public transportation station. The bus hadn’t arrived. Fu Li was just thinking about sitting down to wait when his shoulder was grabbed a hold of. Turning around, he realized that it was the young man he had bumped into when he first entered the city. “It really is you,” Zhou Chang held onto Fu Li and refused to let him go. He panted a few breaths before telling Fu Li, “Come with me.” “Young man, kidnapping is illegal,” Fu Li didn’t move a single bit. With just that bit of strength, kidnapping him wasn’t very probable. “What would I kidnap you for? To cut out your kidneys and use it for stir-fried kidneys?” Zhou Chang pointed at the car parked in the distance. “My car is still over there. I wanted to talk to you about something.” “But I need to take public transport back...;” “I’ll send you back!” Zhou Chang cut him off. “Go go go. If we still don’t leave, the police will come over and give me a violation ticket.” Fu Li was dragged into the car by Zhou Chang and then given a cold smile. “You really dare to get into the car. Aren’t you scared that I’ll drag you to the police station?” “Why?” Fu Li didn’t understand him. The thoughts of humans were truly difficult to guess. A long time ago, he had rescued a human. Afterwards, that human remained in his cave dwelling and refused to leave. Fu Li had always been magnanimous and easy to deal with, so he didn’t chase him away and simply thought of him as a pet he was raising. Then, the human fell ill. Perhaps his lifespan was up, because the medicinal herbs the human physician found for him didn’t have much effect. That human did not fear death. Even when the medicine was ineffective, he didn’t cry or make a fuss. Yet, he uttered a few complaints as he was facing death’s door, seemingly dissatisfied with the fact that Fu Li was yao. Yet in the end, he said that he hoped he would not be human in his next life. That was several thousand years ago. Fu Li could no longer remember what the person looked like or what his name was, but still remembered the fickleness of humanity. However, human males were also quite strange. They were clearly as fickle as females, yet they were most fond of calling women the ficklest creatures. Human men were probably the most practiced at hypocrisy. “You cheated me using fake medicine and still have the nerve to ask me why?” Zhou Chang was stupefied by the other party’s calm shamelessness. “I don’t do things like cheating other people,” Fu Li was very confident in his moral conduct. “Then why did you lie to me about that Ranyi meat. The expert told me that there’s no such thing as Ranyi meat in this world!” Zhou Chang stepped onto the brakes, stopping the car along the roadside. “You knocked into my car and I didn’t ask you to compensate me. But you can’t be so shameless as to use fake medicine to cheat me. What would happen if something happened to the person who ate the medicine?” Fu Li furrowed his brows without uttering a word. The other time he looked at this young man’s facial features, he had seen that his family’s elder would be...; stricken with disaster, which was why he gifted him the Ranyi meat. Now that he took another look at his facial features, the disaster characterized by illness had already been eliminated. The medicine was effective, yet he still lied through his teeth. Humans could be said to be becoming more and more shameless. “Are the words of an expert always trustworthy?” T/N: Fu Li: *says something* Everybody else: ????? Zhou Chang was stumped by Fu Li’s question. For a long time, he was speechless. “The world is very big, and also very mysterious,” There seemed to be countless secrets hidden in Fu Li’s pitch-black eyes. Zhou Chang had parked the car by the roadside and was gazing into Fu Li’s eyes. To him, it felt like he was gazing into the abyss. “Certain things you assume don’t exist are actually hidden by your side,” Fu Li glanced behind Zhou Chang. “You will never know how many unseen things are hidden by your side.” Someone who looked very likable was saying such hair-raising things. Struck by an indescribable fear, Zhou Chang’s neck shrank back. He seemed to feel a slight chill. “Handsome, can we have a proper conversation. I-I’m someone who believes in materialism.” “Materialism is good, it can promote the advancement of science, technology, and production capability,” Fu Li shifted his line of sight and straightened his body. “Let’s go.” “Go where?” “Didn’t you say you would send me home?” “Oh,” Zhou Chang nodded and obediently drove according to the roads Fu Li mentioned. The area Fu Li lived at was very remote and didn’t have a very good environment. On the way there, Zhou Chang’s car was jolted from left to right. He couldn’t help mocking, “Handsome, if you really have so much panacea, why don’t you take it out and sell it for money? Why are you still living at this kind of lousy place?” “I don’t know who to sell it to,” Fu Li cocked his head and looked at him. “I didn’t take any money when I gave you the medicine.” Zhou Chang stared blankly for a short while but very quickly understood the meaning behind Fu Li’s words. The medicine was given to him free of charge, and he hadn’t forked out anything either. It seemed like he didn’t have any qualifications to call the other party a fake medicine swindler. <i>No, the headlight of his beloved car was broken by this youngster, didn’t he not ask him for reimbursement?</i>  The car stopped outside a shabby alley once again. Zhou Chang told Fu Li sincerely and earnestly, “Brother, I know your life might be a bit more tough. An idle, rich second generation like me doesn’t have the right to lecture you. But you’re still young. Some things can’t be done, you won’t be able to turn back once you do them. Things like medicine can save lives but can also do harm. Sometimes, fake medicine can take someone’s life. You look even younger than me, and neither are you a bad person. Don’t step onto the wrong path for the sake of money.” Fu Li looked at this solemn-looking young human and took out a stalk of ginseng from his backpack. “You make a lot of sense, but I never lie.” “What are you doing?” Zhou Chang looked at the stalk of ginseng, feeling somewhat disappointed in the young man. He had spoken this much, yet he still refused to change. <i>Was there any meaning in cheating people this way?</i>  “Car fee,” Fu Li pulled open the car door and got off. Standing on the steps, he looked at Zhou Chang. “Although your natural disposition is a lazy one, your moral conduct is pure. By nature, you will lead a happy and prosperous life. A human like you is very cute.” “Ai!” Zhou Chang wanted to reject it, but the young man walked off so quickly that it seemed a little strange. He had merely spaced out for an instant, but the young man had already walked a great distance, very quickly vanishing into the alley. The scent of ginseng permeated the inside of the car. Zhou Chang gritted his teeth and made a U-turn. He went to find an elder in his family who knew how to examine traditional Chinese medicine products. <i>What if...; this person hadn’t lied?</i>  Even if the possibility of this was so small that it was pitiful, Zhou Chang still wanted to give it a try. Perhaps it was because the other party’s gaze was too serious. So serious that he felt that it would be a sin to not trust in him. The elder received the ginseng Zhou Chang handed to him with trembling hands. The elder’s look of excited infatuation couldn’t help but make Zhou Chang doubt whether he had brought a stalk of ginseng or some bewitching monster. “Little Zhou, where did you find this high-quality ginseng?!” The elder cautiously placed the ginseng onto a tray. “Although its been sitting for a number of years, it’s pure ginseng from the wild mountains. Moreover, it’s a product of the highest quality that can’t be bought with money. Tell me, where did you get such a good thing?” “Uncle, this thing...; is real?” Zhou Chang swallowed, feeling that the way he had carried this hundred-year-old ginseng might have been a bit too casual. The elder nodded. “Some time back, a fifty-year-old stalk of ginseng from the wild mountains was auctioned for a high price of nearly one million. This thing of yours is good stuff that can’t be bought even with money. Bring it back and show some filial respect to your parents. But only use a bit every time, this thing has very concentrated medicinal properties.” Zhou Chang sat there in a daze. Only after a long period of time had gone by did he realize that his face was extremely flushed. He was a hedonistic son who had flaunted himself as a rich second generation, yet he had taken advantage of someone and even called someone else’s things fake medicine. At five o’clock in the afternoon, Fu Li appeared at the hotel punctually to take over from the previous shift’s security guard. After putting on the uniform, Fu Li walked out of the changing room. The corridor was extremely quiet. He looked around his surroundings without seeing anyone. <i>Ding, ding, ding.</i>  A ringing sound that seemed to exist yet not exist echoed from the ground. Fu Li came to a halt, not walking forward any longer. There was a saying in the human world that there were soul-catching yinchai in the underworld. With a Soul-Pulling Bell and Soul-Locking Chain in their hands, they would guide living souls whose lives had come to an end towards the underworld. Fu Li had seen yinchai twice previously. Perhaps this would be the third time. The ringing sound grew louder and louder. Fu Li turned and saw a young man dressed in a black uniform with a belt around his waist walking in his direction hastily. In his hands was a rectangular object that was four fingers wide. It looked like the handphone that humans liked to use. His other hand held onto a metal rope, which was looped around a young man wearing a bathrobe. The man was shrieking about how he ‘didn’t want to die’, had a ‘lot of money’, and other similarly meaningless things. Yet, the young yinchai was preoccupied with playing with his handphone while walking, completely disregarding the man. <i>Ding.</i>  The yinchai came to a stop and the ringing sound vanished. He raised his head and saw Fu Li, who was three steps away from him. Stuffing his handphone into the pocket of his pants, he fished out his identification document. “Yinchai’s working. Idlers should not disturb.” Fu Lu glanced at the yinchai’s identification document. The two words Niu Zhen was written on it in calligraphy. “You can see me?” The young man who was locked up pounced onto Fu Li. “Save me, save me. I have plenty of money, I can give you lots of money.” Niu Zhen sneered. “Anyone wanted by our underworld has to go. It’s no use no matter who you plead with.” He didn’t accumulate merit or do good deeds while alive, nor did he cherish his body. Only after his corpse had turned stiff did he know how to fear death. This sort of human was also interesting. “You’re a security guard at this hotel, you should be protecting the people inside the hotel!” The young man had already lost all reason. He clutched at the leg of Fu Li’s pants. “Save me!” Fu Li took a step back and gently removed the man’s hand. “I only protect the customers in this hotel who are alive. You are already dead.” “No, no. I don’t want to die,” The man’s struggles intensified. The Soul-Locking Chain around his wrist grew increasingly tight, to the point where it seemed like it had fused with his bones and flesh. The man howled in pain, his facial features contorting into a mass. “Fu Li, what are you doing still standing there!” A colleague from the security department walked over, his tone of voice unfriendly. “It’s almost time for you to start work. Don’t assume that you can slack off just because a few female customers praised you.” Fu Li looked at this colleague who was unknowingly stepping on the wailing man’s soul and nodded silently. The security guard touched his lower leg doubtfully. <i>Wasn’t the air-conditioning along the corridor a little too low?</i> Upon looking up, he saw Fu Li still remaining silent, so he said unhappily, “You...;” At this moment, the walkie-talkie at his waist sounded. “Team two, emergency gathering now. Popular artist Lu Renjia met with a mishap in our hotel!” Holding the walkie-talkie, the security guard ran towards the stairs. Just as he reached the staircase, his legs weakened all of a sudden and he landed smack on the ground. He climbed up and glanced back at Fu Li who was still standing along the corridor, before running off in embarrassment. Niu Zhen tightened the Soul-Locking Chain, nodded at Fu Li, and then dragged the young man’s soul into the distance. After the ringing sound vanished, Fu Li turned around, brushed his sleeves, and cut open the barrier. “You can leave, don’t casually enter the men’s changing room next time.” A young girl wearing a short skirt walked out of the room. She shot a smile at Fu Li, two lines of blood dripping down the sockets of her eyes. “Many thanks to this Daoist priest for lending a hand.” Fu Li didn’t reply. He still couldn’t understand humans. <i>That man was clearly already nearing the end of his life, so why did this female ghost still risk acquiring baleful qi just to let that man die in advance?</i>  “Although no yinchai has come to ferry you, this can help you find the path to the underworld,” Fu Li placed a Migu Branch in the female ghost’s hands. “I hope your next life will be peaceful.” “I am incompetent and powerless and can only hope to be able to repay this Daoist priest in my next life,” The female ghost solemnly swore an oath. “If not for this Daoist priest, I would have been regarded as an evil ghost and taken away. I wouldn’t have had a chance to be reincarnated.” “No need, this is merely something done in passing,” Fu Li shook his head. “I dislike raising humans as pets.” The female ghost was astounded. Seeing that the Daoist Priest wasn’t making a joke, she bowed deeply towards him before leaving with the Migu Branch. An hour later, the news of the popular artist Lu Renjia’s death spread widely through the various major entertainment media platforms. Soon after, the police reported the cause of his death. It wasn’t suicide or homicide, but an accidental death caused by a drug overdose. The entire country went into an uproar the moment the cause of his death was reported. What was even more shocking was that the police once again announced something two days later – Lu Renjia was linked to the death of a certain female university student who had fallen to her death half a year ago. This female student was a fan of Lu Renjia. Seeing that she was pretty, Lu Renjia intentionally invited her out and not only got her onto drugs but also wanted to r*pe her. His original intention was to get her hooked onto drugs so that she would be completely submissive towards him. However, he hadn’t expected for the girl to have an unyielding personality. As she was grappling with him, she unexpectedly fell from the building. After the girl’s death, some said that she deserved it for getting a room at a hotel even after consuming drugs, and that she received her due retribution by losing her footing and falling to her death. The pervasive insults from bystanders and her parents’ tears prevented the girl from resting in peace even after her death. In the end, she transformed into a resentful ghost and bothered Lu Renjia every day as revenge for that day’s grudge. The only thing Fu Li did was to hide her behind a barrier he erected while she was evading the yinchai. During the night shift, Fu Li was listening to the front-counter ladies gossiping about Lu Renjia and gazing into the night outside the hotel when he heard a familiar ringing sound. He stood at the main entrance and saw the yinchai who had just passed by. “It’s you!” Although this yinchai was wearing a black uniform, his hair was done up in a bun reminiscent of a style from many years back. It looked a little out of place. “It’s been so many years. You’re actually still alive?” Fu Li’s jet-black eyes stared at the yinchai. “Who are you?” The yinchai didn’t speak. Footsteps sounded from the other end of the street. The footsteps grew louder and louder. The yinchai and Fu Li glanced in the direction of the footsteps simultaneously. A handsome man dressed in a suit appeared at the corner of the street. An expression of reverence unraveled on the yinchai’s face upon seeing the man’s appearance. “Mr Zhuang Qing.” Zhuang Qing nodded, his gaze sweeping across Fu Li. He came to a stop, not intending to join their conversation. The underworld and management bureau had dealings with each other. With Zhuang Qing present, the yinchai became much more reserved. However, seeing Fu Li had made him recall the events that had happened many years ago. At that time, he had just become a yinchai and hadn’t gotten used to witnessing separations caused by death. The occasional grief and sadness of a ghost’s loved ones had made it difficult for him to relieve the tension in his heart. He had a time when he had even encountered a yaoguai with a cultivation base who attempted to forcibly seize the soul of the deceased from him, preventing him from taking the soul to the underworld. Upon knowing that he had to fetch a human soul at a mountain where yao cultivators resided, he was extremely fearful the entire way there. When he rushed to the place, the yao cultivator was sitting beside the deceased’s corpse, having helped cover the corpse with a pretty brocade quilt. It was said that such brocade quilts weaved from silk produced by spirit silkworms could prevent the corpse from rotting for a hundred years. The moment the yinchai saw this attitude, he felt a sense of doom. Even this sort of quilt had been taken out; it would probably be somewhat difficult for him to take the soul away this day. Fortunately, the soul didn’t weep or raise a fuss about not wanting to die. The yao cultivator didn’t appear to demand anything of him either, not uttering a single word from start to end. Only when he tightened the Soul-Locking Chain did the yao cultivator tell him to make his actions a little gentler. He did so accordingly. The soul didn’t say anything along the way. Only after they passed through the entrance to the underworld did tears of blood drip from the soul’s eyes, forming two bloody lines. The image of scarlet tears paired with an expressionless face was truly too shocking, which was why the yinchai could still remember that soul and yao cultivator even after so many years had passed. “Two thousand years ago, this humble one had the chance to meet you,” The yinchai didn’t mention that human soul, fearing that this yao cultivator would ask him who that human had reincarnated as. “Two thousand years ago...;” Fu Li thought about it for a very long time and then recalled the first time he had met a yinchai. “You’re the yinchai that was sent by the underworld?” The yinchai smiled awkwardly. He had indeed been very lacking in courage that year. “This humble one is called Li Xu. It is also fate that we can meet again after many years.” He noticed the uniform Fu Li was wearing. <i>He was...; a security guard in the human world?</i>  Fu Li noticed that the uniform Li Xu was wearing differed from the yinchai he saw in the evening and commented with understanding, “It seems you’ve been promoted in these two thousand years.” Li Xu smiled and fished out a cigarette from his pocket, handing it to Fu Li. After Fu Li declined, he lit it for himself. “I thought, like the other yao on that mountain, you had also...;” He glanced at Zhuang Qing not too far away and swallowed his words. He had only gone to that mountain once to guide that soul. Only after he asked the other yinchai a hundred years later about the yao cultivators on that mountain did he learn about the incident that had taken place in the eightieth year of his soul-ferrying. At that time, several azure dragons had caused repeated rainstorms from playing with water. The yao cultivators on that mountain couldn’t bear to see the humans suffer and so pleaded for leniency with those few dragons. Yet, who would have expected for the azure dragons to fly into a rage? In the end, some of those yao cultivators perished while others were wounded. Even the entire mountain was razed to the ground. Li Xu had assumed that this yao cultivator had also died. Yet, despite these vicissitudes of life, this yao still managed to survive till this day. Fu Li’s eyelids drooped. There wasn’t much fluctuation in his tone of voice despite the mention of this past event. “I had already fallen asleep at that time.” Li Xu was struck by a sudden realization. It was probably because of this that this yao had escaped death. “<i>Bang!</i>” A loud sound echoed in the distance. Fire shot towards the sky. Li Xu threw the cigarette, stamping it out firmly beneath the heel of his shoe. “I should do my work.” “Wait,” Fu Li called after him. Li Xu’s heart tightened. <i>Was the other party going to ask him about that human?</i>  “Don’t litter,” Fu Li pointed at the cigarette butt beside his foot and then shifted his finger towards a labeled rubbish bin not too far away. Li Xu, “...;” Resigned, he lowered his head and picked up the cigarette butt before throwing it into the rubbish bin a few meters away. “Little handsome Fu, who are you talking to?” The front-counter lady saw Fu Li speaking to the air outside. She couldn’t help feeling a shiver snake down her back, thinking that she had finally seen a legendary supernatural event. Almost every hotel would have some strange stories circulating internally. This sort of law was similar to the premise that schools were always built on top of places like cemeteries and temples. “A friend,” Fu Li’s gaze landed on Zhuang Qing. “He came to find me for something.” Under Fu Li’s attentive gaze, Zhuang Qing came closer and appeared within the front-counter lady’s field of vision. With one glance, the front-counter lady felt she had been listening to too many ghost stories lately. <i>What ghost would look this handsome and elite?</i> She very honestly bowed down to the power of beauty. At this moment, someone came to do the lodging procedures, so even if the front-counter lady wanted to drool at the handsome guy’s good looks, she still had to finish her work first. “Mr Zhuang, please sit,” Fu Li fetched Zhuang Qing a drink and then led him to sit down at the sofas in the public resting area. “An artist died in your hotel today?” Zhuang Qing got right to the point. “Were you at the scene?” Fu Li shook his head. “I’m a newcomer. Unless the customer requires it, I don’t have the qualifications to go to the VIP room.” “I understand,” Zhuang Qing stood up. Seeing Fu Li sit up straight in his uniform, the him who had never liked to meddle in other people’s business couldn’t help but ask another question, “You’re just going to be a security guard?” “No. My dream is to be a civil servant,” Fu Li saw that Zhuang Qing wasn’t drinking, so he simply lifted it up and drank it himself. “Unfortunately, I’m still lacking something.” “Lacking what?” Zhuang Qing asked. “A university degree.” Zhuang Qing felt an indescribable sullenness. He wanted to ask him about a few more things, but Fu Li had already gone to help customers carry their luggage. Zhuang Qing turned and walked out of the hotel. He looked into the distance and saw a chain accident that had occurred a few hundred meters away. A long string of souls was hooked up to the yinchai’s Soul-Locking Chain. The scene was full of chaos. Police cars, fire engines, and ambulances shuttled back and forth, while the private cars squeezed to the side to make way for them. The entire scene was a tragic sight. An ambulance swooshed past him. He stuck a hand into the pocket of his pants expressionlessly, till the yinchai leading the souls appeared in front of him. The night wind arose, carrying with it the faint scent of blood. “Mr Zhuang?” Li Xu saw Zhuang Qing standing on the spot motionlessly. Thinking that he was looking for him, he stopped and asked, “Are you looking for me for something?” Zhuang Qing saw that there were males, females, elderly, and the young among the souls. After a short glance, he retrieved his line of sight. “Were there any unusual circumstances when your underworld came to ferry a soul at Affinity Moon Hotel this afternoon?” “I’ve not heard of any. The boss of Affinity Moon Hotel has relations to the cultivation world. No average person would dare to do anything in the hotel,” Li Xu replied. “That celebrity is a good-for-nothing. The evil deeds he committed in his life is enough to form a huge mountain. It is very likely that he will be put into forced labor in the underworld for a few centuries. He didn’t accumulate fortune in his past life, and didn’t cultivate morality in this life; who knows what he’ll be reincarnated as in his next life.” “Boss!” Chu Yu drove the car over. Upon seeing Li Xu, he smiled and said, “Oh, yinchai chief <i>daren</i>, why did you personally come out to ferry souls today?” “My colleagues are too busy, so I helped make a trip,” Li Xu knew that the two people had things to do, so he said very tactfully, “I’ll take my leave first. Please do as you wish.” When Li Xu left, Chu Yu shook his head at Zhuang Qing. Zhuang Qing sat inside the car and leaned his head, looking at the tall building not too far in the distance. The lighted signboard was very dazzling. The three words, ‘Affinity Moon Hotel’ could be seen from a huge distance away. “I made one round around the Affinity Moon Hotel, but didn’t sense even a bit of baleful qi. I contacted Wang Han just now. He said there’s only one yao among this hotel’s employees, called...;” “Fu Li,” Zhuang Qing opened his mouth. When he recited these two words, his manner of speaking was both strange and rigid, as if he was speaking about a stone by the roadside, or an unremarkable tiny flower. “I already saw him just now.” Chu Yu was very sensitive towards yao qi and baleful qi. He could very easily catch on to smells that others couldn’t. If not for his original form being a fish and not a dog, he would definitely be able to make a living as a police dog. He didn’t sense anything near the hotel, which could only mean that an error had appeared in their calculations. Lu Renjia’s death had nothing to do with anyone else. “There’s no need to investigate this matter any longer, conclude the case as a natural death,” Zhuang Qing closed his eyes. “Let’s go home.” Zhuang Qing had an exceedingly luxurious villa under his name. The style of the interior decorations could be described as ‘gold and jade in glorious splendor’. Anyone who saw his house would be stupefied by its furnishings. There were all kinds of sparkling gemstones, corals, pearls and similar items. Even the most ridiculous television dramas featuring aristocrats didn’t have the nerve to film in such a place, out of fear of being scolded for being pompous. An immense natural crystal chandelier was hung in the living room. There was an implied meaning in every ray of light that shone from every angle. That it was expensive, very expensive. The curtains on the windows were decorated with pearls, all of which were violet pearls the size of a thumb that would shake slightly whenever the night wind blew. The brilliant rays of light emitting from the various gemstones made Chu Yu’s eyes hurt. He placed the fruits he was carrying in his hand onto the table. “Boss, I’m going back.” “En,” Zhuang Qing nodded and agreed. He didn’t have the habit of having other people stay over in his house. Chu Yu hurriedly went out of the door and got into a taxi. A while later, he realized that the car wasn’t going in the right direction. “Sir, the route you’re taking doesn’t seem right.” “There’s no issue,” The taxi driver chuckled. “A moonless, windy night is suitable for killing fishes.” The driver’s smile stiffened upon seeing Chu Yu attempt to escape. “I specially built this car for you. It can block yao qi and ghost qi, so naturally it can also imprison yao. It is quite fitting for a fish like you that boasts of having outstanding spiritual sensitivity to be buried with it.” “You’re a painted skin ghost?” Cold sweat seeped out of Chu Yu’s palms. A while back, he had discovered a painted skin ghost committing blackmail while masquerading as an ordinary human. He had brought along his teammates to capture it, but that painted skin ghost had attempted to escape, only to die from the bolt of thunder that Boss had called down. <i>Was this painted skin ghost here to avenge her?</i>  He might be outstanding when it came to spiritual sensitivity, but his combat strength couldn’t compare to even a goose. This time, he was doomed. The taxi sped rapidly. The painted skin ghost had already taken off the layer of fake skin and flesh on his face, revealing dense white bones. Chu Yu thought somewhat despondently, <i>if this scene was captured by the surveillance cameras, how were they going to convince people that the driver was not a human skeleton, but merely a joke? No wait, he was about to lose his life, who cared about that?</i>  He looked out the window with despair, wanting to take another look at this world, when he saw a massive advertisement with the three words ‘Affinity Moon Hotel’. He hated advertisements. The roads deep into the night had few cars and even less people. When someone standing by the roadside persisted in flagging down a car without fear of the driver’s skeletal appearance, the atmosphere became very strange. The painted skin ghost stopped the car and allowed this reckless person to get on. “All you white bone spirits even need to drive taxis to earn money at night?” Fu Li sat at the front passenger seat and buckled his seatbelt. “It really isn’t easy to make a living.” Painted skin ghost, “...;” Chu Yu: <i>All hope is lost</i>. Heavy rain suddenly poured from the skies. Raindrops landed on the car’s windshield with pitter-patter sounds. Sensing another yao in the car, Fu Li smiled. “Sorry, I saw that the empty car sign was lit up, so I thought that the taxi was empty.” “No problem,” There was a coldness to the painted skin ghost’s voice. “Two for the price of one; I’m not losing out.” Chu Yu covered his face, feeling that this new yao was a fool. <i>Even if a white bone spirit really did drive a taxi at night, why would it reveal its original form?</i><i>Surveillance cameras were located all over the city; a headline like ‘shocking, a human skeleton actually drove a taxi to earn money’ would probably appear on the various major platforms tomorrow.</i>  “This is my first time taking a taxi,” Fu Li glanced out the window at the streetlamps shrouded in a curtain of rain. ‘It’s quite interesting.” The rain grew even heavier. When the taxi ran a red light, Fu Li furrowed his brows. “As the saying goes, it’s better to be safe than sorry. Running a red light is very dangerous behavior.” “It’s okay, I’ll be doing even more dangerous things later,” It had been a very long time since the painted skin ghost had met such a foolish yaoguai. It sneered, “The faster I drive, the earlier I can send you home.” “But I haven’t even told you the address, how would you know where I live?” <i>Idiot, because he’s going to slaughter you!</i> Chu Yu yelled internally. The moment Fu Li got onto the taxi, the painted skin ghost had used some strange method to prevent him from speaking. Like a speeding arrow, the car very quickly drove out of the urban district and came to a stop at an abandoned construction site. The painted skin ghost didn’t open the car door. It turned and glanced at Chu Yu, sharpening its five claws as if they were knives. An eerie cold light flashed off its claws. “Brother.” A hand so fair that it resembled jade gently pulled on its bony hand. “This passenger at the back has virtue and intelligence; he’s a yao cultivator that walks on the right path. Isn’t it a bit too much to make a move on him?” “Laozi walks the path of evil cultivation,” The painted skin ghost smiled icily. “Don’t worry, you’ll be next after I finish eating this fish’s internal core.” “Our yao world has its rules – no feeding on living creatures with intelligence, excluding evildoers,” Fu Li hadn’t expected to encounter this sort of yao-killing scene during the first taxi ride of his life. He had merely woken up after a nap, realized that the world had already progressed rapidly after watching &lt;News Broadcast&gt;, and decided to come out and experience human life. <i>Why was he always running into things like killing humans and yao?</i>  No wonder those famous bards in the past liked to live in seclusion in rural areas. It turned out that it was because there were too many annoying things in the human world. “Scram!” The painted skin ghost didn’t feel like spouting rubbish with Fu Li and moved to take Chu Yu’s life with a flip of its hand. Its nails lengthened dramatically within the blink of an eye, reaching Chu Yu’s chest. <i>Kacha.</i>  Just as Chu Yu thought he was toast, the joints of the fingers in front of his chest snapped off cleanly, and then transformed into finger bones, dropping into the car. “You’re courting death!” The painted skin ghost raged. The hands that had snapped off grew back again. Disregarding Chu Yu, the painted skin ghost vaulted against the windshield, turned, and attacked Fu Li. In Fu Li’s eyes, the movements of this white bone spirit were as slow as a snail. Its magic power was even more feeble; even the sparrow spirit who lived at the entrance of his cave dwelling in the past had greater prospects than it. In a very relaxed manner, he pinched the bone dagger the white bone spirit thrust at him. With a quick palm motion, the white bone spirit’s skeletal structure instantly came apart, transforming into a pile of shattered white bones. Seated in the backseat, Chu Yu pinched his neck, his eyes as large as bells. Fu Li wiped the raindrops on his face and glanced at the windshield behind him that was completely smashed to bits. Without any better option, he pulled open the car door to the backseat and squeezed together with Chu Yu. Seeing that Fu Li was about to sit with him, Chu Yu was so frightened that he started trembling. His buttocks inched towards the car door at the side. The Three Pure Ones above, he was just a yin-yang fish from a thousand-year-old temple that had taken on a human form. Although he had the ability to distinguish qi and appearances, this tiny ability was all he had. He couldn’t even forward a photo of his original form for a change in fortune. The rain became heavier and heavier. Rain seeped from the front of the car to the back, very quickly wetting the bottom of their seat. “Do you have relatives or friends? Why don’t I help you send out a Thousand Mile Sound Transmission and let them fetch you?” Fu Li saw that this fish had received quite a huge shock, so he very warm-heartedly proposed to help. Chu Yu shook his head and pointed at his throat. “You were struck with a voice silencing skill?” Only now did Fu Li realize that Chu Yu couldn’t speak. <i>How low was this fish’s cultivation base for this sort of trivial skill to actually be effective on him?</i>  After releasing the silencing skill on Chu Yu, Fu Li said, “Done. Tell me your relative or friend’s address and name, I’ll help you contact them.” “No-no need,” Chu Yu’s neck shrank back. He cautiously took out his handphone and then stole another peek at Fu Li. Only after seeing that he didn’t object to his actions did he dial his boss’ handphone number. After finishing the call, Chu Yu felt that Fu Li looked more and more familiar to the eye. He thought carefully. <i>Wasn’t this that little yao who was picking up plastic bottles at the hospital entrance?</i> At that time, he had even sympathized with the other party for not leading a good life. Now that he thought about this, his face really did turn a bit red; he didn’t have that much face. Chu Yu stuck out his head and glanced at the pile of smashed white bones outside, saying to Fu Li, “Many thanks to senior for saving my life. This painted skin ghost uses very ruthless means and is wily and deceitful. If not for senior, this younger generation would have been laid to rest at this place tonight.” “Painted skin ghost?” Fu Li was astonished. “So it was just a ghost cultivator, I even thought it was a white bone spirit.” Chu Yu smiled dryly. “The average painted skin ghost can only walk in this world by borrowing human skin. This painted skin ghost has profound cultivation and had already produced a skeleton through refinement. Even without the support of human skin, flesh, and blood, it can still walk on this earth.” “It dares to walk in this world just by relying on those fragmented, rotten bones?” Fu Li was starting to wonder if he had misunderstood the phrase ‘profound cultivation’. “Senior’s cultivation base is profound, why...;” Chu Yu wanted to ask why he had fallen to such dire straits, but feared angering the other party into smacking him, so he inquired in a very tactful manner, “Why live in such a lowkey manner?” Now that he was hearing the two words ‘profound cultivation’ again, Fu Li didn’t feel like he had been praised at all. He answered very casually, “Ever since birth, I lived on a small mountain. Occasionally, I’ll hear the other yaoguai on the mountain mention those yao kings outside. However, my cultivation was ordinary, so I never went out of the mountain. On a normal day, I’ll either cultivate or sleep. Many years ago, something happened and I lost my cave dwelling. I didn’t dare to snatch another great yao’s territory, so I found a forest deep within a mountain and went to sleep.” “When did you wake up?” Chu Yu felt that this yaoguai lived quite a dull life. “Three years ago,” Fu Li still hadn’t fully adapted to this new society. “I went to a human house and secretly watched &lt;News Broadcast&gt; and then found out that society outside had already changed.” Chu Yu, “...;” Daring to join society after watching &lt;News Broadcast&gt;, he had such huge guts that it put the average yao cultivator to shame. “You’ve lived for so many years and should have some good things. You can sell those in exchange for money,” Chu Yu felt that he wouldn’t need to sell plastic bottles if he did this. “No. If I did that, how would I have the sense of accomplishment that comes with starting from scratch?” Fu Li shook his head. “Moreover, those things of mine are of little value.” Chu Yu, “...;” <i>This yaoguai even wanted to specially start from scratch, was he sick in the head?</i>  Half an hour later, the water in the car had already reached their ankles. Fu Li curled up his legs as he sat on the seat, asking somewhat doubtfully, “Is your friend really coming to fetch you?” If he had known that the person wouldn’t come even after this long, he wouldn’t have sat here and waited foolishly. <i>He had merely thought of taking slight advantage of this situation to get a free ride, why was it so hard?</i>  Chu Yu glanced out the window. “Probably?” Just as he said these words, a man wearing a black shirt walked to the car and looked at the two of them through the broken windshield. “Boss!” Upon seeing Zhuang Qing appear, Chu Yu straightened his waist and no longer shrank his neck back. Without caring about the raindrops wetting his clothes, he pulled open the car door and ran over. “Boss, I’m really sorry for calling you out in the middle of the night.” Zhuang Qing shot a glance at him and took a step back, concerned that the rainwater on him would splash onto his body. “Hundred fifty for petrol.” Chu Yu, “Sure...;” Zhuang Qing looked at Fu Li who was in the car and asked Chu Yu, “He saved you?” Chu Yu nodded shamefully. “I think he’s more suited to be my assistant.” “What about me then?” Chu Yu asked. “You can pick up plastic bottles,” Zhuang Qing strode to the car door and spoke to Fu Li through the window, “Mr Fu, I didn’t expect us to meet again so soon.” Fu Li pushed the car door open till a small slit formed and told Zhuang Qing, “Excuse me, move the umbrella over a little.” Zhuang Qing didn’t understand what he meant, but still shifted the umbrella over slightly. Fu Li took the chance to make his way out from the car door, hiding under Zhuang Qing’s umbrella. A few raindrops on him splashed onto Zhuang Qing’s sleeves. Zhuang Qing looked down at the few raindrops on his branded shirt, his expression icy. Chu Yu turned his head, pretending not to have seen anything. “Let’s go,” Zhuang Qing’s voice was so cold that it was nearly dripping shards of ice. The three people had only taken a few steps when Zhuang Qing stopped and turned to glance at the discarded taxi and the pile of bone fragments. Raising his head, he glanced at the sky. Suddenly, lightning shone, and two bolts of lightning struck down. The taxi and bone fragments vanished in a puff of smoke and ash, yet the surrounding flowers and plants were completely unharmed. Fu Li exclaimed in admiration, “Mr Zhuang has a good cultivation base.” “Not as good as Mr Fu’s natural state.” Fu Li’s arm bumped against him by accident, creating yet another water mark on Zhuang Qin’s sleeve. The tip of his brows moved slightly. “Has Mr Fu ever sent clothes to the dry-cleaning store?” “No. My clothes are very cheap,” Fu Li tugged at his shirt. “This piece is only thirty yuan, it doesn’t need to be dry-cleaned.” “The member fee for my shirt to be dry-cleaned is sixty-eight yuan,” Zhuang Qing said expressionlessly. “Ah?” Fu Li blinked his large eyes. A while later, he had a flash of realization. “Mr Zhuang, you’re very rich.” Zhuang Qing ignored him. He pulled open the car door and got in while Fu Li sat at the back. Looking up, Fu Li caught sight of a few perfectly cut diamonds on the roof of the car. The refracted rays of light from the streetlamps caused the diamonds to give off an enchanting radiance. Fu Li stretched out a thumb, wanting to give it a small touch. Just a small one. But before he could extend his hand, he saw Zhuang Qing turn around and stare at him with a severe expression. Rich people truly had strange hobbies; they could even think of inlaying diamonds into their car to flaunt their wealth. Silence filled the car. Chu Yu shrunk into a corner, not daring to speak. Zhuang Qing was focused solely on driving, seemingly not intending to speak at all. Zhuang Qing stopped the car at a red light and suddenly spoke, “Mr Fu’s cultivation is profound, have you ever considered a change of career?” Fu Li nodded. “When I finish self-studying and obtain a university degree, I’ll become a civil servant.” Zhuang Qing didn’t understand why this yaoguai who had lived for several thousands of years had suddenly appeared in the human world and was even working as a security guard. As for the other party saying that he wanted to become a civil servant, he didn’t believe it. “Benefactor, your cultivation is so high, why would you want to be a civil servant?” Chu Yu said in a low voice. “Our management bureau recruits once every five years. Our recruitment period just so happens to be this year, why don’t you participate in our bureau’s appraisal? The treatment here isn’t bad and the material benefits are good. The country will even allocate you an apartment after ten years.” “Are the people working at your place considered civil servants?” Fu Li asked. “We’re considered, considered...; civil servants in the cultivation world. We also belong to government administration,” Chu Yu felt that it was too much of a waste for someone as powerful as his benefactor to be a security guard at a hotel. Therefore, he made a supreme effort to persuade him to job-hop. “Not only will you need to conceal your abilities within the human civil system, maintaining your form will also drain magic power. But in our cultivation world management bureau, it’s no problem if we stay in our original forms as long as the doors to the office are closed. I’m just not very sure how large benefactor’s original form is? If it’s too big, that office of ours may not be large enough for you.” Noticing that Fu Li’s expression was a little odd, Chu Yu realized that he had gone slightly overboard with his words. Talking about someone else’s original form in front of a yao cultivator was the human equivalent of discussing somebody’s three measurements – it was considered discourteous behavior. He hurriedly said, “Benefactor, this younger generation made an indiscreet remark.” “It’s okay,” Fu Li shook his head. “My original form is very ordinary.” Chu Yu laughed dryly, feeling too ashamed to continue talking. The atmosphere in the car became awkward again. The windshield wiper swiped lightly at the rainwater on the windshield. Zhuang Qing glanced at the oil gauge and continued to drive expressionlessly. By the time he found Fu Li’s dilapidated rental house, the expression on Zhuang Qing’s face was very cold. “We’re here.” “Thank you, cultivator Zhuang,” Fu Li recalled that his umbrella had already turned into ash together with the taxi and could only pluck a strand of hair, turning it into an umbrella. Opening the umbrella, he blocked the rainwater falling from above. “Benefactor,” Chu Yu stuffed a few pieces of paper into Fu Li’s hands. “This is our recruitment application form, you must come!” “If I work at your bureau, will I get any extra credit when attempting to become a civil servant?” In order to become a civil servant, Fu Li had done plenty of homework, especially when it came to the extra credit policies. He remembered those very clearly. For a moment, Chu Yu was at a loss. He shook his head and replied, “No.” “Oh,” Fu Li casually put the registration form into his pocket. “Be careful on the road, I’ll go back now.” Chu Yu watched Fu Li gradually vanish into the distance, an indescribable feeling in his heart. The image of his back was particularly lofty and imposing, brimming with mystery and power, giving rise to a feeling of subdued strength that was grand yet classy. “Stop looking. Even if you cultivated for five thousand years, you wouldn’t be able to make out the original form of this kind of yao cultivator who depended on Heaven’s Will to take on a human form,” Zhuang Qing looked at the shabby alley as well as the worn-out and rotten rental houses at the end of the alley. “You’re not the only one. Li Jin wouldn’t be able to do it either.” “With that little bit of cultivation, how can Li Jin compare to me?” Chu Yu protested. “He just stayed at a lotus flower pond in a temple for a while during his early years, and that temple was even torn down not long after. Yet, he still has the cheek to say that he took on a human form by listening to Buddha. He even shamelessly posted a photo of his original form online, saying something about how forwarding it can bring luck and cheat the humans of their faith. <i>Pui</i>, I’ve seen so many fish, but I’ve have never seen anyone as shameless as him.” While listening to Chu Yu mock Li Jin, Zhuang Qing turned the car around and stepped on the accelerator. “That’s why I picked you as my assistant.” “I just knew that Boss is a knowledgeable, wise yao,” Chu Yu started to suck up to Zhuang Qing instantly, even slipping in a few of his own selfish motives along the way and giving his opponent a few kicks. There was mutual jealousy amongst those of the same profession – a purebred fish like him hated those hypocritical fishes who used the teachings of Buddha to glorify themselves. “How did you meet Fu Li along the way?” Despite the ton of boot-licking that Chu Yu did, Zhuang Qing wasn’t moved at all. Instead, he inquired about how this incident had came about. Chu Yu knew that he wouldn’t be able to avoid receiving a scolding this day, so he had no choice but to obediently recite everything that had happened. “You have a thousand years of cultivation but can’t even beat a painted skin ghost with two hundred plus years of cultivation,” Zhuang Qing uttered expressionlessly. “Will the Head of Changan Monastery be ashamed to say that you are a fish from their monastery?” Chu Yu felt his knees hurting slightly. “Boss, I-I’m just not so good at combat.” “En, you just happen to be good at defense and escaping.” Chu Yu could feel his knees breaking down, along with his large ego. “When was Fu Li’s entry into the human world registered?” This was the first thing Zhuang Qing asked after driving into the neighborhood Chu Yu lived in and cutting the gas. Chu Yu fished out his office phone and searched for Fu Li’s registration information in the cultivation management system. The system displayed that he originally lived deep within an unknown mountain. He had obtained his residence permit last month, and his age was recorded as four thousand years old. “The historical records of our country only go back five thousand years, yet the benefactor has lived for four thousand years; truly impressive.” After reading Fu Li’s registration information to Zhuang Qing, Chu Yu commented with reverence, “No wonder his cultivation base is so high. Given his age, he can already apply for our bureau’s Honor Subsidy.” The cultivation world’s management bureau offered a special benefit targeted exclusively at cultivators who were more than two thousand years old. As long as the cultivator’s cultivation period had exceeded two thousand years and was registered in the cultivation world census, the cultivator could receive a special subsidy of one thousand yuan per month. If these yao cultivators donated past cultural relics or ancient texts, the country would grant them an additional reward. “Ai, why did I forget to tell this to senior!” Chu Yu slapped his thigh, feeling incessantly remorseful. <i>He registered last month, yet was four thousand years old...;</i>  Zhuang Qing thought about the conversation between the ghost world’s yinchai chief and Fu Li several hours ago. It was certain that they had met in the past. “Boss, work a little harder and after a hundred years, you’ll also be able to apply for this special subsidy,” Chu Yu smiled mischievously as he helped Zhuang Qing calculate when he would receive the special subsidy. “If you’re going to help me calculate that, why don’t you cultivate well instead?” Zhuang Qing threw a Spirit Gathering Pellet at Chu Yu and said expressionlessly, “Remember to give me the petrol fee.” “One hundred fifty, I remember,” Chu Yu hugged the Spirit Gathering Pellet with elation. “It’s not one hundred fifty, it’s three hundred.” “Why?” Chu Yu didn’t understand why the price had increased. “That’s the cost for two people,” Zhuang Qing pointed at the car door. “You can get off now.” Chu Yu, “...;” A night of heavy rain washed away the heat. The next day at noon when Fu Li went to the hotel for work, he no longer heard the front counter lady complaining about the excessive heat outside, how the heat had nearly melted their makeup, and so on. Fu Li put on the security guards’ uniform and realized that a female customer was secretly taking pictures of him, though he didn’t take it seriously. Quite a number of people had come to eat at the hotel at noon. Fu Li and his colleagues were required to constantly take note of the public security situation inside. If someone caused a fuss after drinking, or if an altercation were to occur, the security guards were responsible for pulling apart both parties. However, as this place was a high-end consumer site, the customers were more restrained. In the half a month Fu Li had worked here, he hadn’t yet encountered a scuffle. Ting Ting had just attended a classmate’s wedding reception and was walking out of the restaurant with a friend when she realized that the security guard standing upright at the entrance looked a little familiar. She drifted closer and immediately grew excited. “Handsome!” Her friend stopped her in embarrassment. “Ting Ting, I know he’s handsome. Control yourself a little.” “No,” Ting Ting was anxious and no longer cared how others viewed her. “Do you still remember that incident some time ago when I was harassed and then rescued by someone? The person who saved me was him.” “You mean that handsome guy who calls himself Lei Feng?” Her close friend looked at the security guard at the entrance in astonishment. He had long legs, a slender waist, and handsome looks. When worn by him, even the security guard’s uniform exuded the aura of a high-ranking uniform. The post Ting Ting had made on weibo to search for him had been forwarded nearly ten thousand times, and countless people had asked about the identity of the handsome guy. That weibo post had even become a hot topic, yet no one had contacted Ting Ting. When a human girl suddenly rushed up to him with a red face, Fu Li met her gaze and then took a step back. “May I know if you need any help?” “Handsome, I’ve finally found you!” Ting Ting was so excited that the rims of her eyes had turned red. If not for this handsome guy who called himself Lei Feng, who knew what she would have ended up as that night. Therefore, she had always been very grateful to him. The passersby all raised their brows. Seeing the handsome looks of the security guard and the young girl’s sweet and cute appearance, their minds couldn’t help visualizing a scene of gratitude intermingled with hatred. “You are?” Fu Li was a bit confused. <i>Did this human girl recognize the wrong person?</i>  “Half a year ago in front of a food stall at Wutong alley, you helped me to beat back a few hoodlums. Do you remember now?” Ting Ting took out her handphone and pointed at weibo. “I’ve been trying to find you all this while and even pleaded with the police to get in touch with you. Unfortunately, I never managed to find you.” Fu Li thought for a very long time before recalling the incident. “You’re one of those few ladies?” “En, en,” Ting Ting nodded excitedly. “So sorry, I posted your photo on weibo without your permission because I wanted to find you too badly. If it brought you any trouble, I’m very sorry for it.” Fu Li shook his head. “It didn’t.” <i>Because he had no idea what weibo was.</i>  Ting Ting removed that weibo post in front of Fu Li and made a new post. Ting Ting Yu Li: Thank you everyone, I’ve found my benefactor. Ting Ting wanted to give Fu Li a fee of gratitude, but Fu Li felt that he was a yao of moral integrity and had merely resolved this trivial matter with a lift of his hands, so he couldn’t take this human girl’s money. In this way, the two people were stuck in a stalemate. “Lady, there really isn’t any need...;” “Our hotel’s employees are prohibited from dating during work hours~” Fu Li turned around. A man wearing a suit stood at the entrance with both hands tucked in his pockets, appearing somewhat sloppy. There were even a few people by the man’s side, one of which was Zhuang Qing who was standing at the front of these few people. T/N: Niubi “Please don’t misunderstand, I don’t have a romantic relationship with this gentleman,” Fearing that she would create trouble for Fu Li, Ting Ting briefly narrated the whole incident and emphasized Fu Li’s willingness to help others without reciprocation. “So that’s the case,” The smile on the suit-clad man’s face became more proper. “This miss, I am the boss of this hotel. Our company will definitely reward our employees who have such noble conduct.” Ting Ting knew that it would be detrimental to Fu Li if she continued to persist at this time. Anyway, she now knew the other party’s workplace. Feeling much less anxious, Ting Ting praised Fu Li a few more times in the presence of the suited man before leaving reluctantly. The other employees at the side witnessed this scene and was both envious and respectful. They were envious because Fu Li managed to make a good name for himself in front of the boss and respectful because he dared to step out and help the young lady put the hoodlums in order. The colleagues who had originally found Fu Li unpleasing to their eyes raised their opinion of Fu Li a few notches. It turned out that it was only his looks that were like a boy toy’s and his way of doing things was quite forthright. “That what’s-your-name,” Wang Han pointed at Fu Li. “Follow me to my office, I want to know what happened in detail.” “Director Wang,” The Head of the security guards saw that Fu Li didn’t react, so out of concern that he would offend the hotel’s boss, he hurriedly went up and smiled. “His name is Fu Li. He’s a new worker but does things very diligently. Fu Li, this is Director Wang, the boss of our hotel.” “Hello, Director Wang,” Fu Li glanced at Wang Han. So this was Wang Cuihua’s disciple grandson – his cultivation base was no good, but his natal chart was not bad. “Hello, hello,” Wang Han chuckled as he led Fu Li and the rest into his office. Upon closing the door, he deferentially offered the VIP seat to Zhuang Qing. He was always very courteous when faced with the bureau’s people. Fu Li had seen most of these people from the bureau, except for the old man dressed in a Chinese tunic suit whom he was seeing for the first time. As the hotel’s security guard, he sat at a corner and very professionally kept silent. “Mr Zhuang, you specially came today for...;” Wang Han meticulously thought through all the things he had done recently. There didn’t seem to be anything worthy of a personal visit from the bureau’s boss. This hotel of his didn’t serve as a starting point for those in the cultivation world who were looking for employment; apart from Fu Li who was a yao cultivator, everyone else in the company were ordinary humans. He had only arranged for a position for this Fu Li because of a call from his shishu. Moreover, he had followed the cultivation world’s employment assistance guidelines and paid him the salary of an official employee. <i>It didn’t seem like he had done anything wrong?</i>  “Nothing much. We just heard that Director Wang’s food here is not bad, so the few of us came over for a meal,” Old Huang smiled. “We just happened to recall that Director Wang was the boss of this hotel, so we wanted to ask you to join us for a meal. We’re all fellow colleagues in the cultivation world, there’s no harm fostering good feelings.” “You’re too polite,” Seeing Old Huang’s beaming smile, the concern in Wang Han’s heart grew even stronger. <i>Who in the entire cultivation world didn’t know that the bureau’s Huang Can was an expert at duping people? He could make the living sound dead, and the dead sound as if they had entered the Heavens.</i>  “You’re too kind,” Old Huang turned to look at Fu Li with happiness all over his face. “You must be the Mr Fu who saved our two colleagues from the bureau. Nice to meet you, nice to meet you.” Seated at the corner, Fu Li looked up and was met with the glittering smile on Old Huang’s face. He suddenly understood. “You’re here to give me the thank-you money?” “Haha,” Old Huang smiled dryly. “Mr Fu’s cultivation base is profound. Speaking about such a thing in your presence would be in poor taste.” “It’s all right, I don’t mind,” Fu Li waved his hands. “Besides, my cultivation base is really ordinary. It can’t measure up to the word ‘profound’.” Chu Yu, who was seated beside Old Huang, shrank his neck back a little. The him who had almost been killed by the painted skin ghost was very quickly not recognizing the word ‘ordinary’. “Mr Fu,” Zhuang Qing met Fu Li’s gaze. “I came today because I have a request.” Wang Han who was listening from the side was inwardly stunned. <i>What kind of abilities did this Fu Li who came to his hotel to be a security guard have? He could actually make Zhuang Qing use a word like ‘request’. Could he have recruited some great figure as a security guard for his hotel?</i>  For a moment, he didn’t know if he should be pleased or scared. “Mr Zhuang, please speak,” Fu Li wasn’t very fond of smooth, furless creatures, but given the profound virtue on Zhuang Qing and his motivation to advance, he didn’t have much prejudice towards him. “We learned that Mr Fu is a formidable yao with a few thousand years of cultivation, so we wanted to invite Mr Fu to resolve a doubt that we have,” Zhuang Qing’s expression became solemn. As a golden dragon who was implicitly tied to the fate of the nation, he might not regard the ‘yao emperor’ the Zhuyan had mentioned with much importance on the surface, but he still secretly kept his guard up. The yao world had already been on a gradual decline when he was born. As human science and technology advanced, humans also increasingly held up the notions of freedom and creation and no longer held much reverence towards supernatural sayings. The current management bureau was a symbol of peaceful co-existence between the cultivation world and humans. If the yao emperor were to start a rebellion in the current world, not only would the existing balance be broken, it was possible for it to even bring about an immense catastrophe. All living things were innocent and should not have to undergo such suffering. “Mr Zhuang, please speak,” Seeing Zhuang Qing this solemn, Fu Li also sat up straight. “Has Mr Fu heard of any legends regarding the yao emperor?” “Yao emperor?” Fu Li scrutinized Zhuang Qing’s expression carefully. Only after confirming that he wasn’t joking did he respond, “You’re referring to the yao emperor in the human world’s huaben?” Zhuang Qing was silent. “It was probably fabricated by the humans for fun,” Fu Li put in great effort to rummage through the little knowledge in his brain. “The mountain I stayed at was more remote, and the king of that mountain was called King Ganglie. He had a very tolerant personality. According to him, the various yao kings have their own territory and will occasionally clash over the sacrifices offered by humans. However, I’ve never heard of the title of ‘yao emperor’.” “We won’t conceal this from Mr Fu – we have also never heard of the might of the yao emperor,” Old Huang sighed. “But that Zhuyan vowed that the yao emperor would descend on the human world soon and bring disaster to all living creatures.” “Would Mr Fu be willing to make a trip with us to the bureau and see the Zhuyan?” Zhuang Qing added, “There will be a cash subsidy.” Fu Li’s eyes lit up a little. He glanced at Wang Han. “Boss, will my wages be deducted if I take leave during work hours?” Everyone’s gaze landed on Wang Han. The poor Wang Han was just a younger generation of the cultivation world, how could he endure so many gazes? “This will be considered public service, so your wages won’t be deducted. You’ll be given a bonus this month.” Fu Li was immediately put at ease. He looked towards Zhuang Qing again. “Let’s leave then.” “No, boss, didn’t we gather here for...;” Chu Yu reminded him in a low voice. “Practitioners ought to quash their desire for good food early on and tread on the path of fasting,” Zhuang Qing stood up. “Let’s go.” “Mr Zhuang seldom comes to this humble one’s hotel. I would like to invite Mr Zhuang to fulfill my meager sensibilities and allow this humble one to treat Mr Zhuang to a simple meal,” Wang Han said. “May everyone rest at ease. The dishes are made using spiritual grain and vegetables obtained from the cultivation world. They are green vegetables without chemicals, fertilizer, or harmful substances.” Zhuang Qing came to a stop and nodded aloofly. “Since Mr Wang has extended such great hospitality, then this Zhuang will humbly accept it.” “You’re most welcome, most welcome. Please follow me,” Hearing that the boss of the cultivation world was willing to stay behind for a meal, Wang Han was so ecstatic that creases formed from the smile on his handsome face. Fu Li also managed to freeload a meal by relying on the face accorded to the bureau. After the meal, he asked Chu Yu who was closest to him, “Is this considered taking advantage of the masses?” Chu Yu was drinking natural fruit juice and replied with a broad smile, “This is called being ‘unable to decline great hospitality’. We can’t disappoint the common people.” He put down his glass. “Oh right, benefactor, I forgot to tell you about something.” He told Fu Li about the special assistance money. “This sort of procedure is approved very quickly. If you apply for it this month, you’ll be able to start receiving the welfare money next month.” This could also be considered one of the country’s appeasement methods; money wasn’t important, what was important was letting them see the respect that the country had towards them. Most of these thousands of years old yaoguai had profound cultivation bases. If they were to get close to humans, it could also be profitable to both sides under certain special circumstances. “En, en. I’ll apply for it later.” Fu Li asked happily, “Will the money go directly to my card, or will I have to go to the bureau to receive it?” “It’s the digital age now, there’s no need for you to personally make a trip,” Chu Yu replied. “What’s your handphone number? I’ll inform you when your application’s been approved.” “If there’s anything, just use the Thousand Mile Sound Transmission. Why is there a need for an additional object like a handphone?” Fu Li felt that the handphone’s call function was extremely similar to the Thousand Mile Sound Transmission. Chu Yu, “...;” “Benefactor, the Thousand Mile Sound Transmission...; not every human cultivator knows how to use it.” For example, he didn’t know how to use it. “Then what about the Flying Talisman Transmission?” Fu Li felt that he should lower his standards for the current cultivation world. Chu Yu continued shaking his head. “Then...; Exchanging Good for Good?” Chu Yu was still shaking his head, so ashamed that he couldn’t even lift his head. “Then what do you guys know?” Chu Yu was too embarrassed to say anything. “Fortunately, there are few yaoguai now and the human cultivators are friendly,” Fu Li sighed. “If it was a thousand years ago, little yao like you probably wouldn’t be able to survive for more than three months in the human world.” “You’ve been to the human world in the past?” Chu Yu felt that they couldn’t continue along this line of conversation. If they were to continue talking, he might as well change back to his original form and let the kitchen turn him into a platter of braised fish. “No. King Ganglie said that humanity was facing crisis after crisis, and even Daoist practitioners were taking it upon themselves to hang yao cultivators. My cultivation base was poor, so I didn’t dare to leave the mountain,” Fu Li himself also found it embarrassing. “I’ve been watching the past two years and saw that the outside world had good morals, so I dared to come out.” Chu Yu wondered despondently how weak their batch of human cultivators had to be for a yaoguai who dared not leave the mountain to think that their cultivation bases were poor. After finishing their meal, their party rushed back to the bureau and Zhuang Qing directly led Fu Li to the area where the Zhuyan was locked up. After being locked up for half a month, the aura of arrogance on the Zhuyan had diminished by quite a bit. In particular, he would immediately become as obedient as a rabbit after seeing Zhuang Qing. “Zhuyan, what does the yao emperor in the legends look like?” “It is said that the yao emperor <i>daren</i> has a pair of wings on his back, a body of golden fur, eyes as big as the moon, a nose like that of a divine ox, feet like red clouds, a body as huge as a mountain, a hiss that can shake mountains and rivers...;” Fu Li asked in a low voice, “Isn’t it only the dragon clan who have noses like oxen and look all kinds of strange?” Zhuang Qing turned back and looked at him silently. Fu Li, “...;” Silence was the best reply. T/N: HAHAHAHAHAHA Amidst the strange atmosphere, Zhuang Qing was the first to shift his line of sight. He looked at the Zhuyan. “You’re saying you’ve never seen the yao emperor before?” “I may not have seen him before, but I’ve heard of his outstanding prowess in combat,” The Zhuyan didn’t know how powerful the yao emperor was, but in front of his captors, he couldn’t wait to describe the yao emperor as a heavenly, omnipotent, super great yao. “His Majesty the yao emperor appears and disappears unpredictably. If he knew you were treating the yao race this way, he would definitely seek justice for my yao race.” “That may not be the case,” Xu Yuan was scribbling on a book with a pen. Hearing the Zhuyan’s words, she retorted, “It’s not like you represent the entire yao race. The number of yao cultivators we have here aren’t few either, what if the yao emperor stands on our side?” “Yao emperor <i>daren</i> is of utmost respectability, how could he wallow in the mire with all of you?” The Zhuyan gave an arrogant, cold smile. “All of you had best wish for more fortune. Enraging the yao emperor could cause tsunamis, the leveling of mountains, and the destruction of the entire nation in a blink of an eye.” “Is that yao emperor an idiot? Does he have nothing better to do than cause tsunamis and level mountains? The land under the Heavens is huge and possesses its own principles. If some great yao really dared to do such a thing, would heavenly law allow it?” Fu Li mercilessly called out the Zhuyan for the bullsh*t he was spouting. “King Zhuyan, you’ve lived for almost ten thousand years, how can you so shamelessly cheat the younger generation with such words?” “It’s you again,” The Zhuyan was angered just from seeing Fu Li. If it wasn’t for this yaoguai, he wouldn’t have been shut in this place. “What kind of mountain were you staying at in the past, I’ve never seen a yao who meddled so much in someone else’s business.” “Only through mutual help can a harmonious homeland be built,” Fu Li didn’t mind the Zhuyan’s mocking tone of voice either. Turning, he spoke to Zhuang Qing, “My apologies, I won’t be able to help you. I’ve never seen any strange great yao whose appearance matches the Zhuyan’s description.” “Mr Fu, you can’t be blamed for that,” Xu Yuan brought a sketchbook over. She had sketched out the yao emperor’s appearance according to the Zhuyan’s words and then realized that the combination of these elements made for an extremely odd appearance. “I suspect that the truth was distorted in the yao world that year. By the time it reached the Zhuyan’s ears, it had long since changed.” Zhuang Qing took the sketchbook, shot a glance at it, and then shoved it at Fu Li. Fu Li held it up. A mountain-like body, sharp golden fur, and two pairs of wings – what kind of hideous mess was this? This appearance looked way too haphazard. “With this appearance, using his original body to fight probably wouldn’t give him much of an advantage,” Fu Li turned the sketchbook around multiple ways, examining it quite a few times. “Fights in the yao world revolve around speed, ferocity, and precision. Although this legendary yao emperor has a huge body, the four wings are in disharmony with the body. I don’t know what his tail looks like, but if his body can be as large as a mountain, then the flexibility of his tail is probably extremely low. He has no advantage in battle.” “Given his cultivation, if he fought with other yaoguai using his human form, the other yaoguai wouldn’t be able to tell what his original form is either. How would they be able to describe his appearance?” Fu Li handed the sketchbook back to Xu Yuan before turning to speak to the Zhuyan. “So, you must be lying.” The Zhuyan swallowed. Looking up, he saw Zhuang Qing staring straight at him and immediately shrunk into a ball from the fright. “I didn’t lie. I al-also heard this from other yaoguai.” “Tch,” Xu Yuan threw the sketchbook onto the desk. “After an eternity, it turned out to be a waste of time.” Despite not having obtained the answer he wanted, there wasn’t much disappointment on Zhuang Qing’s face. He turned and looked at Fu Li. “I’ve troubled Mr Fu for this matter today.” Fu Li shook his head. “You’re too polite. It’s quite interesting to listen to the yao world’s gossip.” “Mr Fu really won’t consider joining our bureau?” Zhuang Qing intended to cherish talent. Recalling the dilapidated rented house that Fu Li lived in, he couldn’t help asking, “The bureau will arrange staff lodging for you. Communications and transport costs will be reimbursed every month.” “Benefactor, our bureau usually isn’t very busy, and we get off work at set times. You can even read when you have nothing to do. That way, you’ll easily get into university when the time comes,” Chu Yu walked over. “Don’t worry, the salary is definitely higher than a security guard’s.” Upon hearing about the wages and staff lodging, Fu Li was a little tempted. Behind him in the spirit locking formation, the Zhuyan who appeared to have been frightened into keeping even his head down used a sharp claw to slash open his palm. Blood dripped bit by bit onto the talisman formation. He thought that his movements had gone unnoticed, but the moment he slashed his palm, Fu Li suddenly looked back. “You want to cast a spell using blood?” Fu Li raised an arm all of a sudden. His arm passed through the spirit lock formation’s barrier and dragged the Zhuyan out of the spirit lock formation. The moment Fu Li acted, Zhuang Qing’s dark brown eyes were suddenly suffused by a golden light and countless golden rays pressed down on the fresh blood seeping out of the Zhuyan. The golden light and baleful qi collided, emitting crackling sounds. His hands moved rapidly, and a thick barrier formed in front of them. A violent explosion sounded. However, other than the empty space in the spirit lock formation, there was not even a tiny bit of movement anywhere else, as if the explosion was merely everyone’s misconception. Zhuang Qing closed his palm and smiled coldly. “You deserve to be called an ancient and famous fiend-yao, actually knowing how to use blood-triggering spells.” Chu Yu and the rest were so frightened that their complexions had changed. The wave of immense yao qi just now was practically an ultra-energy bomb. If not for their Boss swiftly setting up a barrier, the entire building would have been razed to the ground. “Zhuyan.” The spirit lock formation was forcibly torn open. Fu Li walked in easily, though at this moment the Zhuyan didn’t dare to move rashly. He watched Fu Li, concealed alarm in his eyes. This sort of blood-triggering technique could not be terminated once it started. If someone interrupted it midway, they would definitely be attacked by baleful qi. Even if they didn’t die, they would lose up to a thousand years of cultivation. <i>Yet, why was this yaoguai completely unharmed?</i>  The spirit lock formation was only ever used to contain evil-doing, man-eating great yao. For nearly a century, no yao had ever managed to escape from it, let alone counterattack it. The bureau was secretly shocked. How strong were these ancient yao? <i>If the Zhuyan was capable of destroying the spirit lock formation, then how terrifying was the yao emperor he spoke of?</i>  Thinking of this, the expressions of the bureau’s people and yao turned rather ugly. They looked towards Zhuang Qing simultaneously. However, Zhuang Qing was watching Fu Li and the Zhuyan expressionlessly. Even though Fu Li had once rescued Zhang Ke and Chu Yu, his harmless appearance and mild, nearly human-like aura prevented everyone from viewing him as an ancient yao. Only at this moment did they clearly realize that the other party was a great yao who had lived for four thousand years. “Who exactly are you?” Seeing Fu Li approach him, the Zhuyan was so frightened that he retreated again and again. However, the wall was behind him; there was already no way out for him. “This little yao is called Fu Li,” Fu Li glanced at the Zhuyan’s still-bleeding arm in puzzlement. “The moment this sort of blood-triggering explosive formation succeeds, the activator of the formation will be punished severely by heavenly law. Why would you give yourself that kind of trouble?” “Heavenly law?” The Zhuyan turned back into his human form and laughed icily. “Heavenly law is unjust; it actually allowed humans to become the most intelligent of all living creatures. These few years, humans have been occupying all the mountains, rivers, and oceans without the slightest scruple. Aren’t they doing so by relying on the heavenly law’s bias towards them? I was a dazzling existence for ten thousand years, why should I bow my head to the humans?” Fu Li looked at the Zhuyan’s deathly white complexion and shook his head a long while later. “I may not know how dazzling the yao clans were in the past, but I’ve heard of the various kings’ fighting prowess. They consumed human flesh as food and supplied themselves with the pleasures of life by frequently ordering humans to sacrifice virgin males and females to them. Even the river yao used the threat of floods to obtain young human women. When all of you were treating humans as fish meat, you never felt that heavenly law was unjust, so why complain now?” “Evil-doing yao will completely lose their virtue. The moment Heaven and Earth’s spiritual influence is exhausted will be the moment humanity prospers,” Fu Li didn’t understand why the Zhuyan couldn’t comprehend this one point. “Humans may have weak bodies, but they are intelligent. They can create their own culture, ideologies, and know how to pass them down from generation to generation. Just by relying on their own capabilities, they have invented many new things. With such spirit, isn’t it fair that they can now be the most intelligent life forms?” “The humans have a good saying – thirty years of the eastern river, and thirty years of the western river,” Fu Li patted the Zhuyan. “Why don’t you take your time to ponder over it?” “Then what about those humans? They wantonly exploited mother earth and poured toxic waste products into the rivers and lakes,” The Zhuyan retorted. “They’re merely the most intelligent of all living things, not the master of all living things. Don’t tell me the rivers, lakes, and mother earth can only belong to the humans?!” For some strange reason, Xu Yuan, Zhang Ke, and the other human cultivators turned a little red after hearing these words. Fu Li smiled. “That’s why you don’t need to worry. If the humans continue to court disaster, they will end up even more miserable than our yao race. Why don’t we wait and see for a while longer? Don’t go out and cause trouble. Maybe after a few hundred years, the humans will be as equally out of luck as our yao race.” The two human cultivators Zhang Ke and Xu Yuan, “...;” <i>Was this Fu Li helping them or was he here to watch human drama?</i>  “Really?” The Zhuyan wasn’t resigned yet and continued to ask. <i>Swish.</i>  A golden dragon tail swept past and the Zhuyan smashed heavily against the wall, reverting to his original form upon falling to the ground. “So much nonsense, do you think you’re facing a hundred thousand clueless kids?” Zhuang Qing fished out a magic device expressionlessly and absorbed the Zhuyan into the magic device. Since he was so capable at blood-triggering techniques, then he would seal him at the bottom of the ocean tonight. Even if he bled himself out, he wouldn’t be able to harm a single living creature. Fu Li turned his head, glanced at the deep hole in the wall, and silently shifted to the side. This sort of virtuous golden dragon who had joined with the national fate was truly too scary. Fu Li resolved to never let the other party know that he wasn’t very fond of the dragon clan. King Ganglie said before that it was most important for a yao to know how to give and take. Although all he had been doing the past years was cultivating in seclusion or sleeping, he still remembered this statement. “What are you looking at?” Zhuang Qing noticed that Fu Li was looking at him, so he turned and looked towards him after handing the magic device to Chu Yu. “Nothing much,” Fu Li shook his head. He was just a bit curious whether Zhuang Qing’s pants would drop or tear when his dragon tail came swinging out. <i>If it didn’t drop or tear, then how did he do it?</i>  <i>Did he manifest it using some technique?</i>  Zhuang Qing turned and walked out, telling Chu Yu in a cold voice, “Take him to fill in the application form for the special welfare money.” <i>Fu Li was a perfectly good male yao, what was he doing staring at the area below someone else’s waist?!</i>  T/N: Wellk2026; at least FL didn’t say it out loud this time. Is he making progress? k1U914; Only after everyone at the bureau calmed down did they realize in alarm that they had narrowly avoided the gates of hell. If the Zhuyan’s spell formation had succeeded, no one present would have survived. The spell formation hadn’t succeeded, yet it had caused such a large explosion. Then, what kind of terrible power would it have if the spell had succeeded? Chu Yu was in such fear that even his fish scales had made an appearance. He still couldn’t quite react upon hearing Zhuang Qing speak to him. “Boss?” “Take him to complete the procedures for the subsidy,” Although Zhuang Qing felt that Fu Li’s gaze was a bit offensive, he might not have been able to protect everyone in the building if Fu Li hadn’t discovered the Zhuyan’s movements in time. Zhuang Qing regarded himself as someone who drew a very clear line between gratitude and resentment. Within the span of a few breaths, he suppressed the tiny bit of dissatisfaction at the bottom of his heart. “Benefactor,” Chu Yu glanced at Fu Li as if he was an almighty figure of fortune. Even if he had to carry Fu Li over, he would do so with utmost willingness, much less speak of leading the way for him. “Please follow me.” “Don’t be so polite, it’s fine to just call me Fu Li.” Fu Li shifted his gaze away from Zhuang Qing with some regret and spoke to Chu Yu, “I’ll have to trouble you to lead the way then.” “It’s only right that I do so, only right,” Chu Yu led Fu Li out. Just as they passed by a small room, Fu Li suddenly came to a stop. “Benefactor, what’s wrong?” Seeing Fu Li come to a halt, Chu Yu glanced at the room in curiosity. This room appeared tiny, but in reality was equipped with a space system. Several yao who had broken the law were imprisoned inside. As long as they repented properly, they would be released in six months’ time at the earliest, or up to ten years’ time. Fu Li looked past the door and caught sight of a field dog inside who was puffing and blowing while working at a sewing machine. “It’s nothing, I just saw someone familiar.” Chu Yu’s gaze followed Fu Li’s line of sight. “You’re referring to Seventh Uncle Sun?” Fu Li nodded. “He told me about entering the city at that time, although he was already arrested by the time I went in.” “Fortunately, he was already captured when you entered the city. This Seventh Uncle Sun is a habitual swindler who often cons those little yao who just entered the city,” Chu Yu shook his head. “Everyone says that yao cultivators from the dog clan are honest and considerate, but to me, the only honest and considerate thing this Seventh Uncle Sun has is his face. He’s been in and out of here multiple times; a frequent visitor.” Fu Li could tell from the other party’s practiced movements that Seventh Uncle Sun must have frequently come to this place to do physical labor as part of rehabilitation. “This time, he did something a bit more major – he helped a little yao from the fox clan create fake identification. The fox yao became some internet celebrity and was reported for selling face masks of dubious origin. In the end, investigations by the police revealed that the fox yao’s degree and residence permit were all fake. The entire matter caused a huge commotion that even lasted on the internet for two days.” “Seventh Uncle Sun helped create fake identification for this sort of illegal yao immigrant, so he won’t be able to leave for three to five years.” Fu Li, “...;” <i>So, the many connections, grand residences and cars that Seventh Uncle Sun told him he had in the human world was all a lie?</i>  As a yao from the countryside who hadn’t seen the world, Fu Li felt that modern yaoguai had more and more vanity. The yao in the past most liked to brag about how great their cultivation base was and how many little yao they had under them, but the yao today even used their houses as something to boast about. <i>Really, they hadn’t learnt the human spirit of actively pursuing advancements nor their proficiency at inventing and innovating, yet they had mastered the art of bragging.</i>  The field dog turned his head and saw Fu Li standing there with Chu Yu. He walked to the gate and spoke through the barrier, “Little Fu, you came in too?” Fu Li, “...;” “Ai,” Human speech came out of the field dog’s mouth. “I told you long ago that the outside world isn’t good to live in. You just watched a few days of news broadcasts and wanted to rush out, aren’t you here now? Tell me, what did you do? Did you steal, swindle, or misuse spells and cause panic among the humans?” Seeing that Fu Li still wasn’t speaking, Seventh Uncle Sun thought that Fu Li had little courage and was still frightened. Therefore, he directed a fawning smile at Chu Yu. “Great immortal Chu, this is one of my juniors from the countryside. He didn’t see much of the world in the past and doesn’t know about the rules and laws of the human world. Why don’t you shut him in this prison cell of mine and let me give him a good talking to about the human world’s laws. He’s an honest yao and definitely won’t re-offend in the future.” “An old fox like you still wants to teach others not to commit crime, why not count how many times you’ve been here?” As a fish, Chu Yu wasn’t very fond of cats and dogs by nature. His eyelids twitched. “Don’t worry, Mr Fu is an esteemed guest of our bureau. You won’t be able to stay together with him.” “Esteemed guest?” Seventh Uncle Sun’s eyes shone. He looked at Fu Li as if he was a treasure. “Little Fu, you’ve matured, even stepping on the path of the bureau?” The cultivation world’s bureau was in charge of all cultivators in the human world, regardless of whether they were human or yao. As long as one walked the path of cultivation, they would have to bow their heads to those from the bureau to some extent. Thinking of this, Seventh Uncle Sun told Fu Li in a low voice, “Little Fu, why not you speak to the bureau’s people and ask them to reduce my sentence. When Seventh Uncle is out, I’ll definitely let you lead a plentiful life with an abundance of food and drink.” “Seventh Uncle, those who say such things in television dramas usually don’t have very good endings,” Fu Li had been watching television in the security guards’ restroom for the past few days and had already obtained some experience in this area. For instance, those who spoke too complacently would usually encounter terrible luck. Seventh Uncle Sun, “...;” <i>A yao from the countryside who had never seen the world now also knew how to keep up with television dramas?</i>  “The society today is a lawful one. Since you’ve committed a crime, then it should be handled as such.” Fu Li then added, “But don’t worry, I’ll definitely visit you in the future.” “Forget it, forget it,” Seventh Uncle Sun was also open-minded. Seeing that he couldn’t get out through Fu Li, he settled for the next best option. “The next time you visit me, bring more pig trotters. Gnawing on pig thigh bones are the best.” “Okay,” Fu Li watched Seventh Uncle Sun maintain his original form and return to his seat by the sewing machine. He turned and asked Chu Yu, “Why do they need to make clothes?” “Re-education through labor. There are so many convicts locked up in the prisons and they still need to be fed and clothed after all. Our bureau isn’t rich either, right?” Chu Yu explained with a broad smile. “This was learnt from the humans. It’s quite a good method.” “You’re right, work is the worthiest of respect,” Fu Li nodded in approval of Chu Yu’s statement. Seeing that Fu Li hadn’t pleaded for leniency on Seventh Uncle Sun’s behalf, Chu Yu didn’t mention this matter anymore. He brought Fu Li to the office to fill in the application form, and upon completion took out a medicinal bottle of pellets from the drawer. “Benefactor, take this bottle of Spirit Gathering Pellets.” He would remember his benefactor’s grace for as long as he lived. He didn’t have anything else that was of much use, and since the spiritual qi nowadays was sparse, it might be better for him to give his benefactor Spirit Gathering Pellets. Perhaps they would be of help towards his cultivation. Fu Li took the medicine bottle, wondering somewhat dubiously if the bureau’s people had a habit of gifting medicinal pellets. Rather than giving him this sort of tiny pill that wasn’t very effective, it would be better if they gave him a few university textbooks. After collating the application forms Fu Li had filled in, Chu Yu couldn’t resist asking, “Benefactor, did you bring your registration form?” “What registration form?” Fu Li asked in confusion. “The registration form for our bureau’s recruitment. There were quite a few cultivators who signed up today; there were a total of more than a thousand registration forms. But if you were to put yourself forward, there definitely won’t be a problem,” Chu Yu presented a registration form to Fu Li. “Whether or not you’re willing to come here, you can count it as participating in an exam. Just treat it as a way of adapting in advance to the atmosphere of the university entrance exams.” The moment Fu Li heard that it would increase his exam experience, he picked up a pen and smoothly filled in the form. He inquired lightly, “How many of the more-than-thousand applicants are you guys going to accept?” “We’re recruiting two times more the number of people this year compared to last year.” Fu Li, “How many was accepted last year?” “One.” Fu Li, “...;” <i>So, was he here to make up the number?</i>  After completing everything, Chu Yu insisted on sending Fu Li home. It wouldn’t be good for Fu Li to decline, so he could only agree. When they passed by a bookstore on the way back, Fu Li caught sight of specially discounted books, and thus went in to pick out a few university textbooks. Chu Yu glanced at the list of books – &lt;Seven Years of Model University Entrance Exam Papers&gt;, &lt;Qinggang’s Secret Volume&gt;, &lt;Yellow Diamond Answer Sheets&gt; and so on. He could feel a headache coming on just from looking at them. It was no wonder that the humans advanced so rapidly; not only were they hard on themselves, they were also hard on their children. They clearly only had a life span of approximately a hundred years, yet they spent the majority of their time on learning and working. They would invest large amounts of capital for the purpose of enabling their later generations to amass even greater knowledge. This sort of thirst for knowledge would not manifest in any other race other than the humans. However...; Chu Yu stole a peek at Fu Li, who was carrying the books and exam papers into the car. A yao cultivator who had the courage to compete with the humans to enter university was probably also an oddity in the yao world. He remembered that the younger generations of the cultivation sects all had poor grades, so any sect with a disciple who managed to enter an undergraduate course couldn’t wait to hold a ten-day grand banquet and announce the news to the entire cultivation world. In the depths of the night, many people had already sunk into dreamland. At the coast, the tide beat against the sand, the seemingly bottomless water appearing as if it would engulf everything. The bottle gourd in Zhuang Qing’s hands shook violently as if something wanted to break out of it. The sea breeze blew against Zhuang Qing’s hair. The next moment, an extremely large wave surged forth. An incomparably large golden dragon swiftly flashed across the surface of the sea. Very soon, the surface of the sea regained its calm, leaving only a tiny tortoise that persisted in its slow climb towards the sea. After entering the water, the golden dragon moved at the speed of lightning. All it took was a mere few minutes for it to plunge into the deepest valley of the sea. The floor of the valley was pitch-black without a single speck of light. The only ray of light was the golden radiance of virtue emanating from the golden dragon. Several casual-looking deep sea creatures didn’t seem to be able to adapt to the presence of light and fled into the distance with a flick of their tails. Zhuang Qing changed into his human form, threw the Zhuyan out of the bottle gourd, and then sealed him in a formation at the bottom of the ocean. The Zhuyan was an aggressive beast on land, but when it was at the bottom of the ocean, it lacked even the strength to struggle free of the seal, much less wreak havoc. Roaring, its eyes glared at the man in front of it whose entire body was shrouded in the golden radiance of virtue. It hated that it couldn’t swallow him into its belly in one mouth. “Zhuyan,” A jade ornament appeared in Zhuang Qing’s hand, emitting two rays of soft, violet light. “You have a predestined total life span of 23121 years. You have slaughtered countless yao, eaten millions of people, and incited the chaos of war in nearly a hundred cities. Today, you will be imprisoned at the bottom of the sea. You will be able to leave the city when the seal has dissipated.” The Zhuyan’s gaze landed on the jade ornament in Zhuang Qing’s hands, extreme fear appearing on his face. <i>This was...; the Heavenly Book of Virtue?</i>  <i>Exactly how many hundreds of lifetimes of supreme virtue did this golden dragon accumulate to dare to use the Heavenly Book of Virtue? Not only that, he could even use his less than two thousand years’ worth of cultivation to suppress an ancient fiend till he was completely unable to resist?</i>  <i>In the current cultivation world, did the levels of cultivation not even adhere to the fundamental laws anymore?</i>  Despair filled the Zhuyan’s heart and face. <i>Was he going to be stuck at the bottom of the sea for an eternity?</i>  “So what if you have the Heavenly Book of Virtue? I am still an ancient fiend recognized by heavenly law. So what if I ate millions of people? You can only imprison me, not dare to kill me.” Thinking of the possibility that he would have to remain at the bottom of the sea for countless years on end, the Zhuyan’s immense fear morphed into infinite rage. “Humans are weak, base creatures from birth. Eating them is just that – eating.” In the eyes of the Zhuyan, only those species stronger than him had any sense of existence. The rest could be slaughtered or eaten at will. Human lives were brief and frail; if not for the increasingly weakening spiritual qi in recent years, as well as the appearance of some management bureau, there would be no need for him to resist his innate tendencies. “You’re yao, yet you rush about for the humans. Truly a disgrace to my yao world.” The Heavenly Book morphed into a beam of light and entered Zhuang Qing’s body. He was silent upon hearing the Zhuyan’s scoldings. “What, you have nothing to say now?” “Did no one tell you that I was born to a human mother and have human blood running through my veins despite having the shell of a dragon?” Zhuang Qing’s expression was serene. “Not only do I protect humans, I also protect the entire yao race. Do you think the situation now is like that of several thousand years ago?” “Humans possess formidable weapons and ubiquitous monitoring devices. Unless human cultivators don’t ever appear in the human world, there will come a day when they are discovered by humans,” Zhuang Qing smiled coldly. “You’re an ancient yao. Perhaps you don’t fear human weapons, but what about the yao cultivators whose cultivation aren’t high enough?” “Survival of the fittest – if they can’t overcome human weapons, then death is what they deserve.” The Zhuyan’s vicious, large mouth opened, letting out a roar, “There is no need for you to talk so much. A sordid creature like you who is tainted with human blood isn’t fit to talk to this king.” After uttering these words, the Zhuyan was struck by a beam of blue light, immediately rendering his entire body painful and numb. Without any other choice, he could only lie at the bottom of the ocean and wail in pain. “I’m not fit to talk to you, but I can hit you.” “Kill me if you have the ability!” “You must be joking,” Zhuang Qing raised a hand and yet another bolt of blue light landed on the Zhuyan. The expression on his face was exceedingly solemn. “You are savage and brutal; the number of human and yao cultivators who have died at your hands cannot be counted. Death will not be able to eliminate your crimes. Heavenly law dictates that I cannot kill you.” “But...;” “I can hit you.” The Zhuyan was beaten till he broke out into loud wails. Afterwards, he no longer talked back, and his temper was also no longer that explosive. He lay on the ground curled in a ball. “Laozi has long wanted to beat you up,” Zhuang Qing composed his expression, as if he wasn’t the one who had just spouted profanities. “Reflect on yourself here, got it?” The Zhuyan’s massive body trembled. He didn’t dare to speak. At this moment, he was somewhat glad that there weren’t other yaoguai present at the bottom of the ocean to witness his miserable appearance, otherwise he wouldn’t be left with any face. He looked up and borrowed the golden radiance of virtue from Zhuang Qing’s body to look around stealthily. <i>What were those incomparably hideous creatures, why were they forming a huge circle in the distance?</i>  <i>Those fish whose eyes grew on their stomachs, why were their mouths split open?</i>  <i>Their tummies were so huge, and they had such ugly looks. Could they still be looked upon if their mouths were split open?</i>  Only at this instance did the Zhuyan realize that being shut inside the bureau’s spirit lock formation wasn’t anything scary. What was truly scary was being imprisoned within the deep sea without any knowledge of the year and month he would be able to leave. Turning, Zhuang Qing transformed into a dragon and vanished before the Zhuyan’s eyes in the blink of an eye. The bottom of the ocean was an expanse of darkness, without a single hint of light. Only when light was lost would one realize how beautiful it was. When Zhuang Qing was about to reach the shore, he transformed into his human form and jumped out of the water. Several drunk fishermen in the distance were crooning some undecipherable song lyrics. With a shake of his body, his originally wet clothes instantly became dry, albeit with some wrinkles. He looked down at his clothes for quite a while with some dissatisfaction. “Young man.” An elderly lady stood behind him and persuaded him somewhat worriedly, “If there’s something bothering you, avoid dwelling on it. Don’t walk in. It’ll be high tide a while later, go home soon so that your family members won’t worry.” Zhuang Qing looked back. The elderly lady was dressed in a black shirt and pants. She was wearing a green cloth official-like hat as well as green cloth shoes. Her black and white hair was combed very neatly. Under the reflection of the moon, her complexion appeared a little pale. The sea waves beat gently against the sandy shore, gently lapping the back of her feet before slowly retreating. “Auntie, who are you waiting for here?” Zhuang Qing patted the wrinkles on his clothes and took a few steps towards the shore. Seeing him move away from the seawater, a smiling expression appeared on the elderly lady’s face. “I’m waiting for my child. He’s been out at sea for a very long time. He said he would be back in June, but it’s already July; I can’t feel at ease.” Zhuang Qing’s gaze landed on a spot behind her. Thrusting both hands into his pockets, he let out a sigh. “You’ve been waiting here every day?” “I’m scared he doesn’t know the way.” The elderly lady seemed resentful, but in fact she was a little proud. “He’s had good grades since young. After joining the navy, he even rescued many people at sea. But he has one shortcoming – his memory isn’t very good; he even forgot the way home.” Zhuang Qing turned and glanced at the sea that stretched as far as the eye could see. A bright lighthouse could be seen in the distance, illuminating the direction back for the ships far from home. “Your son will come back,” Zhuang Qing shifted his line of sight. When he reached the carpark, he met an acquaintance – a yinchai from the underworld. “Mr Zhuang,” When Wang Zhen caught sight of Zhuang Qing, a few hints of deference unwittingly appeared on his face. “Why are you here?” “I came out to see the nightscape and just happened to bump into an elderly lady waiting for her son to return home.” “She...;” Wang Zhen wanted to say something but hesitated. “The heart of a caring mother is everlasting. Perhaps her son will return soon.” “You’re right, he’ll definitely return soon,” Wang Zhen kept his Soul-Locking Chain and Soul-Pulling Bell, smiling at Zhuang Qing. “This humble one will come again three days later.” “Many thanks,” Zhuang Qing nodded at Wang Zhen. “You’re too polite,” Wang Zhen morphed into smoke, vanishing at his spot. Zhuang Qing turned and cast a glance in the direction of the beach before turning back and vanishing into the dim light of the night. The news of Fu Li’s heroic act very quickly circulated among the hotel’s security guards. The colleagues who originally bore some dislike towards him were now much gentler towards him. Before two days had even gone by, the colleagues working the same shift as him took the initiative after work had ended to invite him to a night gathering to drink and eat grilled skewers. Although Fu Li wanted to rush back to study, this was the first time his new colleagues had invited him out for a night gathering, so he still cheerfully agreed. The four men changed out of their security guard’s uniform and then brought Fu Li to a well-known snack street. “Little Fu isn’t local, right?” Li Shi pried off the cap of the beer bottle using his teeth. He filled the four cups to the brim and told Fu Li, “If we’re talking about authentic snacks, the ones in this alley are still the most authentic. Two certain well-known snack streets are meant to deceive foreigners. Come, have a drink.” The taste of iced beer during a summer night was particularly fresh and crisp. However, the four people didn’t dare to drink too much. They still needed to work tomorrow night and feared making a mistake. Several skewers of mutton and chicken wings went into their tummies, while several bottles’ worth of beer went into their intestines. These people then started calling Fu Li brother, with Li Shi even jokingly commenting about introducing a girlfriend to Fu Li. Another colleague pulled the rug out from under his feet. “Don’t listen to his nonsense. He himself is a single dog, how is he going to introduce a girlfriend to someone else.” “That’s hard to say. With this face of mine, finding a girlfriend is a bit more challenging. But our little Fu has no need to worry about that,” Li Shi downed a cup of beer. “Look at this face and legs. Didn’t you see how those little girls at the front counter like to distribute snacks to him? Has any one of you ever received that kind of treatment?” Fu Li listened to them teasing each other with overflowing doubt in his heart. In the past, he had seen dogs who wanted to cultivate into humans, but he had yet to see any human call themselves a dog. Sure enough, the times were progressing, and society was advancing; even the humans had started to accord importance to the equality of all living things. After finishing the skewers and beer, the four men each went back to their respective homes. Fu Li walked along a quiet trail, bathed in gentle moonlight. His mood was especially good. “This mister, may I know the way to Sixth Month Road?” A man dressed in a white military uniform stopped Fu Li. The uniform the man was wearing was very neat; it could be seen that he was an extremely strict person. “Sixth Month Road?” Fu Li blinked. “I’ve never heard of such a road.” The man rubbed his head, his face filled with distress. “My house is very close to the ocean, but for some reason, I couldn’t find the way home after getting off the ship.” The moonlight shone on him. There was no shadow under his feet, though there was a faint golden light in the space between his brows. “This is the capital. There’s no sea nearby,” Fu Li came to a stop. “Are you in a rush?” “I’ve been at sea for more than a year and managed to get two days off with much difficulty, so I thought of coming back to accompany my mum. She’s suffered a lot the past few years for the sake of raising me, and her health isn’t good either.” For some reason, in front of Fu Li, the man in the military uniform felt a longing to speak. “I promised her that I would definitely rush back this month. I don’t know if she’s anxious from waiting by now.” He shook his head, seemingly confused about why he had come to the capital. Fu Li cocked his head in thought. This was human affection between mother and son.<i> Could even death not severe the fetters between them?</i>  He moved closer to the man in military garb and smelt the subtle fishy smell of the sea on him. Closing his eyes, he saw the man’s course of fate after death. A few men dressed in military uniform walked off a plane, a black-colored wooden trunk in their hands. The man’s photo was plastered on the side of the trunk. A military uniform and a model of a ship was placed on the wooden trunk. The military uniform on the trunk was identical to the one the man was wearing. “I’ll send you back,” Fu Li was suddenly interested in this soldier’s mother. Human emotions were truly strange. But they were also very interesting. Zhuang Qing, who was swimming in a luxurious villa’s swimming pool, suddenly broke past the surface of the water and looked up at the sky. There was a faint instability in the spiritual qi in the air. It seemed as if some formidable yao was using the Thousand Mile Technique? He slipped on his clothes and chased after the source of the yao qi. Fu Li brought the man in military uniform to his house, yet the house was completely empty. The mother he had talked about was not home. The man walked through the house before telling Fu Li, “My mum must be waiting for me by the sea. When I was studying in the past, I liked going to the seaside to play, so she would often go to the coast to bring me home. After I became a soldier, going out to the sea was my duty and ever since then, she liked waiting by the seaside. She said that she could be closer to the sea that way and feel more reassured about me.” He ran out while speaking. Fu Li looked back at the house. A photo of an elderly woman was hung on the wall. Her smile in the photo was gentle and she looked extremely kindly. The man seemed like he would vanish into the distance very soon, so Fu Li followed after him. He had just stepped out of the door when someone blocked his way. “Mr Fu.” Fu Li looked up and thought somewhat doubtfully, <i>why was the mixed-blood dragon whose pants didn’t tear when flicking his tail here?</i> <i>T/N: Sorry this is a bit late! Bonus ko-fi chapter, thank you Janeine and a few anonymous somebodies!</i>  Zhuang Qing’s sudden appearance made Fu Li somewhat confused. He took a step to the side. “Mr Zhuang, why are you here?” “I sensed fluctuations in yao qi just now and thought that a formidable yao was roaming about, so I came to take a look. I wasn’t expecting it to be Mr Fu,” Clad in a branded suit, Zhuang Qing seemed a little out of place when standing in the corridor of this old-fashioned private house. His gaze looked past Fu Li’s shoulders, landing on the photo hung on the wall behind the door. “Don’t worry. I used a concealment method when using the Thousand Mile Technique. Human monitoring devices won’t be able to capture me,” Fu Li’s understanding of the human world wasn’t very robust, but the him who had been a hotel security guard for the greater part of a month knew just how impressive the monitoring devices in the human world were. For a moment, Zhuang Qing didn’t know whether he should praise Fu Li for his attentiveness, or whether he himself was making a big fuss out of a minor issue. Perhaps the Zhuyan’s ‘yao emperor’ that had yet to appear had already caused fear to bud in his heart. This country had a population of over a billion. If the yao emperor were to suddenly rise in revolt, there would be countless deaths. He could not take this bet. Fu Li turned and shut the door. “Mr Fu, since there’s nothing wrong, why don’t we take a look?” Zhuang Qing didn’t express his attitude. Seeing Fu Li walk downstairs, he followed after him silently. The sea breeze carried the unique smell of the ocean. The waves beat against the seawater, producing the sound of gurgling water. Zhou Mu ran the entire way without resting for even a moment, till he caught sight of a familiar silhouette by the sea. “Mum!” He called out the term of address he had been using for twenty-eight years. He ran to the elderly woman just like a young bird returning to its nest. “You’re back?” The elderly woman stood on tiptoe and arranged the military cap on her tall son’s head. Seeing the military medal on his chest, a proud smile appeared on her face. “You did a meritorious deed for the army again?” “What meritorious deed,” The man nearing thirty years old revealed a bashful smile. He removed the cap and held it in one hand, while gripping the elderly woman’s hand with the other. Smiling, he said, “Let’s go back. This place is cold, don’t harm your health.” “Okay, okay, okay, let’s go home,” The elderly lady beamed at Zhou Mu as she walked slowly. The man who was accustomed to taking wide strides bent his back and took small quick steps. His posture was a bit funny. The tide surged ahead, splashing against their ankles before slowly retreating. Not even half a footprint was left behind at the areas they passed by. “Mr Zhuang, the time limit of three days is up,” Wang Zhen walked to Zhuang Qing’s side and glanced at the crescent moon in the sky. “This humble one has a duty to fulfill, may Mr Zhuang please understand.” With drooping eyelids, Zhuang Qing watched the mother and son slowly make their way along the sand hand-in-hand. After a long while, he opened his mouth, his voice so apathetic that it nearly seemed void of emotion. “Many thanks to yinchai <i>daren</i> for your flexibility.” “How can this be considered flexibility? A soldier defending his country lost his life in the prime of his life. It is only right to allow mother and son to meet one more time,” Wang Zhen took a deep breath. “This mother and son can support each other on the way; they won’t be lonely.” He turned and noticed Fu Li beside Zhuang Qing. Though he had seen the other party at the hotel when he went to gather souls, he wasn’t very clear of the other party’s identity. Thus, after nodding at Fu Li, he made his way to the mother and son pair. Fu Li didn’t utter a word from beginning to end, neither did he stop Wang Zhen when he walked forward. His clear and limpid eyes were wide open, and he watched the mother-son pair extremely seriously, as if wanting to understand something out from them. Wang Zhen appeared in front of the mother and son. The elderly woman didn’t express the slightest confusion and greeted Wang Zhen with a smile. Wang Zhen had always been very harsh towards souls who cried and kicked up a fuss. Instead, it was this sort of rational, virtue-possessing soul that made his heart soften a little. “Lin Cuirong, Zhou Mu, I’m here to fetch you. It’s time for you to leave.” Zhou Mu stood in front of Lin Cuirong, his expression vigilant. “Who are you?” His gaze swept across the chain in Wang Zhen’s hands, and his expression instantly became stern. “The sentence for the crime of kidnapping is very harsh. I suggest that you hold yourself back before acting, don’t harm the latter part of your life.” “Zhou Mu, you already died twenty days ago,” Wang Zhen took out the Soul-Pulling Bell and shook it lightly. The memories that had been forgotten due to death swarmed into Zhou Mu’s mind. Twenty days ago, a passenger ship ran into difficulties at sea. As soldiers, him and his comrades-in-arms chose to rescue people without the slightest hesitation. Later on, as he was rescuing a tiny child, he encountered a shoal of fish at the seabed. All he remembered was the sensation of countless fish tails slamming against him and not what had happened after that. “That child...;” Zhou Mu rubbed his head and looked at Wang Zhen. “Is that child still alive?” “Yes. After you were washed away by the shoal of fish, you used your teeth to hold tightly onto the rope and tied the child to the life-saving rope. Your comrades-in-arms pulled the child up,” Wang Zhen smiled faintly. “She’s living very well.” With a wave of his hand, a scene appeared before Zhou Mu. A little girl dressed in a white dress with white flowers on her head was laying flowers in front of a tombstone. Zhou Mu looked at his mother beside him. There was no shadow beneath her feet. At this moment, the rims of Zhou Mu’s eyes reddened. In the end, he had failed to rush back while his mother was still alive. “Your remains were not found, so the things buried in the memorial park were...; your remnants,” Wang Zhen’s tone of voice was heavy. The expression on his face wasn’t sloppy either. “But that girl calls you godfather and said she will visit you every year.” “So much sentiment. I’m just a bachelor who’s lived for twenty-eight years, yet I now have such a pretty maiden,” A clear and bright smile took shape on Zhou Mu’s face. “It’s a steal.” Wang Zhen lit a cigarette and held it in his hands without puffing on it. For some reason, he laughed first. “It wasn’t that great a steal.” “Mum,” Zhou Mu gripped the elderly woman’s hand tightly. “This son wasn’t filial...;” “I understand,” Lin Cuirong extended a hand covered in wrinkles. She took the military cap in his hands, stood on tiptoe and placed it on his head. “My son is a soldier. I am honored that he can be buried in the memorial park.” The coarse hand pinched his ear gently, just like the times during his childhood when he was disobedient and was hauled back home by the ears by his mother. “You just refuse to listen. When you were young, the fortune-teller said your bazi was averse to water, yet you refused to believe him and said that it was just feudalistic superstition. Now do you understand?” Though Lin Cuirong was smiling, the rims of her eyes were red. She turned and bowed to Wang Zhen. “You should be the legendary yinchai <i>daren</i>. Many thanks for letting us mother and son reunite.” Wang Zhen cleared his throat and forced out a smile. He stamped out the cigarette using his foot and then smoothly picked up the cigarette butt, stuffing it into his pocket. “Let’s go.” <i>“Bridges return to bridges; roads return to roads. Souls of the dead cannot turn back. Before life, accumulated merit will turn into virtue. In your next life, you’ll be a marquis...;”</i>  The ringing sound of the Soul-Pulling Bell gradually drifted into the distance. Wang Zhen and the mother-son pair morphed into mist, vanishing into the night. Wang Zhen’s out-of-tune song could still be vaguely heard. Fu Li crouched on the sand without any care for his image, an extremely perplexed expression on his face. There wasn’t a human he could ask, so he had no choice but to pose the question to the mixed-blood yao beside him. “They’re clearly very upset, so why were they still smiling?” Fu Li recalled Lu Renjia, who refused to follow the yinchai even in death, and then thought about this mother-son pair. He felt that human emotions were truly very complex; crying and smiling did not simply reflect unhappiness and happiness. Zhuang Qing looked at the scene of Fu Li crouching and felt that the other party seemed a little like a confused and ignorant stupid dog. He gave a kick using the tips of his feet. “Get up, don’t squat.” “Why?” Fu Li simply sat down in a cross-legged position. He looked up at Zhuang Qing. “If I can crouch or sit, why would I bother standing?” His gaze seemed to be asking, <i>are you an idiot?</i>  Zhuang Qing inhaled deeply and reminded himself that this yaoguai had four thousand years of cultivation and had identification of his status as a good yao. Impulsive behavior easily destroyed cultivation, so he chose to answer the previous question instead. “Because of emotion.” “What emotion?” “The mother’s love and protection towards her son, and the son’s admiration of the mother.” Fu Li pondered over it for a very long time before shaking his head. “That mother’s soul stayed in the human world for so many days. Did she not think about how her next life would be affected if she angered the yinchai?” “Therefore, this is motherly love,” Zhuang Qing stooped over slightly, his gaze meeting Fu Li’s large eyes. “Do you not have a mother?” Even a yao had to be bred by a mother. Fu Li shook his head and said confidently, “I’m an orphan yao who doesn’t know that all this was very normal. You seem to understand this sort of human emotion very well. It is because your mother was very good to you?” Zhuang Qing straightened his body, not looking at Fu Li’s face that was brimming with curiosity. Just as Fu Li thought that he wouldn’t reply, Zhuang Qing nodded slightly. “She was a very good woman and a very good mother.” Zhuang Qing stuffed his hands into the pockets of his pants, saying impatiently, “You’re an old yaoguai who’s lived for four thousand years, why is your sense of curiosity still so strong? Let’s go.” “So what if I’m an old yaoguai?” Fu Li touched his face. “My human form is even younger than yours.” Zhuang Qing turned around and looked expressionlessly at Fu Li. “Do you know what kind of old person is most liked by others?” Fu Li shook his head. “A person of good moral standing and reputation who isn’t talkative,” Zhuang Qing threw down this statement, turned and strode ahead. Fu Li stood at his spot and blinked. He replied without thinking, “Human society even knows how to pay careful attention to respecting the old and cherishing the young.” “It’s not like I’m human!” Zhuang Qing’s steps quickened. Fu Li caught up to him and shook his head helplessly. “Nowadays, all you young yao really have poor tempers; getting angry the moment somebody disagrees with you.” Zhuang Qing halted his footsteps, turned and shot a glance at him. The next moment, he used the Thousand Mile Technique and vanished in front of Fu Li. “Exactly, this explosive temper. If it was those years...;” Fu Li recalled the sparkling golden light of virtue on Zhuang Qing and swallowed his words reminiscing those times. “Seems like nobody will dare to do much to him either.” He lowered his head, wanting to pick up several shells and whatnot by the sea. In the end, he found that the amount of rubbish far outnumbered the number of shells. Moreover, they even gave off a faint stinky smell. “The people nowadays,” Fu Li shook his head. Using a technique, he gathered all the rubbish on the sand into one pile, forming a tiny mountain of rubbish. The next day, City Wu’s television station reported a piece of news that attracted the attention of quite a few people. It turned out that the rubbish at a certain beach had actually been picked up by someone in the span of one night, and the rubbish had been piled up into a mountain. There was even a sign erected beside the mountain of rubbish, with nine crooked words written on it. Everyone has a responsibility to protect the environment. The news of someone picking up all the rubbish at the beach in one night very quickly created a sensation. It had originally just been reported on by the local media as a novel incident, but for some reason, it attracted the attention of many when it was circulated on the internet. Some busybodies even specially went to interview residents living near the beach. These residents confirmed the incident – it was not fake news fabricated by the local television station in order to promote themselves but had truly occurred. After the incident’s authenticity was confirmed, a netizen with a large brain hole suggested that this could have been caused by a yaoguai from the sea who could no longer tolerate humans throwing trash into the sea and thus warned these silly humans. There was even someone who suggested that it was a performance sneakily put up by an environmental protection organization. When the incident caused a commotion, it would then raise the overall level of awareness of the need to protect the environment. However, how could the mediocre guess that was the second suggestion be compatible with the netizens’ mentality of wanting to watch a show without any concern for how big a ruckus that was caused? They had already gotten to the bottom of the matter and were deliberating whether it was done by a dolphin spirit or shark spirit, with both sides throwing out multiple scientific papers. In the end, it was the dolphin with the more pleasing appearance and who was by nature more intimate with humans, who led the vote count the entire way. “Is there something wrong with them? They’re using scientific papers to campaign for votes for nonexistent yao. All they’re doing is joining in on the fun yet they’re treating it with so much authenticity. How bored are the netizens nowadays?” Zhang Ke finished reading the various remarks on the internet and turned to speak to Chu Yu, “Yu ge, was this really done by you fishes?” “I am a freshwater fish. I’m not in the same group as the saltwater fishes,” Chu Yu patted the folder in his hands and side-eyed Zhang Ke. “Both you and the monkey are primates, but are the both of you the same?” “Yu ge, I was wrong!” Zhang Ke felt that his mouth was really terrible. How could he have forgotten that many living creatures had a tendency to dislike outsiders. This Daoist fish even disliked a Buddhist freshwater fish, let alone those of the saltwater variety. Xu Yuan covered her face with &lt;Cultivation World’s Handbook of Rules&gt; to conceal the scoffing smile on her face. Only when Zhang Ke and Chu Yu shot a glare at her did she sit up straight and cough dryly, putting on an act. “It’s best that we investigate this matter as soon as possible. If it was really done by a yao cultivator, we’ll have to give that person a warning.” Appealing for everyone to protect the environment was the right thing to do, but doing it in such a way and so suddenly was still a little frightening. “There’s no need to search anymore,” Zhuang Qing pushed open the door and walked in. He glanced at the news channel that was currently being broadcast on the computer. The host of the channel was describing just how large and tall the mountain of trash was in a very exaggerated tone of voice, as well as how clean the surrounding beach was. The camera even zoomed in multiple times on the sign stating ‘everyone has a responsibility to protect the environment’. “Boss,” Chu Yu went up to welcome him, using his sleeves to wipe a chair. “You’re here? Please sit.” Creatures of the water clan had an innate reverence for the dragon clan. Therefore, even though the current society was one where humans and yao were equal, Chu Yu still subconsciously kissed up to Zhuang Qing when faced with him. Xu Yuan and the rest had long seen grown used to Chu Yu’s behavior and were too lazy to offer any superfluous expressions. “Boss, do you know what’s going on with this matter about a water yao cherishing the environment?” Xu Yuan was a little curious. She pressed the pause button and the scene on the computer stopped on the sign stating ‘everyone has a responsibility to protect the environment’. “I was at the beach the night before yesterday.” “You were the one who did this?” Xu Yuan looked at the sign incredulously. <i>Boss’ handwriting had always been beautiful and elegant. These words...; Did he write them using his toes?</i>  Zhuang Qing glanced at Xu Yuan. Xu Yuan shrank her neck back. <i>Did she say something wrong?</i>  “Arrange for the publicity department to handle this matter,” Zhuang Qing sighed. “It’s been hard on everyone the past two days. Tidy up the accounts; I’ll be submitting the accounts to the higher-ups.” “Sure,” Xu Yuan was brimming with vitality the next instance. Every time Boss went to submit the accounts, allowance would be sent down to them. Thus, Xu Yuan swiftly fished out the various financial bills and prepared to shove all of them to the finance department later on. “Chu Yu, how many application forms are there this recruitment?” Zhuang Qing flipped through the applicant list and saw Fu Li’s name in a single glance. “Boss, we’ve already received more than two thousand forms from all over the country. There are a total of 1656 human cultivators, 302 yao cultivators, and more than a hundred ghost cultivators.” “What are the ghost cultivators doing running over to our side instead of finding work in the underworld?” Old Huang heaved a sigh. Sure enough, their yao clan was in decline. The number of yao applicants wasn’t even one-fifth of the human cultivators. “The underworld emphasizes data management or something now; they don’t need much manpower. Besides, who doesn’t want to join this place of ours? What if they manage to enter?” Chu Yu was extremely pleased that he had managed to join the bureau. <i>Unlike certain fishes who wasted several decades trying to no avail.</i>  Zhuang Qing put down the name list and got up to return to his office. “What did Boss come here for?” Zhang Ke stretched out his neck and stealthily peeked over. Only after confirming that Zhuang Qing had already left did he ask a colleague, “Was it just to ask about recruitment?” But during the past few years, when had Boss ever cared about it? It wasn’t like nobody had ever tried to get the boss to open the back door during the past few years, but...; nobody had ever succeeded. “Ai, look, there’s a new development on the environmental protection incident,” A colleague seated at another side was pointing at the computer. “Our capital even made an appearance.” There was a river in the western suburbs of the capital, of which a certain section was particularly dirty. Although a considerable amount of money had been poured into cleaning it every year, there still remained people who threw their rubbish into the river. However, all the trash at the bottom of the river had now been returned to shore. Moreover, a sign had once again been erected at the corner. The words were still as crooked as ever. “This doesn’t seem like something Boss would do.” Chu Yu glanced at the new video and said with certainty, “Boss isn’t this idle.” “You mean to say that the boss is covering up for someone else?” Zhang Ke asked. The moment this question of his was uttered, all the living creatures in the room revealed a shocked expression, as if Zhang Ke had said something extremely scary. The atmosphere became incomparably awkward and quiet. Zhang Ke twisted his head and looked around before laughing dryly. “What did I just say?” “Nothing, hahaha.” At the front counter of Affinity Moon Hotel, there weren’t many customers who did the check-in procedures in the depths of the night, so the security guards as well as the people manning the front counter were all a little tired. The front-counter lady stuffed two dried plums into her mouth to raise her spirits. She watched Fu Li spray the money tree at the main entrance with water from a spray bottle. “Fu Li, do you want some?” “What is this?” Fu Li put down the spray bottle and glanced curiously at the thing in the front-counter lady’s hand. “Dried plums.” Fu Li tried one and his brows furrowed till they formed a clump. This appearance of his incited a few laughs from the few girls at the front counter. A handsome-looking person would still remain good-looking even if they furrowed their brows and made faces. Fu Li never once commented about the effects of their snack-eating, so they were most fond of sharing their snacks with him. “So sour,” Fu Li covered his face. Seeing the happy looks of the few human girls, he realized that human females were extremely casual when it came to eating. They would occasionally eat sweet things, occasionally eat sour things, and occasionally eat spicy things; their tastes in food were too complicated. “You’re on the night shift today?” The front-counter lady who gave him the dried plum glanced at the traditional court clock hanging on the wall. It was almost twelve o’clock – the time when Fu Li should be getting off work. Yet, the person taking over from him hadn’t arrived. “En,” Fu Li nodded. The sound of chatter echoed from the main entrance. A fashionably dressed man wearing a mask walked in with a middle-aged man. The middle-aged man was holding onto some things, his pace hurried. “Come here,” The middle-aged man pointed at Fu Li. “Help us bring our luggage up.” “All right, mister.” Fu Li took the suitcase from the middle-aged man, effortlessly lifting it up with one hand. Seeing his relaxed movements, the middle-aged man stared blankly for a moment and didn’t say anything more. After finishing the procedures, the two people walked towards the lift. Fu Li followed behind them with the suitcase. The fashionable man removed his sunglasses, glanced back at Fu Li, and spoke to the middle-aged man, “On what basis is that She Weilong the lead actor? Such a sharp chin and large eyes. Someone who didn’t know any better would think that he’s a snake spirit who debuted. When I was the first male lead, he wasn’t even fit to put the heels of my shoes on my feet.” “Yi ge, cool your temper,” The manager looked back at Fu Li. “We can talk more in the room.” The fashionable man called Yi ge glanced back at Fu Li and snorted coldly. “Even a hotel’s security guard is better looking than him. With those morals and conduct, how does he have the nerve to pressure others using his looks. Such utter shamelessness.” The manager gave two dry laughs. The moment the lift came to a step, he took out two large bills from his wallet and stuffed it into Fu Li’s hands as a tip. Hopefully, the other party would keep his mouth tightly shut and not leak out his artist’s brainless remarks. “Hey, isn’t this teacher Yi?” A young man wearing a purple top walked over from the other side of the corridor. His eyes were large, his chin sharp, and even the way he walked gave off a subtle seductive allure. “Why didn’t you bring a few more assistants?” “Teacher She must be joking. I’m responding to the call of my country and leading a simple life of hard work,” Yi ge turned and snatched the suitcase from Fu Li’s hands. He strode into his room and closed the door heavily in front of She Weilong. When Yi ge and his manager left, the smile on She Weilong’s face disappeared. He raised his chin and shot a glance at Fu Li. Pinching his nose, he took a few steps back. “Stay away from me.” He most disliked humans who frequently carted heavy things; their bodies were constantly covered in stinky sweat. Fu Li silently looked at this snake yao. <i>Snakes didn’t breathe through their noses, so what was he doing pinching his nose?</i>  Putting on artificial airs and play-acting – who knew where he had learnt these bad habits? He stuffed the tip from the manager into his pocket and said unhurriedly, “Close your mouth a little tighter if you don’t want to smell anything. What use is there in pinching your nose?” He had already sent the previous not-so-sensible python to the zoo to turn over a new leaf. A hint of embarrassment appeared on She Weilong’s face. <i>He was a fellow yao? He was a yao cultivator with such good looks, yet he still ran over to the hotel to be a security guard. What breed of yao was he, was his level of intellect not very high?</i>  Just as he was thinking this, the lift doors opened once more. The person who walked out caused She Weilong to take three steps back on reflex. <i>Could the bureau have found out that he used a bewitching spell to snatch the role of male lead in a television drama?</i>  <i>Was this offence so huge that even the boss of the bureau had to personally step out?</i>  T/N: It’s my translation anniversary, so here’s an extra chapter to celebrate~ here’s to more pit digging k1U389; She Weilong propped himself up against the wall and raised his head, glancing at the surveillance camera not too far away. He tried very hard to make himself appear less terrified. If the camera wasn’t present, he would definitely have kneeled in front of Boss Zhuang without demur. Zhuang Qing stepped out of the lift. His gaze swept across She Weilong. He hadn’t even uttered a single word when She Weilong’s legs grew weak and he slumped to the floor, supported by the wall. Fu Li saw that the person who had arrived was Zhuang Qing and couldn’t help feeling somewhat envious. “You really have lots of money.” The price of a room in this hotel was very high. “I came to find you,” Zhuang Qing ignored Fu Li’s envious gaze. “Come with me.” “How did you come up without a room card?” Security at the hotel was extremely tight. If one didn’t swipe the sensor in the lift with a room card, the lift wouldn’t go up at all. Fu Li stared at Zhuang Qing, looking him over. “You used a magic technique to conjure it up?” “Is that what you’re concerned about?” Zhuang Qing restrained his temper. “Come.” “Wait a moment,” Fu Li very magnanimously didn’t quibble over Zhuang Qing’s attitude. He turned and looked at She Weilong, saying with furrowed brows, “As a proper male snake, why is it that even after painstakingly cultivating a human form, you still act like a snake? The image of you sitting on the ground for no reason isn’t very nice to look at. Get up.” Feeling very wronged, She Weilong propped himself up against the foot of the wall and stood up. “Stand firm. Your legs shouldn’t tremble. Your waist and back should be straight,” Fu Li saw that She Weilong still seemed afraid of the slightest thing and gave up on teaching him. If this were the past, no leader would want this sort of yaoguai even if they took on the role of mountain scouts. So, he wouldn’t waste his good intentions either. Zhuang Qing glanced silently at the snake yao seated on the ground. She Weilong was originally already very scared, so when Zhuang Qing glanced over, he nearly burst into tears from terror. It had only been more than twenty years since he cultivated a human form. If he hadn’t encountered this good situation where the management bureau’s control of the cultivation world prevented formidable yao from bullying other tiny yao, he wouldn’t even have dared to leave his cave with his tiny bit of cultivation. Coupled with the snake species’ innate reverence and allegiance to dragons, he couldn’t help wanting to kneel with just one glance from Zhuang Qing. <i>Get a grip, this isn’t a feudalistic era where emperors rul</i>e. <i>Even among yaoguai, it’s no longer popular to kneel here and there. </i>She Weilong continuously encouraged himself internally. However, his legs that were as soft as noodles told him through its realistic actions that this sort of mental suggestion wasn’t of any use. “Children cannot be taught.” Fu Li shook his head and turned, speaking to Zhuang Qing, “I happen to be getting off work, let me change my clothes first.” “En,” Zhuang Qing made a flat sound of agreement. She Weilong watched the two people leave with his hands held against his chest. Even after a long while, he still couldn’t breathe easier. So<i> the boss of the cultivation world wasn’t here for him? Also, who was that security guard? He could actually see through his original form in one glance, and was so calm even when faced with the boss of the cultivation world?</i>  <i>Could he also be a senior with profound cultivation?</i>  Recalling his rude words towards the other party, She Weilong was so regretful that he almost failed to maintain his human form. <i>Wasn’t it good to be content with being a flower vase of a male actor? Why did he have to run to a senior of the cultivation world and court disaster?</i>  After a change of clothes, Fu Li stepped out of the hotel and sniffed. “So fragrant.” His divine consciousness searched around their surroundings and discovered a large food stall in a small alley not too far away. Bright red crayfish were boiling in a pot, emitting an alluring fragrance. Zhuang Qing watched Fu Li suddenly head towards a path and asked with creased brows, “Where are you going?” “Don’t you have something to say to me? It’s only meaningful to eat while talking,” Fu Li waved a hand at Zhuang Qing as if he was beckoning to a dog. “My treat.” “Roadside stalls aren’t sanitary, who wants to eat at those things?” His voice grew even colder. Ten minutes later, the two people were seated at a collapsible table. The sizzling sounds from the wok behind them could be heard, as well as the owner’s out-of-tune humming. The crayfish were stir-fried in hot oil and then seasoned with chili, Sichuan peppers, and garlic. Right before they were poured out of the wok, bits and pieces of chopped onion were sprinkled on top. The incomparably enticing fragrance that wafted from it soon afterwards automatically evoked a longing to polish it off. They put on disposable plastic gloves, broke open the front claws of the crayfish, and lightly sucked on it with their lips and tongue. The mala taste was accompanied by the sweetness of the tender crayfish. When paired with a mouthful of ice-cold beer, the summer night became cool, refreshing, and pleasant. Seeing the lively manner in which Fu Li was eating and how there were three or four crayfish less within a short span of time, Zhuang Qing pulled up the sleeves of his shirt and also dug in. When it came to eating aquatic products, no one could eat faster or cleaner than the dragon clan. Very soon, the number of crayfish on the platter became less and less. Fu Li pretended to accidentally pull the platter towards him. Looking up, he asked Zhuang Qing, “What did you want to talk to me about?” “Boss, another large portion of mala crayfish,” Zhuang Qing noticed Fu Li’s movements and called out to the owner. “Sure.” Fu Li used his chopsticks to jab the remaining few skinny crayfish and suddenly had an indescribable feeling that he was being ‘taken advantage of for food’. This Zhuang Qing was covered head to toe in famous brands and was even the boss of some bureau. <i>Surely he wouldn’t do this kind of embarrassing thing?</i>  Zhuang Qing stretched out his chopsticks and grabbed the fattest crayfish in the platter before asking, “You recently helped to gather trash?” “Trash?” Fu Li stared blankly and nodded. When he realized what he meant, he shook his head and sighed. “The earth and water are the origins of all living things, yet some people don’t cherish them the slightest bit. When I saw the trash in disarray, I couldn’t resist helping them to gather all of it.” Zhuang Qing threw the peeled crayfish shells onto the plate for waste. “Tidying trash is a good thing, but because you tidied so much of it in one night, it caused a huge commotion on television. Everyone’s even guessing if a yaoguai was protesting.” “Their guess is on point.” “To human knowledge, there exists no yaoguai in this world,” Zhuang Qing lowered his voice. “Can’t you be a bit more discrete in your actions?” “Then the next time, I’ll tidy up the trash on three separate occasions?” “...;” “These two handsome guys, your large portion of mala crayfish is here,” The stall owner placed a large platter of crayfish in front of the two people. His standard Mandarin was a bit off and he had a southwestern accent. “Handsome, this crayfish is quite spicy. Do you want another two cans of herbal tea?” Fu Li nodded. Two cans of herbal tea with condensation on it was very quickly placed on their table. “Your actions can easily cause panic among the humans,” Zhuang Qing peeled off his gloves and handed his phone to Fu Li. “Look at how severe the commotion is on the internet.” Fu Li didn’t have a handphone. Although he didn’t quite understand how to operate one, he still knew how to scroll through comments. He started to read the popular comments on weibo. Baby is only seventeen: Even yao spirits know how to protect the environment, what face do us humans have to pollute the environment? Single ball ice-cream: Humans are inferior to yao – will the faces of those who litter turn red upon seeing this news? Chestnut: No matter who did this, I believe he had good intentions. Look at this mountain of trash – all of this was created by us. Everyone has a responsibility to protect the environment – it’s easy to write out these eight words, but how many can truly do it? There were still many comments below. In essence, everyone was discussing matters related to the environment. Fu Li didn’t see any words related to ‘fear’ or ‘alarm’. Was this...; also considered bringing about panic? After reading all of the popular comments, Fu Li felt a faint elation. To him, doing these things was still very meaningful. He put down the handphone and glanced at the platter. Why was there only half of the crayfish left? “Mr Zhuang, you’re very fond of eating crayfish?” “No,” Zhuang Qing spoke while taking the crayfish. There was a mountain of crayfish shells on the plate for waste in front of him. Fu Li, “...;” <i>Forget it. It was very normal for young yao to be a little hypocritical; it was a minor shortcoming.</i>  In the end, the two people ate three platters of crayfish. Fu Li paid for it and then looked back at Zhuang Qing, who was seated at the table and gracefully wiping his mouth. “Mr Zhuang, let’s go.” Zhuang Qing glanced up at Fu Li and got up, heading out. In this slightly warm alley, the Zhuang Qing who was wearing a white shirt and suit pants, and the Fu Li who was dressed in a tee-shirt and jeans, unexpectedly didn’t seem like people from different backgrounds. The footsteps of the person wearing leather shoes was steady and firm, while there was a subtle gaiety and buoyance to the footsteps of the person wearing sports shoes. Suddenly, the feet clad in leather shoes came to a stop. Zhuang Qing turned and looked at Fu Li. “According to the 131<sup>st</sup> rule of the bureau’s public security regulations, cultivators who casually use magic techniques and arouse panic among the humans will be fined a minimum of a thousand yuan. There is no maximum amount.” Fu Li looked at Zhuang Qing in disbelief. <i>He didn’t say so just now and only asked him to pay the fine after finishing the crayfish he treated him to. Was he still a yao?</i>  Zhuang Qing touched a hand to his nose. He could still smell the fragrance of the mala crayfish on the tips of his fingers. He looked up and took another look at Fu Li’s wide-eyed appearance. Turning, he continued walking ahead. “But given that your actions this time have increased the importance humans place on the environment, I’ll allow a special exemption of the punishment.” Fu Li heaved a sigh of relief. It seemed that this meal of crayfish he had treated him to hadn’t been for naught. “Let’s go, I’ll send you back,” The Zhuang Qing who had eaten and drank his fill was in a very good mood. Fu Li recalled how Zhuang Qing had asked Chu Yu for the petrol fee the previous time and stood beside the car door with some hesitation. “Will you ask me for petrol fees?” “Tch,” Zhuang Qing smiled coldly. “What rare treasure does my magnificent dragon not have? Am I so miserly that I lack this tiny bit of petrol fees?” Fu Li came to a sudden understanding. True, the dragon clan had always lived in the depths of the ocean. What they least lacked was all kinds of treasures. He certainly wouldn’t fancy his bit of money. The car traveled at a moderate pace along the road. The crescent moon gradually sunk into the layers of clouds. Thick clouds filled the sky; it seemed like it would rain soon. A tiny cat scampered out of a street. Zhuang Qing couldn’t brake in time and used a magic technique to stop the car. “Meow,” The tiny cat flicked its tail ignorantly and without fear. It crossed the street at an exasperatingly slow pace before vanishing at a run into the other side of the street. The car set off once again. Fu Li turned and looked at Zhuang Qing. The other party hadn’t shown any expression from start to end. Fu Li couldn’t help but suspect that he hadn’t transformed from the body of a sea dragon, but from a Jindiao dragon along the corridors of the palace. Only a statue didn’t have expressions. There were flashes of lightning in the sky’s horizons. Within the thick layers of clouds, something enormous seemed to have flitted across, though it soon vanished within the clouds. Fu Li and Zhuang Qing glanced up at the sky. Hailstones suddenly rained down with pitter-patter sounds. The lack of prior warning meant that the windshield took several consecutive hits. Zhuang Qing’s face darkened. Fu Li set up a barrier, preventing the hail from smashing down on the car. After sending Fu Li home, Zhuang Qing drove the car back into his garage. Stretching out a hand, he touched the area on the windshield that had been hit by the hail. His black pupils turned golden with hints of fury. He fished out his phone and added a penalty to the bureau’s internal system. The Northern Lake azure dragon violated the rules by causing hail to rain down, thereby resulting in countless losses to the common people – to be sentenced to ten years of prison and fined two million yuan. The next day at work, not a single bit of surprise could be seen on the faces of the bureau employees after they saw the penalty notification sent out by the system and knew of the penalty target. Since ancient times, the dragon clan had conducted themselves in an ostentatious and arrogant manner due to their noble lineage and strong innate magic power. They had always held ordinary yao cultivators in contempt. At birth, the majority of the dragon clan possessed the ability to freeze and summon rain, thunder, and frost. Not only did they receive human sacrifices, many yao also had to bow to them on sight. And it was precisely because of this that certain brash dragons would cause heavy rain or snow to descend if they were in a bad mood or were playing around, bringing misery to the humans and animals in the human world. This sort of situation had only gradually taken a turn for the better after the boss took charge of the cultivation bureau. They had originally thought that the boss would definitely side with the dragon clan because of his ties to them, but who would have expected that it would be the exact opposite in reality? Not only was the boss not biased towards them, he was very harsh towards them. In the past close to ten years, the sum of the violation tickets the boss had issued to the dragon clan was even enough to buy real estate in the capital. They had previously guessed that the boss might not be on very good terms with the dragon clan, but other than fining them according to the regulations, the boss had not gone to the dragon palace at the bottom of the ocean to look for trouble, so there was still no proof to substantiate this way of thinking. After deliberating about it from all angles, they could only arrive at one conclusion – that the boss was upright and plainspoken and would definitely not be biased against any one side because of race. “Two million is a tiny amount to the dragon clan. It’s just that this Northern Lake azure dragon appears to be the Dragon King, who would be able to take him away?” Chu Yu turned and looked at everyone in the room. Everyone turned their heads simultaneously, not meeting Chu Yu’s gaze. <i>It wasn’t like they disdained their lives for being too long; who would want to go up against the dragon clan?</i>  “Lin Gui, I remember that you’re from the sea...;” Chu Yu’s line of sight eventually landed on a youth at the corner wearing a checkered jacket. “Yu ge, my family’s ancestor was once even the deputy of the dragon clan. With just my little ability, how would I dare to capture a dragon? That Northern Lake azure dragon is a freshwater dragon; I think you’re more suited to handle this matter,” Lin Gui shook his head vigorously. “Let me off, okay?” “What would I go there for? Deliver myself to the azure dragon to be eaten?” Chu Yu conceded defeat instantly. Coughing dryly, he said, “Capturing the dragon isn’t important. Let’s first send this penalty to the dragon clan. What if this Northern Lake azure dragon feels remorseful and gives himself up?” “If you think about it, it’s not like we’re breaking the law,” Zhang Ke mumbled in a low voice. The past few years, a certain dragon clan had committed numerous misdeeds at their own pleasure, which had caused natural calamities to strike certain areas. There was no end to the damage done. If not for the boss pressuring the dragon clan the past few years and teaching this dragon clan who didn’t take other living creatures seriously a thing or two, they would probably be even more unbridled in behavior. “Don’t assume that us fishes have bad hearing just because we don’t have ears on the surface of our original forms,” Chu Yu turned to look at Zhang Ke. “Our hearing is perfectly fine. I heard your muttering very early on; if you’re so capable, go ahead.” Zhang Ke: <i>He might be a man, but he couldn’t be capable at this moment.</i>  “Why not...;” Xu Yuan’s voice was a little weak. “Why not let the boss personally capture him?” Everyone, “...;” <i>If everything had to be done by the boss, then what use were they?</i>  Half an hour later, flashes of thunder and the sound of lightning could be heard from outside the windows. A downpour ensued, and a man in a black shirt pushed open the door, walking in directly. Chu Yu and everyone else turned around simultaneously. Although this man had a somewhat handsome appearance, his pretentious brows and eyes made it clear to everyone present that he was a person accustomed to being arrogant. Suddenly, a powerful wave of dragon pressure emanated from the black-clothed man, preventing most of the yao cultivators present from suppressing their natural instincts. Some sat while others squatted – they cut rather sorry figures. “You want to imprison me for ten years just like that?” The black-clothed man raised his chin slightly, his arrogant gaze sweeping across all the living creatures in the room. “A bunch of useless creatures.” “Sir azure dragon, even if you are the dragon deity in charge of a lake, you shouldn’t provoke our bureau,” Chu Yu was protected by the Fate of Dao, and wasn’t in too terrible a state before the might of the azure dragon. He glanced back at his fellow colleagues. Although they bickered with one another all the time, he couldn’t bear to see them being bullied by an outsider. “Even a fish dares to challenge me?” The azure dragon smiled coldly. With a wave of his arm, Chu Yu whose fighting strength was equivalent to one half of a goose, flew out and slammed into a table. The table turned over and he landed beside Zhang Ke’s feet. “Yu ge, are you all right?” Zhang Ke helped Chu Yu up from the floor. Xu Yuan and a few other human cultivators stood in front of Chu Yu – some held magic weapons while others held onto a string of talismans. A fight could break out at any moment. <i>Tap.</i>  <i>Tap.</i>  <i>Tap.</i>  At this tense moment, the sound of footsteps that were neither too fast nor too slow could be heard. Everyone in the room came to a stop and looked towards the entrance at the same time. <i>“Bang.”</i>  The door that was half-closed was pushed open and Zhuang Qing, who should have been on leave this day, appeared in front of everyone. “I was wondering how impressive the legendary Boss Zhuang is, but it turns out that you’re nothing more than a mixed-blood dragon,” The left corner of the Northern Lake azure dragon’s mouth hooked up, his voice filled with ridicule. “What bureau? All you’ve done is set up a small theatrical troupe with a few human and yao cultivators who can’t make it onto the stage. What do you think my dragon clan is?” Zhuang Qing cast a glance at the office. With a wave of his hand, all the things regained their original appearances, and even the pressure intentionally released by the azure dragon was suppressed by him. “Fifty years ago, the previous Dragon King of the Northern Lake also spoke to me in this way. After that, you became the Dragon King of the Northern Lake.” Seeing that Zhuang Qing could actually suppress his dragon power, the Northern Lake azure dragon’s expression turned somewhat ugly. “I am a dragon whose cultivation is ranked in the top ten of the azure dragon clan. I might be the Dragon King of the Northern Lake, but it’s a position beneath my status.” “Heh,” Zhuang Qing smiled. The smiling him was incomparably handsome, just like fresh flowers that bloomed amidst winter snow. Yet, all the creatures with the exception of the Northern Lake azure dragon broke into shivers. The human cultivators originally shielding Chu Yu took a few steps back, heartlessly leaving Chu Yu at his spot. Chu Yu patted his chest in an attempt to force out a mouth of blood to no avail. “I am very appreciative of confident creatures,” Zhuang Qing had acted very quickly, so quickly that everyone hadn’t yet reacted. Not long after, the abnormally arrogant Northern Lake dragon was trodden on by Zhuang Qing’s foot, unable to budge. “The previous Dragon King of the Northern Lake still has another fifty years to go before he can leave the spirit lock formation. If I only sentenced you to ten years of prison, I’m afraid the other dragon clans might lodge a complaint against me for being biased.” Zhuang Qing was expressionless as he said selflessly, “So, I’ve changed my mind. You violated the cultivation world’s management regulations by entering the bureau without permission and deliberately harmed the bureau’s employees. After adding up these crimes, the punishment will be altered to a hundred fifty years of prison and a fine of five million.” “The previous Dragon King was only sentenced to a hundred years of prison, on what basis should I be given fifty years more than him? This isn’t fair!” The Northern Lake azure dragon asked in fury. “The previous Northern Lake Dragon King was a white dragon,” Zhuang Qing commented leisurely. “The color white puts me in a good mood.” The azure dragon, “...;” Only then did he realize that he had provoked someone difficult to deal with. He gnashed his teeth in anger. “Zhuang Qing, aren’t you scared that your actions will cause my uncle to blame you?” Zhuang Qing released his foot and used spiritual qi to bind the northern lake azure dragon. He stooped and looked down at the azure dragon. “Who’s your uncle?” “You!” The azure dragon brimmed with hatred. “Zhuang Qing, are you not afraid that your conduct will cause you to be alienated by the entire dragon race?” Zhuang Qing took a piece of wet tissue from the office table to wipe his hands and shot a glance at the azure dragon. “Drag him off and lock him inside the spirit lock formation.” Zhang Ke and Old Huang were very obedient subordinates. They pulled on the azure dragon’s legs and forcibly dragged him away. “All of you...;” Only after the azure dragon was towed away did Zhuang Qing turn and look at everyone who had their heads lowered and necks shrunk back. “If you still don’t cultivate well, it’ll spread outside that my bureau doesn’t have a single person who can fight. Don’t you find that embarrassing?” No one dared to speak. “Boss, Ning Xuan and Chao Yun are still very powerful,” Xu Yuan said softly. “And with you around, how can we not have a single person who can fight?” Ning Xuan was the incarnation of an ancient famed sword whose main purpose was to slaughter; one blow could behead a thousand people. Chao Yun was an extremely pretty Feng hairpin and was the favorite item of the only female emperor in the history of China. After the death of the female emperor, the Feng hairpin transformed into a human. Having received the Fate of this regent, Chao Yun’s cultivation was very profound. In recent times, both of them had gone chasing after great yao and still hadn’t returned. If the two of them were around, they wouldn’t be this embarrassed. There was no way around it, who asked them to all be administrative workers and not military officials? Zhuang Qing stared at them for a long time before leaving silently with a displeased expression. It was necessary to recruit two people capable of fighting during this recruitment. It was fine even if their cultural achievements were a little poorer; the bureau already had enough administrative staff. “Little Fu, you’re solving problems again?” In the security guards’ restroom, Zhang Shan walked in with a lunchbox. Seeing that Fu Li was writing at a tremendous speed, he went forward and took a few looks before noiselessly shaking his head and sitting on a chair at the side. Little Fu’s passion for studying was indeed worthy of praise, but the way he wrote really couldn’t be considered nice-looking. “En,” Fu Li rubbed his dizzy head, feeling that he had wasted too many years of his life. <i>How were human heads wired to be able to think up such difficult questions?</i>  The elderly man mopping the floor at the side drifted over and looked at the questions. Then, he continued bending his waist and mopping the floor. “Isn’t the answer to this question 86.957?” “Really?” Fu Li looked in amazement at the elderly man who was mopping the floor. When he flipped to the attached answer sheet at the back of the book, the correct answer really was 86.957. “This is just a simple question on probability. Although numbers appear complicated, the solving process is not difficult,” He patted Fu Li on the shoulder. “Young man, continue working hard.” <i>Although from the way Fu Li looked, he didn’t seem like someone who could enter university by self-studying. However, his spirit was laudable.</i>  Fu Li watched the elderly man’s back as he slowly made his way out of the rest room. Once again, he had witnessed humanity’s intelligence and greatness. Their status as the most intelligent of all living creatures had not occurred by chance. Rather, it was inevitable. “Scared?” Zhang Shan laughed. “That elderly man was once a math teacher in a reputable high school. He has been working for many years after retirement. According to him, his memory isn’t very good now and he’s afraid of holding the students back, so he came here to search for something to do.” “Why does he still want to go out and do something?” Fu Li couldn’t understand. “Isn’t the retirement pay for teachers said to be quite good?” “This uncle has a good heart and couldn’t stay idle. It was said that he provided financial aid to multiple poor students living in the mountains,” Zhang Shan opened his lunchbox and shook his head. “I’m not very clear on this either, but this uncle’s character is very good. If you don’t understand anything, you can ask him. It’ll still be better than scratching your head on your own and making wrong guesses.” Fu Li looked towards the entrance. The elderly man was mopping the corridor outside, seemingly in great spirits. A long while later, Fu Li’s brows furrowed slightly. T/N: You’re not the only one FL, sometimes I wonder whether my head’s screwed on right as well...; “Uncle, let me help you carry that,” When Fu Li got off work, he saw the scholarly, learned, and reserved cleaner uncle with a mop in his left hand and a cleaning bucket in his right hand. Concerned that he would trip and fall, Fu Li went up and helped him to carry the cleaning bucket. “Thank you, young man,” The uncle flashed a grateful smile at Fu Li. “You’re that newbie Little Fu?” “Yup,” Fu Li nodded. After helping the uncle to place the cleaning tools in the room for miscellaneous items, the two people walked to the main entrance only to realize that it was still raining outside. “It was still okay just now, how did such heavy rain come about in the short time that passed?” The uncle commented and then turned around, heading back in. Fu Li glanced up at the sky. Not too long later, he saw the uncle coming back out with an old umbrella. “Teacher Yao, you’re rushing back even when the rain’s this heavy?” “The cat at home is still waiting for me to return,” The uncle responded with a chuckle, his manner extremely kindly. “Teacher Yao,” Fu Li saw that the uncle was about to walk out into the rain and called after him. “I didn’t bring an umbrella, let’s squeeze together.” “Sure,” Teacher Yao turned again and walked to the entrance. “Quick, come over. Don’t get wet.” Fu Li squeezed under the umbrella and matched Teacher Yao’s pace as they walked slowly. Teacher Yao smiled and asked, “I heard you’re self-studying. Are you preparing to enter university?” Fu Li nodded. “It’s good to love studying. Being human means living till old age and learning till old age,” The smile on Teacher Yao’s face grew even gentler. The two people had to cross an overhead bridge; Fu Li extended a hand and supported the elderly man. Teacher Yao looked down at his arm that was being supported and smiled. “Youngsters who don’t voice their kind intentions will lose out.” “You saw that the rain was too heavy and couldn’t feel at ease about an old man walking alone outside, so you said that you didn’t bring an umbrella, right?” Teacher Yao patted Fu Li’s arm. “If you chase after a girl in the future, don’t ever do this. If the other party doesn’t know how good you are to her, won’t your thoughts go to waste?” Fu Li didn’t understand. <i>Why did he have to let others know about the things he did?</i><i>It was merely a matter of raising a hand, was it necessary? Besides, didn’t the human world think highly of Lei Feng’s spirit of committing good deeds without claiming credit?</i>  <i>But this aged human was a teacher. His words...; shouldn’t be wrong?</i>  Teacher Yao knew from Fu Li’s blank expression that this youngster hadn’t understood him clearly from the start, nor had he ever liked anyone. Otherwise, he certainly wouldn’t show this sort of nonchalant demeanor. Teacher Yao simply placed an arm on Fu Li’s arm. “The rain is very heavy today; have a meal at my place this afternoon before going back.” “Okay,” Fu Li, who still didn’t know about the artificial courtesies of the human world, didn’t even decline and instead directly accepted Teacher Yao’s invitation. Teacher Yao’s house wasn’t very far. The neighborhood was just a bit on the old side and the building lacked a lift. Uncle Yao lived on the fourth floor and needed to climb up the stairs floor by floor. The already-peeling metal door appeared a little shabby but had been cleaned very well. Teacher Yao retrieved the keys tied at his waist and opened the door to a tiny shaggy creature which walked out from behind the door meowing. It was a very fat cat, so fat that it resembled a ball. Seeing the unfamiliar Fu Li behind Teacher Yao, the fat cat’s cries grew a few notches higher. After circling Fu Li’s feet, it revealed its belly and lay down in front of Teacher Yao. “Aiyo, our family’s Tuan Tuan is hungry. Grandpa will immediately make you something to eat.” Teacher Yao placated the fat cat before telling Fu Li, “Little Fu, make yourself comfortable. I’ll get some food for my family’s Tuan Tuan.” “All right,” Fu Li glanced down at the cat who was rolling around on the floor. He walked over to the old-fashioned sofa and sat down. A fruit dish was placed on the tea table, completely empty with the exception of a few blackening bananas. Many photos and prize certificates were hung on the wall. A photo displayed in the center depicted Teacher Yao with a woman. Yet, Fu Li realized that the house contained the smell of only Teacher Yao and no other humans. “Meow,” The fat cat jumped onto the tea table. Its round eyes stared at Fu Li, seemingly inspecting him. Fu Li lowered his head and their gazes met. Reaching out a hand, he rubbed the fur on its head. The fat cat...; fat cat realized in despair that it couldn’t move and could only be touched all over by this human as if it was a furry ball. “Don’t worry, I’m a colleague of your owner. I won’t harm him.” “Meow!” <i>That’s my servant, not owner.</i>  “Little Fu, have a glass of water,” Teacher Yao carried a bowl of cat food out and poured a glass of water for Fu Li. “Have a seat first, I’ll make lunch.” Fu Li saw the spots and wrinkles on the back of this human’s hand. He stood up and said, “Teacher Yao, allow me to learn how to cook from you.” “Sure,” Teacher Yao nodded. “It’s good for youngsters to know how to cook. The girls nowadays are career-minded and the majority of them aren’t able to cook. It would be a bonus for a boy to know how to cook when pursuing a girl.” Fu Li listened to Teacher Yao’s nagging and couldn’t help thinking in his heart that humans really did place a lot of importance on reproduction. In order to be in the woman’s good graces, they were willing to do anything. While the two people ate, the fat-as-a-ball cat lay on Teacher Yao’s knee and acted coquettishly, even revealing its belly from time to time. Fu Li watched the fat cat’s tiny swinging tail and lowered his head, continuing to dig into his food. After the meal, Fu Li helped Teacher Yao to tidy up the kitchen. Just as he was preparing to leave, Teacher Yao gifted him a pile of studying-related books and notebooks. “These are the reference books and materials that the school often used when I was still a teacher. The notebooks contain some of my teaching notes. Bring it back and have a look through it, it might be of help to you,” Teacher Yao touched the sides of the books fondly. These books were very old, yet very clean. “Thank you,” Fu Li accepted the books and thanked Teacher Yao seriously. “I have no use for these books even if I keep them. Their greatest value lies in the knowledge you glean from them,” Teacher Yao’s smile was kindly. He looked at Fu Li as if he was looking at the cleverest younger generation. After this incident, Fu Li frequently sent Teacher Yao home. Occasionally, he would even drop in with some fruits and vegetables. Every time he appeared to freeload a meal, Teacher Yao would be very happy. He would speak about studying methods, his deceased wife, how capable his former students were, and the contributions he had made to the country. Whenever Teacher Yao spoke, Fu Li would listen to him very seriously. He would rub the fat cat’s head occasionally, inciting a few meows from the cat. Until one morning when he encountered the lazy and gluttonous fat cat at the main entrance of the hotel. His cries were mournful and anxious, as if something major had happened. Fu Li couldn’t wait any longer for the colleague who was working the next shift and ran with the fat cat to Teacher Yao’s house. If someone had observed him carefully, they would have realized that the speed at which Fu Li was running had already exceeded a sprinting champion. However, people were just that busy; who would care why someone else was running and how fast they were running? Teacher Yao had passed away. Despite the fact that Fu Li had secretly placed a Peace Branch in his house, it still hadn’t altered his fate. If Yama wanted someone to die at midnight, that person wouldn’t be alive at 3am. Teacher Yao didn’t have children and his family members had already passed away more than ten years ago. He had aided many impoverished children financially in his years, so apart from a house’s worth of books and this shabby house, he hadn’t left much behind. In accordance with Teacher Yao’s will, the house would be sold off by the relevant department and the money would be donated to Project Hope, while all the books would be donated to school libraries. Many people came to the funeral – the children Teacher Yao had helped financially, their parents, as well as the students he had taught. These people wept sorrowful tears. Teacher Yao may not have had children, but his funeral wasn’t the least bit cold or cheerless. The cat Teacher Yao was raising wanted to enter the funeral hall as well but was chased out because traditional social customs dictated that cats could not be present at human funerals. Fu Li stood at a corner, looking at the thin cat whose coat of fur was in a mess. He squatted down. “You’re just a cat who hasn’t cultivated a human form.” The scent of joss paper drifted out from the funeral hall. Teacher Yao walked out in a black shirt and pants. The one leading him forward was the yinchai called Wang Zhen. For some reason, Fu Li couldn’t stop himself from taking a few steps forward, blocking the way of the yinchai. “Cultivator, every human has their own fate. It cannot be changed by anyone,” Wang Zhen saw that it was Fu Li who had stepped forward, and his tone of voice lightened a little. “Forcefully changing a human’s fate will only harm the human’s virtue in his following lives. There is no benefit to him.” Fu Li was silent for a moment. He said in a somewhat downcast voice, “I know human destiny can be changed, but fate can’t.” He looked up at the benevolent and kindly Teacher Yao. “I wish you a smooth trip.” One’s fate was determined by the Heavens and could not be changed. Nobody under these skies could do as they wished. Teacher Yao didn’t seem to have expected Fu Li to be able to see him. After a few seconds of astonishment, he revealed a smile. “Meow,” The cat walked over on its short legs and waved its shaggy tail at Teacher Yao. “Little Fu, please help me take care of him,” Teacher Yao crouched down, wanting to touch the cat’s tiny belly, yet his hand passed through its body. “Meow~” The cat appeared unaware. Just like the past, it rubbed against Teacher Yao’s palm and rolled over on the ground. Teacher Yao laughed and stood up, speaking to Wang Zhen, “Let’s go. It’s also time for me to find my family’s wife. I made her wait alone below for so many years; I’ll definitely be scolded later when I see her.” Fu Li’s gaze followed after Teacher Yao and the yinchai as they departed. He glanced down at his chest. <i>That area didn’t seem very happy.</i>  But he had already done his best. It was just that the Heavens determined human fate, so the Peace Branch could not save Teacher Yao’s life. <i>Then why was he unhappy? Could he have interacted with too many humans and acquired their flawed tendency to be unreasonable?</i>  Zhuang Qing was in the middle of reviewing the exam questions for the recruitment three days later. When he heard that Fu Li had come searching for him, a guess surfaced in his mind: <i>Could he be here to enter by the back door and request for the exam questions?</i>  <i>That person shouldn’t even think about it. He wasn’t such a dragon. It was a shameful thing to cheat in an exam.</i>  But when the two people sat face to face, Zhuang Qing realized that he had truly thought too simply. “Mr Zhuang,” Fu Li looked at the mixed-blood, golden dragon seated behind the computer whose imposing presence exerted a sense of pressure. A sincere smile appeared on Fu Li’s face. “Can I borrow two hundred thousand yuan from you?” “What?!” Zhuang Qing suspected that something had gone wrong with his ears. <i>T/N: Thank you to Remember and Casey for helping to edit this chapter~</i>  Fu Li didn’t hear the rejection in Zhuang Qing’s voice and thought that he hadn’t heard the amount clearly. “Two hundred thousand.” Zhuang Qing was silent. He looked at Fu Li like he was watching a preposterous television drama. “I don’t know many yao. The mallard said he doesn’t have money, while the other is locked inside your bureau,” Fu Li held up the paper cup and drank a mouth of plain water. “You have the most money among the yao I know.” Zhuang Qing: <i>So, where did you get the false impression that I would lend you money?</i>  “Actually, I’m a yao who doesn’t like borrowing things from others,” Fu Li smiled with embarrassment. Zhuang Qing picked up his teacup and drank a mouth of tea. <i>Then it’ll be better for you to not force yourself to do something you dislike.</i>  “I got to know a very good human this month,” The smile on Fu Li’s face dimmed. “He passed away a few days ago.” “Humans will always succumb to death. That is the nature of their life cycle.” The indifference on Zhuang Qing’s face lessened a little. He placed the teacup down and said, “Don’t grieve too much.” “I’m not sad,” Fu Li raised his head and directed a smile towards him. “Still, thank you.” Faced with Fu Li’s pitch-black eyes, Zhuang Qing felt an inexpressible discomfort. He shifted his line of sight away from him. “You’re just one yaoguai, what do you want with so much money?” The amount was too little for the purposes of marriage or house-purchasing but was too much for meals or clothing. “I heard from the cat raised by the human that he once mentioned wanting to be buried with his deceased wife. But later on, he donated his savings to a severely ill child, so there isn’t enough money now for a couples’ grave.” Fu Li pursed his lips and continued speaking, “The relevant department heard of his past deeds and prepared a grave for them. I’ve already taken a look at the grave. If the couple were to be buried there, there would be no chance for them to be husband and wife again in their next life.” “So you intend to dip into your pockets and buy a grave for them?” Zhuang Qing realized that he didn’t understand this yaoguai. He seemed to occasionally place great importance on money, yet didn’t seem to regard money as important when it came to spending it. After pondering over it, he could only say that this yaoguai had interacted with too small a number of humans, so he viewed this world too simply and optimistically. “Mr Fu, it isn’t easy to earn money now either. Our bureau often does overtime, the higher-ups don’t always reimburse us for travel expenses, and there are times when our wages are delayed...;” “Mr Zhuang, I understand what you mean,” Fu Li’s expression was grave. Zhuang Qing’s expression lightened. <i>It was good if he could understand his tactful rejection</i>. “I’ll go over to Mr Chu Yu later and retrieve my recruitment form,” Mr Fu sighed. “How could wages be delayed?” <i>Did this yao understand dragon speech? Was he deliberately feigning stupidity?</i>  Zhuang Qing took a deep breath in his heart. “I meant to say that I didn’t...;” “Boss!” Chu Yu pushed open the door and entered, a hint of anxiety in his voice. “A few azure dragons barged in!” “Don’t panic.” Zhuang Qing stood up and told Chu Yu, “I’ll go over.” Zhuang Qing’s legs were very long. He left the office within a few steps. “Wait,” Fu Li stopped Chu Yu. “Did you say azure dragon?” Facing the savior of his life, Chu Yu’s attitude couldn’t be any better. “Benefactor, you might not be aware of this, but the dragon race has always been arrogant with their conduct, especially the azure dragon clan. Last year, a few humans went missing around the Northern Lake. They had clearly been devoured as food by the Northern Lake azure dragons, yet the dragon race covered it up, preventing any evidence from being found at the site. Apart from imposing an insignificant punishment on them, we could only let this matter go.” “This time, the Dragon Lord of the Northern Lake came knocking on impulse, injured our colleagues, and even resisted the penalty. Boss finally has a reason to lock the Dragon Lord of the Northern Lake in the spirit lock formation,” Chu Yu smiled bitterly. “But you’ve seen the situation in reality – the Dragon Lord of the Northern Lake hasn’t even been imprisoned for a month, but the azure dragon clan has already come knocking.” “Are their actions considered an attack against police?” Fu Li wrinkled his brows. Chu Yu stared blankly for a moment before nodding. “P-probably?” “How can they carry out this sort of unlawful behavior?” Fu Li’s wrinkled his brows till they almost formed a knot. “Not only are your wages so low, they’re even delayed now and then. Despite the harsh conditions, all of you still persist in safeguarding the order of the cultivation world. Even then, there are still yao who give all of you trouble. These yao really lack character.” “Not exactly. No. Not right...;” <i>Their management bureau had very good benefits, since when had their wages been delayed? If they were really so miserable, why would there be so many human, yao, and ghost cultivators who came running to snatch a position?</i>  <i>What exactly had caused his benefactor to have the misconception that they were destitute?</i>  The several azure dragons who had arrived were seniors of the azure dragon clan. Their human forms were dignified and upright and their behavior was also a lot more staid. After arriving at the bureau, they didn’t start fighting at the first sign of dispute. However, the fact that they were seated there was already enough to induce feelings of reverence. The oldest azure dragon among this group was called Qing Yan. He differed from the other few azure dragons, because not only was there a smile on his face, he had also restrained his Dragon Might. Upon seeing Zhuang Qing appear, he placed down the teacup in his hand and stood up, saluting him. “Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing.” Despite the fact that Zhuang Qing did not control any ocean or lake and was a mixed-blood dragon, he had joined with the nation’s fate, so it was not too much for him to be given the respected title of Dragon Lord. However, other than Qing Yan, the other Dragon Lords present all displayed extremely haughty attitudes. Clearly, they didn’t attach any importance to Zhuang Qing, the golden dragon whose bloodline had been tainted with human blood. “Dragon Lord Qing Yan,” Zhuang Qing returned his salute. His gaze swept calmly across the several azure dragons. “I’m unsure what matters these sirs have for coming to my bureau?” “Zhuang Qing, I heard you used your authority for personal motives and locked my dragon clan’s younger generation in your bureau?” An old man looked at Zhuang Qing with a dignified look. “I know that there were disagreements between you and the dragon clan in earlier years, but don’t think that you can act as you please just because you’re the head of the bureau.” “The Dragon Lord of the Northern Lake violated the rules by causing hail to descend. Countless vehicles were damaged, and the humans who were injured at that time are still lying in the hospital today recuperating. The losses to the crops in the suburbs were even greater,” Zhuang Qing’s gaze turned icy. “To your dragon clan, hail might only be a carefree act after the passing of anger, but to many farmers, the destroyed crops are worth one year’s income.” The old man’s expression underwent a subtle change. He immediately responded, “Even then, you shouldn’t imprison him for a hundred and fifty years!” “According to the regulations of the cultivation world, any yao cultivator who harms the common people will be sentenced to ten to fifty years of imprisonment. If they refuse to accept the punishment and even attack the bureau, they can be imprisoned for a hundred to a thousand years,” Zhuang Qing didn’t back down at all in the face of the old man’s might. “Elder Qing Yuan, this length of time is already a light sentence. If these Sirs are dissatisfied with anything, you may proceed to the Yao Union and file a complaint according to the usual procedures. This Zhuang will not have any objections.” “You!” Elder Qing Yuan’s expression turned even uglier. The Yao Union wasn’t on good terms with their dragon clan. If they were to seek them out, the Yao Union would definitely be on the bureau’s side. “Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing, I don’t seem to see any injured people in your bureau, why don’t all of us take a step back?” Qing Yan spoke up with a smile on his face. “The Dragon Lord of the Northern Lake has committed an offence. We will definitely bring him back and educate him well. As for the fine, we are willing to double the compensation for the losses suffered by the humans. Would this be enough for you to release him from the spirit lock formation?” It was difficult for the dragon clan to have heirs. After adding up all the dragon clans, their numbers didn’t even reach fifty. How could they bear to have a younger generation imprisoned in the spirit lock formation for a hundred and fifty years? “Dragon Lord Qing Yan, not everything can be resolved with money,” Zhuang Qing didn’t back down. “If everyone could behave without the slightest scruple just because they had money, this world would not have a heavenly law, much less rules.” The smile on Qing Yan’s face faded. “It looks like Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing is unwilling to give our azure dragon clan this face.” “My apologies, this Zhuang abides by the management bureau’s rules and regulations,” The hand behind Zhuang Qing’s back curved slightly. Faint dragon scales flashed on his wrist. The atmosphere in the room immediately heated up. <i>Bang bang bang.</i>  Knocks sounded on the door. Everyone in the room looked towards the door simultaneously, wanting to know which creature who wasn’t right in the head wanted to deliver themselves to the firing squad at this time. “Sorry to disturb,” A head stretched in from outside the door. This person had shaggy hair, neat brows, and red lips. It was an extremely good-looking human face. T/N: If you guys haven’t heard, rainbowturtle is holding a fanfiction and fanart event for all their novels translated on CG! Do check out the event details here. Seeing that it was Fu Li who had opened the door, Zhang Ke put his all into signaling him with his eyes, so as to prevent him from entering at this moment. Benefactor Fu Li had not only saved his life but had even given him the yao-beating whip; he should not be dragged into this complicated and messy fight when the current situation was of mutual hostility. However, Fu Li didn’t seem to have understood why the corner of his eyes was twitching. He directly pushed open the door and walked in. On top of that, he ignored the several azure dragons who were continuously emanating Dragon Might and spoke to Zhang Ke, “I came to retrieve my application form.” “Wh-What application form?” The moment Zhang Ke opened his mouth, he felt the gazes of every living creature in the room landing on him. “Your bureau’s recruitment application form,” Fu Li wanted to get closer to the office table. Seeing that an old dragon was blocking his way, he said, “Grandpa, shift a little to the side, you’re blocking my way.” Chu Yu, who had followed Fu Li in, shrank his neck back and did his best to conceal himself behind Xu Yuan. In a soft voice, he said, “Benefactor, come over here.” Although he didn’t know how high his benefactor’s cultivation was, it wouldn’t be at all wise to take on four dragons with one of him. Qing Yuan looked up and silently glanced at Fu Li without moving. Fu Li looked at him with a lowered head as he waited for Qing Yuan to shift his chair. Qing Yuan didn’t move. Neither did Fu Li. Their eyes met – it was a silent confrontation. All of a sudden, Zhuang Qing extended an arm from his position at the side. With exceptional speed, he pulled Fu Li behind him. The palm of his other hand stretched out, receiving the Northern Icy Palm that Qing Yuan had suddenly attacked them with. Faint blue light radiated from the ice at the point at which their palms met. <i>Sh*t!</i>  Zhang Ke nearly broke out into cold sweat from the fright. The azure dragon clan was also too treacherous in the way they made a move the instant there was a disagreement. There was practically no leeway for others to defend. “Elder Qing Yuan’s habit hasn’t changed even after many years,” Zhuang Qing stood protectively in front of Fu Li, not yielding the slightest bit. “It’s admirable.” “I was educating the rude younger generation on some of the rules, yet you want to protect him?” Seeing that his strike hadn’t hit the mark, Qing Yuan withdrew his hand. “Your management bureau really doesn’t have any capable people, even recruiting this sort of little yao to be protected. It looks like you haven’t had it easy after leaving our dragon clan.” <i>F*ck, this shot was a little too big.</i> Zhang Ke cursed darkly in his heart and turned to look at Chu Yu, Lin Gui, and the aquatic yao cultivators. Their expressions didn’t seem particularly great either. “No matter whether they are human or yao, as long as they live on this earth, I will protect them,” Zhuang Qing looked at the few azure dragons who displayed casual stances, but in fact was on guard. “I never belonged to the dragon clan, so there is no need to say things like ‘leaving the dragon clan’. The dragon clan’s lineage is an honorable one. I, Zhuang Qing, will not claim to have such connections.” Fu Li revealed a slightly sympathetic look from where he was standing behind Zhuang Qing, very tightly protected. It appeared that this mixed-blood dragon had not only been bullied by his fellow clanmates in his early years but had also been bullied quite severely. “How can Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing say such a thing? Your bloodline may not be pure, but you are still considered a part of our dragon race,” Qing Yan smiled. “According to reason, you are the only descendant of the golden dragon clan. I shouldn’t be saying so much, but you are now the only remaining member of the golden dragon clan. I’m from the same generation as you, and the only thing I have more than you is an extra thousand years of age. As a result, I can only educate you on seniority in the dragon race on behalf of the elders of the golden dragon clan.” “Among the seven dragon colors, the golden dragon has seniority. You’re an azure dragon, how do you have the qualifications to teach a golden dragon the rules?” Fu Li stretched out his head from behind Zhuang Qing, looking entirely like a little yao who spoke freely and without any qualms after obtaining the support of Zhuang Qing. “Golden-Red-Purple-White-Black-Blue-Azure. You guys are ranked last. Isn’t it a joke for someone ranked last in the class to be teaching the top student how to solve problems?” Everyone in the room was astounded. <i>Why hadn’t they heard of such a ranking in the dragon clan?</i> The human cultivators stole looks at the only aquatic yao cultivator in the room, Lin Gui. Lin Gui shook his head slightly; he wasn’t clear on the levels of seniority in the dragon clan. “Rubbish!” A younger azure dragon responded with fury. “In the entire dragon clan, my azure dragon clan has the most heirs. Most of China’s drainage system is under my azure dragon clan’s control, yet you claim that my azure dragon clan is right at the bottom?!” Fu Li was somewhat unconvinced. He tugged on the back of Zhuang Qing’s shirt. “Are his words true?” Zhuang Qing nodded wordlessly. Fu Li, “That would truly be a case of ‘eastern river for three millennium, western river for three millennium’. A few thousand years ago, your golden dragon clan was the most well-regarded, most powerful, and was worshiped by emperors for many generations. King Ganglie told us that ‘monarchs change like water, but the golden dragons are as unshakable as iron’. With such good cards in your clan’s hands, how did things turn out this way?” Zhuang Qing, “...;” <i>Was this the right time to look down on their golden dragon clan’s low birth rate?</i>  The two younger azure dragons were in a towering rage, but Qing Yuan and Qing Yan revealed somewhat grave expressions. The golden dragon clan had indeed been the most illustrious several thousand years ago. However, a great calamity had occurred at the seabed more than two thousand years ago, resulting in the burial of many members of the dragon race at the bottom of the ocean. The weakest azure dragon clan had the greatest survival rate. 1900 years ago, the azure dragon clan also suffered a huge attack, leading to the passing of many of their elders. The only surviving elder had hidden in the dragon palace for the past few years, never once seeing visitors. Because of their high survival rates, nobody had used this incident to mock them. In the past few years, the azure dragon clan had relied on their numbers to gain influence and was already gradually seizing the right to speak among the dragon clans. Few cultivators this day knew that the azure dragons were once ranked at the bottom of the dragon clan. Yaoguai with this knowledge also shunned the world and would not be interested in others’ business. <i>This little yao Zhuang Qing was protecting actually knew of such dated affairs, who exactly was he?</i>  They were not afraid of offending this kind of little yao. What they feared was offending the elder of the little one – a great yao who shunned the world. An ancestral rule had been passed down in the azure dragon clan two thousand years ago, warning against rashly provoking yaoguai who appeared ordinary yet had immense courage. Qing Yan smiled and cupped his hands at Fu Li. “I’m not sure which senior this daoyou studies under? As a younger generation, it is only right for this humble one to pay respects.” Fu Li ignored this azure dragon who appeared rather good looking when he smiled, and shrank his head behind Zhuang Qing once again. His attitude made it clear that he would handle the meaningless chatting, while Zhuang Qing would handle the fighting. “Step back a bit,” Zhuang Qing noticed that the four azure dragons were already standing at all four directions. He transmitted his voice to Fu Li, “I will lure them out of the bureau later, you stay with Chu Yu. Chu Yu has the protection of the Fate of Dao; cultivators won’t dare to take his life.” “No, isn’t the society of today a lawful one? Why must fights break out the moment there is a disagreement?” Fu Li asked. “Is it considered illegal for an ordinary yao like me to fight?” “You’re still in the leisurely mood to say that to me at this juncture? Quickly hide somewhere. For every day you have proof of being a moral yao, our management bureau will protect you for that day,” Zhuang Qing easily picked Fu Li up and flung him over to Chu Yu’s side. Turning, he spoke to the four azure dragons, “This isn’t a place for conversation, how about switching to another place?” Qing Yuan didn’t speak and only looked at Qing Yan. With a smile like the spring wind, Qing Yan turned and shot a glance at Fu Li who was standing beside Chu Yu. Raising a hand, he made a ‘please’ gesture. “Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing, please.” At four o’clock in the afternoon, passersby had to find areas to avoid a thunderstorm. At one market crammed with many people hiding from the rain, everyone was spiritedly discussing the recent weather. “Who knows what’s been going on lately? Thunder and hailstones are occurring at the drop of a hat.” “The weather forecast hasn’t been accurate even once.” “Who knows? Some dragon lord might be fighting, and we have to join in the suffering as well.” “If dragons really exist, shouldn’t we quickly make a wish? Our wishes might really come true.” A pretty woman in a red skirt and thin heels was slowly walking in the rain, holding up a traditional umbrella with a picture of a court lady on it. Despite the heavy rain, even the back of her shoes was not dampened. The man walking beside her was wearing a black t-shirt. Even his umbrella – a black and grey checkered cloth umbrella – lacked any sense of aesthetics. Both people seemed to have come from two separate worlds, yet the image of them standing together didn’t seem very out-of-the-ordinary. “The rain is a bit heavy,” Chao Yun stretched out a hand, catching a few droplets of rain. The sparkling, translucent droplets of rain slid down her fingers before she flung them off. “An expert seems to have erected a barrier up there.” On certain occasions when cultivators wanted to resolve issues using force yet feared being discovered by ordinary humans, they would erect a barrier and fight in the sky. “En,” Ning Xuan glanced up. Suddenly, his footsteps came to a halt and he glanced around their surroundings. “I seem to have sensed something.” “What?” Chao Yun was somewhat interested. Ning Xuan didn’t answer her. Turning, he walked towards a tiny neighborhood. After a moment of hesitation, Chao Yun followed after him. There was no trace of human qi in the chilly house. A cat lay on the sofa in the living room. Seeing them enter, it let out a cry. “Hush,” Chao Yun spoke to the cat. “We’re from the cultivation management bureau; we mean no harm.” Although this cat couldn’t transform into its human form, it had already cultivated divine consciousness and was even aware of the management bureau’s existence. It could not be considered an ordinary animal. Sure enough, after she uttered this statement, the cat stopped calling out and merely opened its round eyes, monitoring their every movement. “Found it,” Ning Xuan picked up an object the size of a fingernail from the bottom of the table. Appearance-wise, it looked like trash that had been casually dropped onto the floor. “What is this?” Chao Yun could smell a mysterious scent from the fingernail-like object. The scent appeared to be capable of soothing one’s mind as well as cleansing one of despondent qi. However, the object very quickly dispersed into nothingness in Ning Xuan’s hand. In the end, not even a speck of ash remained. “I once heard of a rumor. Someone mastered the Art of Slaughtering Dragons and eliminated evil dragons in the western sea. The dragon horns obtained from them were then used to create incense that could ward off calamities and illness, but would disperse when in contact with metal,” Ning Xuan’s original form was an ancient famed sword, so such things would swiftly disappear when in his hands. “This sort of thing was originally called the Dragon Horn Fragrance. But for some reason – perhaps it was to prevent incurring the dissatisfaction of the dragon clan – its name was later changed to Peace Branch.” “Grinding dragon horns to create incense?” Chao Yun felt that such a thing was a little absurd. <i>How sturdy was a dragon horn? How could someone be capable of grinding it into powder?</i>  “There is another saying – burning incense that was created from a base of dragon horns and scales can illuminate the road to life for souls of the deceased who have yet to be reincarnated, as well as bless the departed spirit for a peaceful next life. That’s why it’s called the Peace Branch.” Chao Yun was struck dumb by this sort of saying. Only after a long while did she ask, “How did you get to know of such secret matters?” “I read it in a novel on cultivating to immortality,” Ning Xuan clapped his hands. With his solemn face, he didn’t seem at all like someone addicted to novels. “The scent of this thing is quite special though. For all we know, this might be a Peace Branch.” Chao Yun sneered. She just knew all this was nonsense. Aware that Chao Yun was mocking him for indulging in his fantasies, Ning Xuan coughed dryly. “Let’s bring this cat to the Yao Union to be registered, in case he’s mistaken as an evil yao and brought away.” Heavy rain was pouring from the skies. At the Yao Union that had the sign ‘Nurturing and Relaxation Club for Elderly’ hanging from its door, it was a rare moment where no one had come over to play mahjong or cards. The only people inside was the plump elderly man and his few assistants. Just as Ning Xuan and Chao Yun entered, they heard the plump elderly man complaining to his assistants. “I don’t know if it’s a matter of race, but it’s been thousands upon thousands of years, yet the dragon clan still hasn’t gotten rid of their damned habit of provoking people and picking fights. One moment it’s thundering and the next moment it’s raining. How can anyone go out like that?” Ning Xuan and Chao Yun’s gazes met. It turned out the dragon clan was fighting. If that was the case, it was no wonder that the battle array was so large. “Meow,” The cat’s vitality was a little on the low side. As the old man was registering the cat, he suddenly reached out a hand and tapped its forehead. “Fate binds all things. Since your fate with the human has been cut off, don’t continue to hold on to it. Cultivation is not easy. It is your good fortune that you were able to gain intelligence. If you cultivate well, you might be able to meet him in his next life.” “Meow,” The cat shook its head. This life and the next life were two different things. One might appear to have the same soul in both lives, yet the appearance, way of thinking, and personality had all changed. How could they be the same person? Fate could only be cultivated in this life; one could not hope for it in the next life. Excessive attachment was a sin. “It seems you understand,” The elderly man passed the moral yao identification to the cat. The cat extended its tongue and swallowed the identification into its stomach. “Many thanks to these two for taking the trouble to bring him here. For the time being, this cat won’t be able to transform, so our Yao Union will arrange a place for him to stay at and cultivate,” The plump elderly man waved his worn-out fan, making a ‘please’ motion towards the door. Chao Yun and Ning Xuan saluted, turned, and left the Yao Union. Ever since entering the management bureau, they were no longer just members of the Yao Union, but represented the interests of the entire cultivation world. Therefore, having too intimate a relationship with the Yao Union would very likely breed misunderstandings among the human cultivators. “Benefactor, they’ve been fighting for almost two hours,” Chu Yu lay slumped on the windowsill as he gazed up at the sky. “The azure dragon clan is fighting four against one, I’m worried that Boss will be at a huge disadvantage.” Fu Li looked at the entire roomful of people who only knew how to look up but didn’t dare to go forward and help. He couldn’t help asking, “You have so many people, why don’t you guys go help?” Everyone stared blankly. They had long since grown accustomed to the Boss’ omnipotence these few years. This was the first time someone asked them to render help together. “It’s a fight after all, it’s all about the numbers,” Fu Li felt that the cultivators in this age simply had too little knowledge and experience. “Even if all of you aren’t a match for the dragon clan, just standing there will create apprehension in their hearts. In the past when King Ganglie vied for the mountain with other yao, even our mountain’s little birds who haven’t transformed will go and cheer for him. The more people there are, the more imposing it’ll seem – this is the most basic rule of a group fight.” Chu Yu could not imagine the kind of grand occasion where yaoguai covered the mountains and plains, nor could he understand the effort that yao cultivators back then had to put into snatching territory. He looked up at the sky and imagined the fierce battle taking place up there. Fear of the dragon clan’s imposing manner once again rose within him – this was the instinctual fear that was carved into his body. “Th-then have you guys fought with dragons before?” Chu Yu licked the slightly dry corners of his lips. Both his hands were clenched into fists. His heart was on the edges of a tough struggle. “Yes,” Fu Li looked up at the foggy layers of clouds, the tone of his voice wavering a little. “Did you win?” Fu Li turned and glanced at Chu Yu before continuing to look up at the sky. “Probably?” Thunder boomed. The lightning that seemed to rip through the entire sky was shockingly bright, sending a stabbing pain through Fu Li’s eyes. He turned to look at Chu Yu, “Does your boss like to use thunderbolts and lightning while fighting?” Chu Yu shook his head. “Our boss is a bit more lowkey, he never does such garish tricks.” “Understood,” Fu Li nodded. With a flash, he streaked towards the sky like a gale. “Wait!” Chu Yu yelled loudly. “Benefactor, don’t throw your life away!” He circled the spot twice before gritting his teeth and taking out his magic weapon. Standing on it, he flew towards the sky. “Wait for me,” Zhang Ke took out a retractable sword from an office drawer, stood on it, and flew out. “It’s a fight between the dragon race, going there is just asking to die,” Xu Yuan berated as she took off the silver bracelet on her hand. The silver bracelet morphed into a small boat. With a flip, she leapt onto the small boat and swiftly chased after them. “F*ck, stop bullsh*tting, let’s teach those guys a lesson.” Countless magic weapons were taken out – bamboo flutes, writing brushes, tortoise shells, and even bird feathers. For a moment, splendid rays of light filled the room. As everyone knew, for every hundred meters above sea level, the temperature would drop 0.6 degrees Celsius. Xu Yuan’s first thought upon flying up was that she was wearing too few clothes on this day. In the distance, she could see the currently roiling smell of gunpowder among the five people enclosed by the barrier. They couldn’t even push past the barrier, much less enter and help. Xu Yuan turned and spoke to her colleagues who had caught up to her. “Everyone, take care to hide yourself. Don’t be found by the radars, and even more importantly, don’t affect the flight path of the airplanes.” “Benefactor, don’t go over, there’s a...;.” Chu Yu stared blankly as he watched Fu Li squeeze past the barrier. He muttered the last word, “Barrier.” “Do you guys want to come in and play?” Fu Li propped up the opening in the barrier and turned to beckon towards Chu Yu and the rest. Chu Yu and the rest of the living creatures looked at the glistening flickers of light inside and simultaneously shook their heads, taking a step back. Fu Li glanced at the situation inside the barrier and decided to give up. “Forget it, you guys had better not come in.” With such low cultivation, it was enough to just stand outside and watch the show. He really hadn’t expected the cultivation world to have declined so rapidly. Great yao were everywhere during those years, yet now, even he was considered a great yao. Upon entering the barrier, killing intent and Dragon Might shot towards him. The two younger azure dragons were already wounded and were seated at a corner nursing their wounds. Seeing Fu Li enter the barrier, their eyes widened, seemingly in disbelief that someone could actually tear apart the barrier that their dragon clan had erected. “I know your dragon race has large eyes, stop staring,” Fu Li used a technique to fix the two dragons in place and then walked over and sat down between them. The soft clouds had a moist and ice-cold feel to them. “Who do you think will win?” The two azure dragons who couldn’t speak, “...;” “Aiya. The way your dragon clan fights is to spit out dragon pellets the moment there’s a disagreement.” “Does that something-elder of yours usually like to play assassin games, why is he so fond of making sneak attacks?” “Look, that sneak-attacker received his retribution,” Fu Li watched Zhuang Qing send Qing Yuan flying with a swat of his tail. “Comparing anything else would be better, yet he insisted on fighting a golden dragon with power. How embarrassing now that he was sent flying with just one swipe of a tail.” The two azure dragons yearned to shut the mouth of this prattling yaoguai who hugged Zhuang Qing’s thigh. However, their inability to move meant that they were forced to continue listening to him. There were four people from the dragon clan, and three were wounded. Qing Yan and Zhuang Qing’s palms collided, the impact sending them flying back by more than ten meters. Dragon scales could already be seen on Zhuang Qing’s body. A pair of young forked dragon horns extended from his forehead, giving off a dazzling golden light. Only then did Fu Li recall that in accordance with the dragon clan’s way of calculating age, one would only be considered an adult two thousand years after leaving their shells. Zhuang Qing was still an underaged dragon. “Bullying even an underaged dragon, how shameful,” Fu Li stood up and patted his clothes that had gotten wet from the clouds and mist. “Help should be rendered in the face of injustice. Bullying minors is not right.” “Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing, the dragon race has controlled the waters for innumerable years. Forming clouds, summoning rain, and calling down frost and ice are our natural abilities. Humans will encounter countless tribulations in their lives, why do you make things difficult for your race for the sake of another race?” Qing Yan halted his offense and stood opposite Zhuang Qing. “No matter the kind of creature one is, support from their race will always be needed. Even if you’ve joined with the national fate, it’s impossible for you to be unrivaled in all the lands under the heavens. Certain things will lose its beauty if you nitpick too much.” “Human lives are short and their desire to live is strong, so they should bear greater torment?” Zhuang Qing laughed coldly. “I’m afraid Dragon Lord Qing Yan’s words are a little unreasonable.” “Whether or not its reasonable, there is one thing that is a fact – in the past millions of years, humans have progressed in such a manner,” Qing Yan’s face wore a noble-like smile, yet the words he spoke were cold-hearted. “Moreover, the humans are numerous in number and have strong reproduction capabilities. So what if a few of them get injured or die?” “There is no need for Dragon Lord Qing Yan to speak of such things to me. Before the end of the Northern Lake Dragon Lord’s prison sentence, I will not let him out,” Zhuang Qing would not waste spittle discussing this sort of issue with Qing Yan. One could never attempt to use speech to persuade someone with differing views. “If that’s the case, don’t fault me for being rude,” Qing Yan saluted with a smile. “Please.” “It’s my first time seeing someone bully a minor so politely.” Qing Yan turned his gaze towards the direction of the voice and saw the little yaoguai who said that the azure dragons ranked at the bottom of the dragon clans. He was lying across the layers of clouds. Almost no yao qi could be sensed from this little yao – he seemed like a yaoguai who had low cultivation and was easy to bully. If this was the past, Qing Yan wouldn’t care about him. But at this moment, all he felt was an incomparable sense of strangeness. How could an ordinary little yao dare to tear apart the barrier and watch their fight at such close proximity? The average yao cultivator couldn’t bear the dragon qi they emitted during combat at all. “Hey,” Fu Li jumped off the cloud and walked over to stand beside Zhuang Qing. “A yao should be reasonable. Isn’t it a bit shameless for four adult dragons to be bullying an underaged dragon?” Qing Yan stared blankly. Only after he looked at the not-yet-fully-formed dragon horns on Zhuang Qing’s head did he recall that Zhuang Qing really was a minor. It was just that Zhuang Qing’s rapid growth in cultivation the past few years and his position as the leader of the management bureau caused this fact to slip everyone’s minds. “Although you guys look down on humans, the human world has a &lt;Law on the Protection of Minors&gt;,” Disapproval colored Fu Li’s solemn expression. “You guys aren’t even comparable to humans, where do you find the shame to look down on others?” The smile on Qing Yan’s face stiffened. He had never thought that there would come a day when other yao would say that his dragon race couldn’t compare to the humans, and the reason was even that they didn’t have a &lt;Law on the Protection of Minors&gt;. But no matter how preposterous this saying was, Qing Yan understood very well in his heart that this day’s fight could no longer be continued. Turning, he looked at his three other injured clansmen with a bitter smile. If he carried on fighting and today’s matter were to get out, it would only lead others into believing that four azure dragons couldn’t beat the management bureau’s Zhuang Qing. Their azure dragon clan’s face would be lost if that happened. If they carried on fighting, other yao clans would also only say that their group of four dragons were bullying a dragon who hadn’t come of age. This saying wasn’t much better than the previous one and was perhaps even more embarrassing. Most importantly, he couldn’t make out the limits of this yao cultivator who stood with Zhuang Qing. He didn’t want to provoke him rashly. After a period of contemplation, Qing Yan cupped his hands and said, “There is sense in this daoyou’s words. Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing, we can discuss this matter again at a later date,” He prepared to leave, but Qing Yuan, who had been sent flying by Zhuang Qing’s tail, let out a roar and transformed into a dragon, shooting directly towards Zhuang Qing. In a split second, the world changed color. Thunder rumbled and the clouds in the sky roiled violently in a dense mass, resembling a giant creature that engulfed everything. “Crap!” Outside the barrier, Lin Gui’s expression changed drastically. “This can cause a tornado! Everyone, quickly set up a barrier, do your best to keep the surrounding airflow within the barrier!” The fact that Qing Yuan had been sent flying by the tail of a younger generation likely made him feel that he had lost face. As he charged towards Zhuang Qing in his original form, he was using nearly seven to eight-tenths of his original form’s power. “Elder Qing Yuan!” Qing Yan had a very bad feeling about this turn of events. He moved swiftly ahead in an attempt to block Qing Yuan, but the enraged Qing Yuan paid no heed to Qing Yan’s obstruction and directly shot past him, accompanied by a cold chill. “Quick, leave,” Slight panic appeared on Zhuang Qing’s eternally rigid statue face. He wanted to push aside Fu Li who was beside him and transform into his original form to block Qing Yuan, but not only did Fu Li not leave, he even took a step forward and stood in front of him. “My cultivation might be average, but I won’t let an underaged yao stand in front of me at such a moment,” Fu Li very shamelessly forgot that he had not too long ago let Zhuang Qing go up to fight while he shot his mouth off and pulled aggro at the side. The chilled air approached. Some of it had even morphed into ice blades sheathed in a piercing might. It was a terrible, abnormal phenomenon. <i>Ding.</i>  The azure dragon’s offense was suddenly halted by a single slender, fair palm that had grabbed hold of his dragon horn. “Have you considered the kind of outcome that would result from using ice techniques here?” A layer of thick ice had formed on Fu Li’s face, hair, and even body. In front of the azure dragon, his body seemed particularly small. <i>Roar.</i>  The azure dragon let out a roar of rage and started thrashing about in an attempt to fling Fu Li off his dragon horns. With a turn of his body, Fu Li flew into the skies. His right palm turned over and an ancient scarlet sword appeared in his hand. With a wave of the sword, the ice swooping towards him was blocked. “A divine sword refined by the true fire of a Fenghuang?” At the side, Qing Yan’s expression became extremely ugly. He wanted to go up and help but was blocked by Zhuang Qing. In reality, neither of them had any intention of fighting at this moment. Zhuang Qing was worried that Fu Li, the yaoguai who hadn’t left the mountains much, would be at a disadvantage, while Qing Yan was worried that Qing Yuan would be defeated by the divine sword refined by the Fenghuang’s true fire. Both of them guarded against each other with very tacit understanding, yet neither took action. After watching for a while, Qing Yan secretly heaved a sigh of relief. This yaoguai didn’t seem to have walked the path of sword cultivation. Although the sword itself was powerful, his skill with the sword was so-so. Hence, he could only restrain Qing Yuan, but not suppress him. After not more than ten minutes had passed, Qing Yuan, who was so exhausted he was panting for breath, already had the intention of retreating. In contrast, Fu Li was still waving the sword around untiringly, making chopping and cutting motions as if the sword was a hatchet. But even if this was the case, Qing Yuan was still unable to hold his own against him and was made to retreat step by step. Injuries had already appeared on his body. The sword landed on Qing Yuan’s body, prompting a pained wail from him. In the end, he could only change back to his human form and take consecutive steps back. He stared hatefully at the sword in Fu Li’s hands, his heart brimming with a very strong unwillingness to accept the situation. He hadn’t lost to an unknown yao cultivator, but to the sword in his hands. The excessive anger caused Qing Yuan to spit out blood. Fu Li hadn’t expected the sword to have such powerful destructive ability. When he grabbed the azure dragon’s horns, he had felt that the cold air was a little uncomfortable. In addition, there was only this one weapon in his Qiankun Pouch, so he simply made do with it. “Leave!” Qing Yuan turned and glanced at Qing Yan with an ugly expression, preparing to leave. “Wait,” Fu Li stopped Qing Yuan and pointed the sword at his forehead. “You guys bullied an underaged dragon, and now you want to leave just like that?” Unable to bear his tone of voice, Qing Yuan was about to curse him when someone grabbed the chance to speak first. Qing Yan took a step forward and cupped his hands at Zhuang Qing. “Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing, we have offended you.” Zhuang Qing held his hands behind his back and looked at Qing Yan expressionlessly without saying anything. Seeing that Zhuang Qing didn’t appear to want to continue pursuing the matter, Fu Li turned his hand and drew the sword back, sheathing it. “Many thanks to Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing for your mercy, this humble one will take my leave!” Qing Yan heaved a sigh of relief, bowing deeply to Zhuang Qing and Fu Li. Turning, he picked up his two motionless juniors and then transformed into a beam of light with Qing Yuan, vanishing into the clouds. The speed at which he did this was so quick that he appeared to be running for his life. Fu Li dragged the sword he was carrying along the ground. Without any care for maintaining his image, he walked lazily to Zhuang Qing and said with a face full of resentment, “This sword is too heavy. It isn’t nice to use at all.” “This sword...;” Zhuang Qing watched Fu Li drag the divine sword that induced fear in the azure dragons as if it was scrap iron. “How did you obtain it?” “All the yao cultivators on our mountain who can transform have one,” Fu Li put the sword back into his Qiankun Pouch. “This was forged by King Ganglie and the sparrow spirit at the entrance of my cave who can’t transform no matter how much they cultivate. But this sword is heavy, ugly, and isn’t even practical for cutting trees, so no one likes to use it.” “It not for the bone-chilling air on that dragon’s body and the fact that I didn’t have any other suitable weapon with me, I wouldn’t have used this,” Fu Li glanced at his open palm. “My hand’s even red from the extreme cold. Are those clansmen of yours so shameless that they even like bullying their juniors?” Zhuang Qing coughed. “I’m not on very good terms with the dragon clan.” “I can tell,” Fu Li looked at Zhuang Qing standing there majestically. He hesitated for a moment but still decided to say, “Let me be honest, don’t force it if you’ve suffered internal injuries. I’m already so old anyway, it’s not like I’ll make fun of you.” It was unknown if Fu Li’s words had angered him, but the moment these words left his mouth, a trace of blood dripped out of the corner of Zhuang Qing’s mouth. When he reached out a hand to wipe it, Fu Li stopped him. “Don’t move,” Fu Li took out a jade bottle and collected the blood at the corner of Zhuang Qing’s mouth. “Dragon blood is good stuff for refining pills.” Zhuang Qing stared at Fu Li’s jade bottle. It was a type of jade bottle that had been enhanced by a magic array. Regardless of the kind of liquid that was poured in, it would remain in the freshest state. All pill cultivators coveted such a bottle, even if they were dreaming. Unfortunately, good jade was hard to come by and many drawing methods for magic arrays were lost during the earlier years. Therefore, other than large and influential clans who were in possession of a few of such bottles, other people didn’t have any. Even Zhuang Qing...; didn’t have one. <i>Why would a yaoguai who had this sort of rare item want to become a civil servant and even be in such poor financial straits that he had to borrow money from him?</i>  “Eat one,” Fu Li rummaged through his Qiankun Pouch and fished out a small medicinal pill. “Nurse your internal injuries.” This Hunyuan pill was clear, sweet, and rich in spiritual qi. It was an extremely rare panacea of the highest quality. Even refining a thousand medicinal pills would not guarantee the production of one such pill. That was why the starting price of this pill at auctions in the cultivation world would be at least two million yuan. Zhuang Qing pinched the medicinal pill and thought about how he had to swallow this two-million-yuan Hunyuan pill just because he had suffered minor internal injuries. Instantly, grief felt as if it was tearing through his heart. “What are you doing staring into space foolishly?” Fu Li patted Zhuang Qing’s hand and the Hunyuan pill smoothly entered Zhuang Qing’s mouth, rolling into his esophagus. Zhuang Qing very quickly felt a gust of warmth within his five internal organs. The internal injuries he had suffered from the collision of palms gradually healed. “I forgot that this bottle’s Hunyuan pill has been sitting for nearly three thousand years. Do you feel okay after eating it?” Fu Li looked worriedly at Zhuang Qing. <i>If he poisoned the only golden-national fate dragon to death, would heavenly law strike him with lightning till he turned into dregs?</i>  “Many thanks,” Zhuang Qing’s complexion looked even worse than before. “I’m fine now.” “Really?” Fu Li looked doubtfully at Zhuang Qing. <i>His complexion was this terrible looking, yet he still said he was fine. Truly a considerate child.</i>  How was Zhuang Qing fine? His heart was aching so much that he nearly couldn’t breathe. But in addition to the heartache, he also felt an unfathomable happiness. This feeling of happiness came out of nowhere. Even he himself didn’t understand what was going on. Outside the barrier, Xu Yuan and the rest realized that the cold air had vanished without a trace. Even the barrier erected by the dragon clan had also dispersed, so they rushed in with a deeply worried heart. “Oh right.” Zhuang Qing wiped the bloodstains at the corner of his mouth and asked Fu Li, “Didn’t you need money to change the human’s grave?” “Oh, that.” Fu Li waved his hands. “Isn’t your management bureau also having a tough time getting by? I’ll find another way.” “No, I was joking with you that time,” Zhuang Qing pursed the corners of his lips. He attempted to squeeze out a smile, though the curved corners of lips appeared a little stiff and strange, likely due to the fact that he didn’t usually smile. “As part of the dragon clan, how can I lack money?” He took out his handphone. “I’ll send a million to your bank account first, let me know if it isn’t enough.” He tapped the screen for a very long time, yet there was no response from the bank’s application. Only then did he recall that this place was a little far from the ground. Handphone signals didn’t yet reach the sky. “What would I do with a million? I don’t need that much,” Fu Li rubbed his hands. “Moreover, I won’t be able to return the money in a short time.” “To my dragon clan, this bit of money is merely a drop in the ocean. There are many places in the capital to spend money. You’ve just left the mountain and don’t understand many things. Having money will give you more confidence,” Zhuang Qing stuffed his handphone back into his pocket. “You’re belittling me if you bring up returning the money again.” “Mr Zhuang, I think the outside world has misunderstood your dragon clan,” The more Fu Li looked at this mixed-blood dragon, the more he felt that he was different from the other crafty and unruly dragons. He was magnanimous and reasonable, had character and was kind-hearted – as expected, the mind of a minor was still the most pure and virtuous. “What misunderstanding?” “The yao cultivators who lived with me on the same mountain said that nine out of ten dragons in your clan are stingy.” Zhuang Qing raised his chin slightly and flashed a careless smile, his attitude like that of an extremely generous person. “I’m probably the exception.” <i>But the remaining one was especially stingy.</i>  Fu Li pondered over it and felt that he had better not utter this statement. It was rare for a generous dragon to be in existence, he couldn’t lead him astray. Beneath the layers of clouds, Chu Yu and Lin Gui, who had very good hearing, met each other’s gazes and saw the shock in each other’s eyes. <i>Where did the boss find such thick skin, even thinking that he was an exception in the dragon clan?</i>  If he wasn’t considered stingy, then there were no stingy people in this world. After returning to the management bureau, Zhuang Qing sent a million yuan to Fu Li. In the many years Fu Li had lived, it was his first time having so much money. He took out a natural diamond from his Qiankun Pouch and placed it in front of Zhuang Qing. “The other time I took your car, I saw that the stone on the car roof resembled this. Since your dragon clan likes bright things, take this back and embed it into your wall.” The fist-sized natural diamond was thrown onto the table as if it was just a pebble. Zhuang Qing looked at the natural diamond, took a deep breath, and asked hoarsely, “Mr Fu, did all yao in the past give people things so casually?” “It’s all right, I’m not particularly generous,” Fu Li poked the diamond, letting it roll back and forth on the table. “This stone seems to be scrap material left behind after the sparrow spirit refined the sword. Although it’s valuable in today’s society, it’s not like I can sell this off, so treat it as my way of paying you back for the one million.” “This stone of yours is worth far more than a million,” Zhuang Qing thought about how Fu Li could have casually gifted all sorts of valuable items to other people and felt his entire body from head to toe aching, despite the fact that these things clearly had no relation to him. “You were the only one out of so many yao who was willing to lend me money. Since you happen to like these things, isn’t it appropriate to give it to you?” Fu Li patted Zhuang Qing’s shoulder consolingly. “These are merely worldly possessions, don’t take them to heart.” Zhuang Qing looked at this old yaoguai who was smiling splendidly. After a long while, he sighed. “I will accept Mr Fu’s good intentions. If you still want to give people things in the future, you can consult me about it.” To avoid him giving rare objects away as if they were two-yuan wholesale goods. “How could I inconvenience you?” Fu Li gave a somewhat embarrassed smile. His understanding of the human world was extremely lacking. If a yao residing in the human world could teach him how to handle human relations, it would indeed make things much more convenient for him. “No, it’s not inconvenient at all!” Zhuang Qing stood up and told him resolutely, “Come with me.” He, the sole descendant of the golden dragon clan, truly could not tolerate Fu Li’s wasteful way of gifting items. Even if he had mountains of gold and silver, it wouldn’t be enough to supplement his ways. It was necessary for him to understand what the human world was like! Fu Li felt that his negative impression of the dragon clan would change very soon because of one Zhuang Qing. After dragging his two juniors back to the ocean, Qing Yan spat out a large mouth of blood. “Uncle!” The two azure dragons had just reached adulthood and were used to acting in an oppressive manner. Never once had they thought that Zhuang Qing would have the guts to make things difficult for their azure dragon clan. “I’m fine,” Qing Yan waved his hands. He hadn’t expected Zhuang Qing’s cultivation to have reached such a level of profoundness. The only reason he persisted was so he could prevent Zhuang Qing from seeing through him, but now, he was unable to hold on any longer. He was just about to transform into his dragon form and swim back to the dragon palace when he caught sight of a submarine moving ahead furtively. Upon focusing spiritual qi at his eyes, he realized that the people inside differed in skin tone and hair color from their human forms. The him who was in a bad mood merely flung his sleeves and the submarine was sent hurtling above the surface of the water. In recent years, these ships had constantly been floating back and forth above their dragon palace, forcing them to set up a concealment barrier throughout all four seasons in a year. It was practically an endless source of frustration for the dragons. The chief of the submarine whose head was spinning from the hurtling had just regained his wits when he saw a large motionless warship not too far in the distance. The warship and submarine looked at each other in dismay. The warship reacted very quickly and politely invited the submarine back to its country as a guest. The four dragons had just reached the dragon palace when Qing Yuan suddenly clutched his head and rolled about on the ground howling, without any care for the surrounding shrimp and crab soldiers. “Elder!” Seeing that Qing Yuan was so pained that he nearly couldn’t control his spiritual qi, Qing Yan changed into his original form and ordered the surrounding shrimp and crab soldiers, “Everyone is to retreat!” The thunderous dragon hiss tormented the shrimp and crab soldiers with low cultivation. Some even fainted dead away on the spot. Hearing the commotion, the other dragons in the dragon palace all came out to see what had occurred. Qing Yuan was jolting around chaotically in the ocean. If Qing Yan hadn’t reacted swiftly and set up a barrier in front of the palace gate, he would even have rammed into the gate. “Qing Yan, weren’t all of you going to find Zhuang Qing? How did things turn out like this?” The Head of the azure dragon clan walked out. His expression turned grave upon seeing Qing Yuan, who had lost his mind from pain. “Qing Yuan’s cultivation may not be the highest among the azure dragons, but he still has a few thousand years’ worth of cultivation. Who is capable of harming him to this extent?” “E-Elder’s horn!” An underaged azure dragon displayed an expression filled with shock, horror, and amazement as he pointed at Qing Yuan, who was still struggling in pain. He couldn’t even utter a complete sentence. Qing Yan shifted his line of sight towards Qing Yuan, his expression heavy. A frightening scene greeted his eyes. Elder Qing Yuan had left his shell at a hundred years old and transformed into his human form at the age of five hundred. His dragon horns were formidable and beautiful and had always been a source of pride for him. Yet, cracks had appeared on one of his two beautiful and impressive dragon horns. Furthermore, these cracks were widening as Elder Qing Yuan howled uncontrollably. One crisp snapping sound later, the dragon horn landed on the ground in a few chunks. “The d-dragon horn broke...;” A young dragon covered the tiny forked horns on top of his head, scared speechless. All of a sudden, several senior azure dragons recalled the utterly humiliating matter from many years back that they dared not even mention. A silent dread assaulted their hearts. “Where are we going?” Fu Li followed behind Zhuang Qing and got into the car. Putting on his seatbelt, he swung his arms and told Zhuang Qing, “That old azure dragon’s horn was really hard, my hand still hurts.” “The hardest place on a dragon’s body is their horns. Grabbing it with your bare hands will definitely leave injuries,” Zhuang Qing glanced at the red patch on Fu Li’s palm. He found a bottle of medicine in the car and threw it to him. “This is a medicinal ointment made from seaweed. Apply some and test it out.” Fu Li smelt something upon opening the cover. “The smell is a bit bad.” “Great lords shouldn’t argue so much. This medicine is for external injuries, it’s not like I’m asking you to eat it,” Zhuang Qing started up the car. “I’ll take you to buy a handphone first. In this age, even seventy, eighty-year-old elderly men and women have handphones. You can’t even compare to them.” “I’m older than them,” Fu Li applied the black-green ointment onto his palm, not minding Zhuang Qing’s tone of voice. He had lived for so many years and most assuredly would not bicker with a minor. By the time they alighted from the car, all the ointment had already been absorbed. Barely any traces of the scar could be seen. Fu Li nodded and praised, “This medicine is not bad.” Zhuang Qing snorted coldly. “Of course it’s not bad. It’s the dragon race’s secret medicine and is capable of regenerating flesh.” If not for the fact that he had swallowed the other party’s two-million-yuan medicinal pill, he would not have been able to bear taking it out. The technology city was very crowded. Many brands were carrying out shopping campaigns or whatnot. In any case, during the Chao dynasty, there were major discount campaigns ten out of the twelve months in a year. This was a common method for those selling electrical appliances, dishes, or blankets. Modern technological devices were practically alien species to Fu Li. During the entire process of selecting a handphone, he didn’t speak a word and when Zhuang Qing asked him a question, he would say that anything was fine. In the end, Zhuang Qing bought him a good quality handphone made within the country with generally good public opinion. Because they bought this particular model, there would be a reimbursement of fifty yuan in call rates for a period of twelve months. Fu Li held the mug given to him by the sales employee and watched Zhuang Qing install various social media applications on the phone. Only then did Zhuang Qing hand the phone to him. “Read the news more often, increase your knowledge.” “I often watch news broadcasts,” Fu Li put the handphone into the pocket of his trousers. He told Zhuang Qing, “Actually, there’s no need to make things so inconvenient. I can just use the Thousand Mile Sound Transmission to contact you; it’s very convenient for any kind of conversation.” Zhuang Qing took a deep breath and told Fu Li, “A lot of yao cultivators now don’t know how to use the Thousand Mile Sound Transmission. Besides, since you entered human society, you should adapt to the way of living – use the handphone when you should be using it. News channels don’t only consist of &lt;News Broadcast&gt;. I’ve downloaded a few social media platforms for you; they have many interesting news pieces, so take your time to play around with them when you go back.” Oh,” Fu Li fished out his handphone and took a few glances at it. He tapped on a square box titled ‘contacts’ – there was only Zhuang Qing’s contact. He shot a glance at Zhuang Qing, deeply moved. This mixed-blood dragon was truly cordial and generous. After sending Fu Li to his rented house, Zhuang Qing called out to him, “When you have money, stay somewhere else.” Fu Li wasn’t someone who had very high requirements for his dwelling. Hearing Zhuang Qing say this, he agreed easily. “Okay.” “And,” Zhuang Qing added. “Don’t forget about the written examination three days later.” “What examination?” Fu Li hadn’t reacted. Zhuang Qing’s fairly expressionless face darkened at a speed visible to the naked eye. “The management bureau’s recruitment exam.” From the way Fu Li looked, he clearly hadn’t taken this matter to heart. “Ah, that. I remember it,” Fu Li laughed dryly. “I’ll definitely make preparations to go for it when the time comes.” Zhuang Qing turned the car, spraying Fu Li in the face with exhaust. “Such a bad temper,” Fu Li wiped his face and touched the handphone in his pocket. <i>His temper might be a bit on the bad side, but he was still a good person at heart.</i>  Ning Xuan and Chao Yun returned to the management bureau and distributed the local specialties they had brought back. Not seeing Zhuang Qing, they asked somewhat curiously, “Where’s Boss?” Lin Gui was locking up a pile of information in the archives and replied without even turning his head, “He went out.” “That’s rare,” Chao Yun found her seat. Not long after she switched on his computer, she involuntarily let out a curse. She hadn’t logged into the game in a month and had been kicked out of her guild. “Playing games immediately after returning,” Chu Yu stretched his neck and glanced at her screen. “Watch out for Boss’ scolding later.” “Oh right, we found a cat yao on our way back who hadn’t transformed into its human form yet. We took it to the Yao Union,” Chao Yun took a bag of melon seeds from Chu Yu’s desk and talked while cracking the seeds. “The little yao didn’t know how to suppress its yao qi yet; we could smell its yao qi from a great distance away.” “That idiot Ning Xuan found some rubbish incense the size of a tiny fingernail in a crack below the table and insisted that it was a Peace Branch or something,” Chao Yun shook her head helplessly. “Have you heard of this Peace Branch thing?” “If it wasn’t a Peace Branch, why did it dissipate the moment I touched it?” Ning Xuan didn’t think there was an issue with his reasoning. “Ice held in a hand will also dissipate,” Chao Yun put down the melon seeds. “The exhaustion from hunting down great yao for more than a month has dulled my original form. I’m going to rest for a few days.” “I’m afraid you won’t be able to,” Chu Yu stated. “It’s the recruitment examination three days later. You and Ning Xuan will be the combat examiners.” “We’re recruiting this year?” Ning Xuan gathered his thoughts. “It’s about time for recruitment. I hope we’ll recruit someone who can fight this time around. Every time we meet a great yao, it’s always me and Chao Yun pursuing it. Thanks to this, the blade of my sword has become a lot blunter.” Everyone who was incapable of fighting, “...;” The day after Fu Li received the money, he went to purchase the grave he had set his sights on. After communicating with the relevant department, Teacher Yao and his wife were eventually buried together. Upon finding out that Fu Li was merely Teacher Yao’s colleague and not his relative, the employees of the relevant department all felt that he was amazing. What kind of friendship did they share for a colleague to spend over two hundred thousand yuan? One of the younger employees voiced out the doubts in his heart to Fu Li directly. “Money is merely a worldly possession. What’s priceless is knowledge,” Fu Li placed a bundle of gold ingots in front of the grave. “Teacher Yao did numerous good deeds throughout his life. His heart’s desires ought to be realized.” The employee left. Fu Li looked at the photograph of the couple on the grave and then turned, speaking towards the underbrush. “Come out.” “Meow,” A calico cat climbed out of the underbrush. It stood upright on its hind legs like a human and raised its clasped paws towards the grave. “They will have a good lot in their next life. You can cultivate with peace of mind, don’t keep worrying about Teacher Yao,” Fu Li lightly kicked the cat’s tail. “Don’t run about recklessly. Be careful not to be taken away by people who think you’re a stray cat.” “Who says I’m worried about that human?” The cat spat out human words, arrogance brimming in its voice. “I just came to take a look since it was convenient for me.” After stating this, it turned and made to move, but even after walking for an eternity, it still remained at its spot. “I’ll send you back to the Yao Union,” Fu Li stooped over and picked the cat up by its nape. Placing it in the crook of his arm, Fu Li turned and walked out of the cemetery. Three days later, many people gathered at Chang Long Biotechnology Company. Passersby who thought that there was a fight happening at this place inquired about it out of curiosity and found out that the company was merely recruiting. Instantly, they left in disappointment. Who knew how good this company’s benefits were for there to be these many applications? But why did those people with dyed red and yellow hair also run over to join in the fun? Clearly, they were an unconventional lot. Fu Li stood at the entrance and glanced at the densely packed cultivators inside. He couldn’t stop himself from taking two steps back. “Ouch,” Somebody behind him let out a miserable shriek. “Sorry,” Fu Li realized that he had stepped on somebody’s foot and hurriedly turned to apologize. “It’s fine, it’s fine,” The person grimaced in pain and smiled. “You also came to compete for the job?” Fu Li looked at the green cap of hair on his head fluttering in the wind and nodded silently. “Ai, everyone went crazy after hearing that there are two recruitment spots this year,” The green-haired yao pointed at the mass of people hiding under the shade. “Even the ghost cultivators came. Brother, are you a human or yao cultivator? You came to join in the fun even with such low cultivation?” The green-haired yao observed the weak qi that Fu Li gave off and kindly advised him, “It’s all right for little yao like us to join in the fun, but our hopes must not be too high.” “Oh,” Fu Li listened to the green-haired yao report the number of applicants and experts this year as he followed the long queue to receive his examination number. “What a coincidence, we’re in the same examination room,” The green-haired yao glanced at Fu Li’s examination seat number. “I’m seated in front of you.” He lowered his voice and said, “If there’s something you don’t know later, I can let you sneak a peek.” “That...;” A hint of distress appeared on Fu Li’s face. “Isn’t cheating not very good?” “How is that considered cheating? That’s called being willing to help others,” The green-haired yao placed a hand on Fu Li’s shoulder. “Come, let elder brother bring you to the examination venue.” Fu Li was struck by a realization. This yao was of the carefree and optimistic type. There was a special formation in the examination venue set up by the management bureau. Regardless of their race, anyone who stepped into this place would be similar to ordinary people, unable to use any skill. Other than several general knowledge questions on humans, the main bulk of the examination paper was focused on the various management regulations. Fu Li had recently broadened his knowledge of human decrees and thus didn’t have to strain too hard to answer these questions. However, the various major questions at the back were a little complicated and touched on many races. Fu Li, who hadn’t seen much of the world, could only randomly answer them based on the rumors he had heard from other yao in the past. After they handed in their papers, Fu Li realized that many cultivators were sighing in despair. Even the green-haired yao who had talked about letting him copy the answers was also somewhat dejected. “The questions this year are a bit difficult,” The green-haired yao’s head drooped weakly. “The written examination alone might eliminate nine out of ten people.” “Then compared to the human university entrance exam, which one is more difficult?” “They can’t be compared. Those human test questions have no humanity at all. To our yao clan, they’re full of malice,” The green-haired yao shook his head. “Do you know who among our yao clan has the highest academic qualification in the human world?” Fu Li shook his head. Someone who wanted to gossip would most prefer their conversational buddy to display confusion and ignorance. Only then would gossiping give them a sense of accomplishment. “The management bureau’s Dragon Lord. He has a PhD from the National Capital University. I heard he was once a teacher at the Imperial College during the times when emperors still existed.” Fu Li was tongue-tied. To think that Zhuang Qing was a mixed-blood dragon of culture...; “Then the human world’s civil servant examination...;” “Don’t even think about that,” The green-haired yao said. “You have to know that it isn’t easy to enter university. The civil servant examination is a competition between university students. What relation do you think something like that has with us yao cultivators?” “No yao has ever been a civil servant in the human world?” Fu Li was struck dumb by the green-haired yao’s way of speech. “There was.” “Who?” Fu Li’s eyes brightened. “A couple years back, the management bureau’s Dragon Lord Zhuang Qing was the commander of the imperial court guards. He can be considered a civil servant.” Fu Li, “...;” This mixed-blood dragon had really made his mark. “Benefactor,” Chu Yu squeezed through the throng of people, an enthusiastic smile on his face. “It’s been a difficult test. I’ve booked a nourishing meal outside, you must give me some face and have a meal with me.” Fearing that Fu Li would decline, he pulled Fu Li by the hand and ran out. The green-haired yao who had recognized Chu Yu stood dazedly at his spot. A good while later, he spat out one statement, “Aiyo, damn!” “Turns out he’s someone with f*cking connections.” Upon reaching the eating location, Fu Li realized Zhang Ke was also present. The two people had ordered many dishes for Fu Li; the entire table was covered in all sorts of dishes, from fried to steamed to stewed. “Senior, please sit,” Zhang Ke stood up and poured a drink for Fu Li. “The combat test is in the afternoon, so I didn’t prepare any wine for you. This is freshly squeezed fruit juice. It’s quite tasty, give it a try.” “Many thanks,” Fu Li took the cup and drank a mouth. The juice was sweet, tasty, and even contained a hint of spiritual qi. “This is a restaurant specially for the cultivation world, it only receives customers from the cultivation world,” Zhang Ke knew that Fu Li didn’t have a very robust understanding of the cultivation world and thus informed Fu Li of the sects within the cultivation world. “The Fields Sect manages this restaurant. Their sect is very fond of planting things. Whether its flowers, grass, or vegetables, there isn’t anything they can’t grow, only something that we can’t think of. A while back, one of their sect’s juniors ran over to Africa for vacation and planted a huge heap of cucumbers out of boredom. In the end, this matter was discovered by a reporter and made it onto the news.” “It’s possible to get on the news by planting cucumbers?” Fu Li didn’t quite understand. <i>Didn’t the humans of this country rely mainly on agriculture?</i>  “The people nowadays are all idle. Planting cucumbers in Africa can be considered a novel affair.” Zhang Ke didn’t know what Fu Li’s original form was, so out of fear of violating a taboo, he held up a bowl of beef soup. “Senior, do you eat beef?” Fu Li nodded. “I don’t really have foods I abstain from.” A spoon of the exceedingly tasty beef soup entered his stomach. There was no foul smell, only a fresh aroma. Seeing that Chu Yu wasn’t drinking, Fu Li asked, “Why aren’t you drinking?” Chu Yu shook his head. “Benefactor may not have known, but I transformed after obtaining the Fate of the Dao, so I can’t consume beef.” The cow was of extremely lofty status in Daoism, so no Daoist cultivator would consume beef. Fu Li was struck by sudden understanding. It turned out that he was a Daoist fish. It was no wonder his scent was so pure, and even had several strands of virtue mixed in. After their meal, Fu Li rested for half an hour in the company of Zhang Ke and Chu Yu before returning to the bureau. Using his examination number on the bulletin board as a guide, he found the exam venue he should be going to. Under the guise of a biotechnology company, the management bureau didn’t seem to occupy much space, but in actual fact, it contained a Qiankun within. The moment the examinees entered the formation, they found scores of combat stages lined up inside. The moment they stepped into their corresponding exam room, the formation in the exam room would automatically transport them to different combat stages. Fu Li’s first opponent was a monkey spirit with a head of yellow hair. He had just made his move when the monkey collapsed on the ground. He glanced at his own palm, wondering if he would be suspected of bullying a child. Afterwards, Fu Li defeated a peacock yao, tiger yao, bear yao, pigeon yao, chicken yao, an unknown yao belonging to the bird species, a donkey yao, and so on. The fact that every fight was won by him with ease made Fu Li doubt the overall level of this era’s yao cultivators. He thought of a proverb spoken in the human realm – in the absence of a tiger in the mountain, the monkey would be named king. In his current situation, he was possibly the monkey. It wasn’t him who was powerful, but the modern yao cultivators who were too disappointing. During his tenth fight, Fu Li’s opponent was a crested ibis. He had seen on news broadcasts that this type of bird was a national endangered animal. Hence, regardless of the fact that this crested ibis was covered from head to toe in sturdy muscle, Fu Li only defended and didn’t go on the offense in fear of harming this endangered animal. The crested ibis’ attacks didn’t hit its target, putting it in such anger that it violently struck the ground with the meteor hammer in its hand. The crested ibis placed a hand on its hips and swore at Fu Li, “You who’s obstructing this Laozi, what exactly is the meaning of this? You’re messing around with Laozi?” Fu Li thought, <i>it seemed this crested ibis had once stayed in Sichuan. But the news broadcasts had never once mentioned that Sichuan was a suitable place for a crested ibis to live in.</i>  “F*ck your ancestors’ coffins, Laozi isn’t going to continue playing around with you,” The crested ibis spat at Fu Li. “Fool, if Laozi ever meets you outside, I’ll definitely put you in a whole world of pain.” Fu Li, “...;” <i>Did all endangered animals have such explosive tempers?</i>  The crested ibis angrily conceded defeat and Fu Li continued his fight with the next opponent. According to the competition regulations, one would be able to enter the next round as long as they won twenty rounds within the stipulated time. “Captain Ning Xuan,” A bureau worker walked in with an A4 paper in his hands and a somewhat complicated expression on his face. “A crested ibis yao reported his opponent for intentionally humiliating him during their battle.” The crested ibis could be considered a known creature in the cultivation world. It was said that his race had nearly been exterminated in the earlier years. After that, who knew what kind of dog sh*t luck they had, but they were upheld as a k2018;national treasure’ by the humans. As a result, they became a rarity to be treasured in the next instant. As the only crested ibis yao in the cultivation world, this extremely irascible yao directly gave himself the name of Crested Ibis. A few years ago, Crested Ibis deliberately hid inside the house of a yaoguai who had offended him and then reported the yaoguai to the human police for illegal capturing of crested ibis. In the end, this yaoguai had no choice but to be powerlessly led off by the police and then sentenced to several years of jail. At this moment, the yaoguai was still squatting in the human prison. “There’s someone who actually dares to provoke him,” At the side, curiosity could be seen on Chao Yun’s face. “I respect him for being a man with a sense of justice. Who is the person who’s so fearless?” “Examinee number 1356.” The worker said in a low voice, “I heard Captain Chu Yu say that this examinee number 1356 saved his life.” “Then ignore him. These few years, the crested ibis has been using the label of ‘national treasure’ as a symbol of authority to do many yao-infuriating things. Let the examinees play among themselves, we won’t care about them,” Chao Yun drank a mouthful of water. “With that petty character of his, he’ll suffer losses sooner or later.” Narrow-minded, overly-jealous, and vengeful – this crested ibis was practically the cultivation world’s most outrageous creature. The crested ibis saw that the panda, who was similarly a national treasure, received more favor from the humans than him. Thus, he learnt how to speak in a Sichuan accent just like the panda, as if doing so would make him that much more noble. Hadn’t he thought to consider if the panda’s ability to speak in the Sichuan accent was the reason why it was favored by humans? It was clearly because the humans liked how fat the panda was! The fatter the panda, the more the humans loved them to an unfathomable degree. The humans even tamped down their conscience and called pandas who were peeing and pooping cute. Who knew what was wrong with these humans? Fu Li won twenty rounds consecutively. When he left the combat venue, he noticed many cultivators crowding outside the exam venue. He stood on tiptoe and glanced over. <i>Wasn’t that noisy and verbally abusive yaoguai in the crowd the bad-tempered crested ibis? Did someone provoke him again?</i>  “Brother!” The extremely noisy green-haired yao from the afternoon squeezed out of the crowd. He patted Fu Li on the shoulder enthusiastically. “You also lost too many rounds and decided to just withdraw?” Fu Li blinked. He looked at the top of the green-haired yao’s head; he seemed to be missing a tuft of hair. “Hey!” The green-haired yao noticed Fu Li’s gaze and smiled with some embarrassment. “I encountered a hen spirit just now who grabbed my feathers the moment the fight started. Too savage.” Fu Li shot a sympathetic glance at him. <i>That really was quite pitiful.</i>  “You’re also watching the excitement surrounding the crested ibis?” The green-feathered parrot yao saw that Fu Li was interested in the drama the crested ibis was kicking up and started to summarize the outrageous acts the crested ibis had committed the past few years. “Guess what he’s kicking a fuss about this time?” “What?” Fu Li was stupefied by the green-haired yao’s summary. It was his first time realizing that yaoguai could actually survive in such shameless ways. <i>If this were the past, he would probably have been killed by some great yao in one slap?</i>  The times were good; all these yaoguai had been spoiled. “He lost to someone else in a fight yet insists that the person was humiliating him. He’s been making a fuss here for almost half an hour,” The green-feathered yao spoke in a slightly sour tone of voice. “We all belong to the bird species, and the colors of my feathers are so much brighter than his. Who knows where he gets the confidence that he’s a higher-class bird? Just because he’s called a national treasure by the humans, he really thinks he’s a national treasure? The real national treasure, the panda, doesn’t even act the way he does.” Fu Li was silent. <i>The examinee that the crested ibis made a commotion about wanting to report couldn’t be him, right?</i>  “You!” The crested ibis suddenly rushed out of the crowd and grabbed the lapel of Fu Li’s clothes. “It’s you. Follow me to see the bureau’s staff member, I want to report you.” The crested ibis was so annoyed that he stopped speaking with a Sichuan accent. Smooth standard Mandarin let slip from his mouth. Fu Li looked down at the tightly gripped lapel. In the yao world, this sort of behavior was called ‘provocation’. As he listened to the crested ibis’ unending jabbering, Fu Li turned his head, wanting to ask the green-haired yao if all bird yao were this noisy. However, when he shifted his gaze, the green-haired yao had already retreated back into the crowd, his demeanor entirely as if he ‘didn’t recognize’ him. It was then that Fu Li understood. It turned out that the bird yao these day not only had low cultivation and were noisy but were also very skilled at adapting to the situation. Compared to these bird yao, Fu Li felt that the sparrow yao at the entrance of his cave dwelling was much more reliable, despite the fact that it constantly churned out a bunch of ugly and useless items. “Can you release my clothes before we continue this conversation?” Fu Li sighed helplessly. “This set of clothes is newly bought; the tags are still on it.” He had specially bought these new clothes for this exam. “Then tell me honestly why you only defended and didn’t attack. Is it because you look down on me and deliberately wanted to taunt me?” The crested ibis’ voice was a little shrill. Unable to stand this sort of voice, the little yao at the side covered their ears and retreated a few meters. “I was afraid that my attack would cause your feathers to fall out,” Fu Li replied seriously. “According to our country’s endangered species law, you are an endangered animal in our country. I don’t want to violate the law.” “Don’t talk big in front of Laozi. What endangered species law are you talking about in the yao world? If you have the ability, let me see the feathers falling out. Bragging without taking any responsibility; aren’t you scared of it backfiring!” The crested ibis had just finished speaking when he felt something swat him. When he landed on the ground, he was still somewhat dazed. Several strands of hair dropped off his head and floated to the ground, transforming into blackish-red feathers. Fu Li walked to the crested ibis and picked up the fallen feathers on the ground. Squatting, he held them out towards the crested ibis. “Look, haven’t they fallen out now?” He stuffed the feathers into the crested ibis’ hand before standing up and tugging at the slightly wrinkled lapel of his clothes. Shaking his head, he sighed, “It’s my first time encountering such a silly yaoguai who voluntarily asked to be hit by other yao.” The crested ibis lay slumped on the ground and watched Fu Li slowly walk into the distance. He was unable to get up even after half a day had passed. “I-I’ll f*ck your ancestors’ coffins.” “Brother, brother,” The green-haired yao caught up to Fu Li. “Our encounter is fated. It’s almost time for dinner, let me treat you to authentic Hong Kong healthy hotpot. It’s particularly tasty.” Fu Li looked at the electronic display screen on the wall and shook his head. “I can’t go.” The green-haired yao thought that Fu Li was disappointed by his failure and thus patted his shoulder, saying consolingly, “Brother, be a bit more open-minded. It’s normal to be unable to join the management bureau. Succeeding means you have both luck and virtue. What’s more, you might not have joined the bureau, but you’re on good terms with the bigshots inside. In our yao world, you would be considered a yao with connections.” Which was why he wanted to hug the thigh of this yao with connections. It would be a task of herculean difficulty if he attempted to build a relationship with the management bureau now. “That’s not it, I still need to participate in the next stage of the competition,” Fu Li pointed at the large screen. “It’s starting in half an hour.” The green-haired yao, “...;” This person who walked through the backdoor was someone with strength! “Big brother, I’ll treat you to drinks!” The green-haired yao’s attitude became even more cordial as he jogged out. In the short span of half a day, the green-haired yao’s way of addressing Fu Li changed from brother to big brother. The pace of this development could even be termed incredible. The next stage of the competition was a mass battle with only fifty spots for advancement. Perhaps Fu Li’s action of slapping the crested ibis had etched itself too deeply in the hearts of the yao, but when the mass battle commenced, almost no yao took the initiative to challenge Fu Li. Even at the end of the competition, his position hadn’t changed much. “The second stage of the competition has ended, the third stage will commence in an hour’s time,” Chao Yun appeared on the combat stage. A few yao cultivators who had attained spots for the third stage of the competition complained upon hearing Chao Yun’s words, “One hour isn’t enough for us to regain our strength, how are we supposed to compete later?” “The evil yao you will need to catch won’t give you an hour’s time to rest,” Chao Yun laughed coldly. “If you want to join the management bureau, you had better be mentally prepared to fight to the death with evil spirits at any time. If you can’t even endure a competition at this level of intensity, you had better withdraw from the competition sooner rather than later. That way, you can avoid losing your life for some obscure reason when facing evil spirits.” Cultivators who had obtained the fifty spots didn’t dare to utter any more complaints after hearing Chao Yun’s remarks. They saluted Chao Yuan respectfully before leaving the combat stage. Chao Yun cocked her head slightly, her gaze landing on the yao cultivator who was walking right at the back. Since the start of the second round of the competition, her attention had always remained on the stage, so she had realized that this yao cultivator hadn’t attacked much from start to end. The other cultivators didn’t seem to dare to provoke him either. Turning, she headed back to the refereeing counter. Chao Yun flipped through the examinees’ registration information and found the examinee’s information. Her gaze swept across the information. “Fu Li?” This name was not bad. “Chao Yun,” Chu Yu drifted over. “Is there anyone outstanding in this batch of examinees?” Chao Yun was preoccupied with looking through the information and didn’t have the inclination to answer Chu Yu’s question. Just as she was about to answer half-heartedly, she saw Zhuang Qing standing behind him. Her expression became a bit more solemn. “There are a few good candidates this year. The more interesting one is an examinee called Fu Li. Almost no yao cultivators dared to pick him as an opponent on the combat stage.” She stood up and picked out Fu Li’s information, passing it to Zhuang Qin. “I suspect he has more than three thousand years’ worth of cultivation, since neither me, Ning Xuan, nor the other colleagues can make out his original form.” Zhuang Qing took the registration form filled in by the examinee himself and glanced at the crooked letters written on it. He handed the form back to Chao Yun. “En.” <i>What did ‘en’ mean?</i>  Chao Yun carefully ran her eyes over the form once again and saw the examinee’s number at the corner of the form. <i>1356?</i>  <i>Wasn’t this Chu Yu’s benefactor?</i>  Chao Yun raised her head and looked at Chu Yu somewhat suspiciously, “Chu Yu, you didn’t use your authority to open the backdoor for this examinee, right?” “Even if you want to insult me, don’t insult my benefactor. Is he the kind of person who needs to go through the backdoor?” Chu Yu was furious. “Who knows...;” “He won’t,” Zhuang Qing interrupted Chao Yun. “He doesn’t need to.” T/N: As someone guilty of cooing over cute pandas, I’m feeling a strange sense of embarrassment &gt;.&gt; Chao Yun hadn’t expected the boss to speak up for an examinee. She looked at Zhuang Qing in astonishment, only to find a solemn expression on his face. She was struck by sudden understanding. It seemed the Boss regarded this Fu Li’s abilities highly. After the third round of exams ended, only five out of the fifty people remained. At this moment, the moon was already shining brightly, accompanied by a gentle night breeze. Apart from Fu Li, the remaining four people comprised of the fifth disciple Wei Cang of the Qing Xiao Sect, the second disciple Zhong Ze of the founder of the Fields Sect, Daoist priest Qing Xu of the Lin An Monastery, and a yellow pond turtle yao. The Lin An Monastery had some connection to Chu Yu, as the monastery had been built on the former site of the Chang An monastery. Thus, Chu Yu could be considered an honorary elder of the Lin An Monastery. In addition, Wei Cang of the Qing Xia sect was Zhang Ke’s senior brother from the same sect. It was said that he had entered the sect based on his identity as a yao cultivator. The yellow pond turtle was also on friendly relations with Lin Gui and was an expert at divination. If they were to really discuss background, Fu Li was probably the one with least background among them. Those who could make it to this round were all well-known figures among the younger generation in the cultivation world. Seeing their faces filled with youthful energy, Fu Li’s old face couldn’t help reddening. Was this considered bullying children? “All five of you performed very well, thank you for...;” Chao Yun hadn’t finished her statement when a rumbling sound echoed from the horizons all of a sudden. It resembled thunder, yet also sounded like the roar of some creature. A sense of foreboding rose in her heart and she hurriedly turned to look at Zhuang Qing. Zhuang Qing looked up. With a wave of his sleeves, the ceiling turned transparent, revealing the roiling black clouds in the sky to everyone at the competition venue. The entire sky seemed like it was about to collapse. Fortunately, it was already very late at night and many people had already gone to bed. Even if they heard the sound, the most they would do was assume that it was thunder. The strangely monstrous appearance of a gigantic bird flashed within the clouds. Due to her exposure to a regent’s qi as well as her profound cultivation, Chao Yun could faintly make out this large bird’s strange appearance. A snake’s tail, more than one pair of wings, and...; three feet? Could it be the Golden Crow? Ever since she joined the management bureau, there had constantly been many yaoguai and human cultivators wreaking havoc, but their looks, cultivation, and skills were all commonplace. She had never once encountered this sort of ancient-looking yao cultivator. Recalling the ancient fiend Zhuyan that her colleague had captured a few days ago, the unease in Chao Yun’s heart intensified even further. These ancient yaoguai hadn’t appeared in the human world for many years, yet they had appeared time after time this year. Was this a coincidence or an omen? “This bird seems to have three feet. Could it be the legendary...; three-legged Golden Crow?” Chu Yu swallowed a mouth of saliva, his throat feeling a little dry. “It’s not the Golden Crow,” Fu Li looked up and meticulously scanned the strange creature in the sky. “The Golden Crow is as bright as the day. It would light up the entire earth as if it were daytime.” “Boss, it’s a call from the national security department,” Lin Gui handed a phone to Zhuang Qing. It would be strange if the national security department didn’t find out about such a large bird in the sky. Zhuang Qing took the phone, spoke a few words, and then hung up. Turning, he glanced at his colleagues. “Set up a barrier.” “Yes.” The sloppy-looking bureau people were incomparably serious at this moment. They moved forward quickly and set up an enormous formation in accordance with their respective positions. At least for a short while, no country or ordinary citizen would realize that there was a large, strange, and extremely ugly bird flying in the sky. In a certain house, a tiny child dazedly got up from the bed to go to the toilet. After returning, he glanced out the window and caught a glimpse of a strange bird circling within the clouds. This image shocked him awake. Upon plastering his face to the window to get a careful look, he realized that it wasn’t a bird at all, but just some odd-looking black clouds. Had he seen wrongly because it was too dark? The child picked up the blanket on the floor and went back to sleep. But for some reason, he dreamt of something extremely scary, making his sleep a very uneasy one. He tossed and turned on the bed yet didn’t wake up. As the bureau people set up the barrier, the remaining five examinees looked at each other, momentarily unsure if they should help or wait for them to return. “The cries of that thing sound a bit strange,” Zhong Ze from the Fields Sect broke the awkwardness between them. “It’s like a mocking sigh, who knows what that’s supposed to mean?” Fu Li suddenly recalled something that the white ape yao on the mountain had told him – at a place called Jingshan, there lived an extremely disgusting-looking bird with a snake-like body, four wings, and six eyes. It seemed to be called...; Suanyu? The white ape had been most fond of telling him about the more frightening great yao outside. There were some that he could no longer recall, but he remembered the Suanyu because the description of its appearance had truly been too nauseating. Terrible things would occur where the Suanyu appeared. If it was severe, the place would overflow with evil qi. If the effect was light, people would encounter frightening things in their nightmares. “Boss!” Chu Yu flew in front of Zhuang Qing. He wore a grave expression on his pale face. “I remember the Zhuyan saying that the yao emperor has two pairs of wings and a body as large as a mountain. Could this strange bird...; be the yao emperor?” “How could that be possible!” Xu Yuan’s complexion wasn’t much better than Chu Yu’s. She looked down at the city ablaze with lights beneath the clouds. Cold sweat seeped out of her palms. If it was truly the yao emperor, how many people would be afflicted with suffering? It was unknown if she was trying to console herself, or if she truly felt that it wasn’t the yao emperor, but Xu Yuan’s voice was a bit sharp. “The Zhuyan said that the yao emperor has a body of golden fur, eyes as big as the moon, a nose like that of a divine ox, feet like red clouds, a body as huge as a mountain, and a hiss that can shake mountains and rivers. This yao has a snake-like body, where’s the golden fur?” “The Zhuyan hasn’t seen the yao emperor, what if his description was riddled with errors?” Chu Yu spoke while increasing the pace at which he weaved the barrier. He smiled bitterly. “If this is really the yao emperor, I’m afraid we’ll have to fight to our deaths.” The air seemed somewhat chilly. Xu Yuan’s face was as pale as snow. “We cannot lose...;” More than twenty million people lived in this city. They couldn’t afford to lose. Chu Yu lowered his head and looked at the scene below his feet as well. This city’s night scene was very beautiful; the twinkling lights were as pretty as the milky way. The barrier was very quickly formed, encompassing a vast stretch of the sky. All the various airlines received an emergency notification stating that nasty weather conditions had appeared in the sky above the capital, so airplanes were to temporarily avoid using the air routes into the capital. Several commercial planes didn’t believe this and ended up circling the area in confusion after flying into the capital’s air space. They then flew back out. There were even pilots who felt that this situation was a little odd. Why was flying in so difficult but flying out so easy? But there were no strange weather condition that pilots had never seen before, so this thought merely flashed across their minds before it was very quickly forgotten. “Boss, the barrier has been completely set up. The country has also notified other relevant departments. What should we do now?” The weapon Chao Yun was holding in her hand was a lotus sword. It was rumored that the empress she had accompanied in those years was a believer of Buddhism. Therefore, she had let a craftsman engrave the image of a lotus flower on her Feng hairpin. Following the demise of the empress, the magic weapon Chao Yun carried in her human form was a sword with a lotus pattern. “Don’t act rashly,” Zhuang Qing glanced at the strange bird flapping its wings in the clouds. “The intentions of this yao beast are not clear, I’ll scout it out first.” He took off his branded suit and prepared to change into his dragon form. A fair hand pulled on the sleeve of his shirt, causing several deep wrinkles to form on his sleeve. Zhuang Qing instantly looked back. It turned out Fu Li had approached him soundlessly. “Mr Fu, what is the meaning of this?” Zhuang Qing pulled his sleeve back and turned his head, continuing to examine the strange bird. He was clearly ready to transform into his original form at any moment and engage the strange bird in a fight. “This strange bird might be the Jingshan’s Suanyu bird. The number of years it has lived is more than ten times yours,” Fu Li sighed. As an old yaoguai who had even applied for special welfare, he had no choice but to stand forward. Although the Suanyu’s smooth snake body was goosebump-inducing, he couldn’t possibly let a minor challenge a great yao at such a moment. If he had known such a thing would occur this day, he wouldn’t have worn his new clothes. It would be a waste if they ended up damaged from the fight. “Wait, what are you doing?” Zhuang Qing saw Fu Li preparing to put the strange bird in its place and hurriedly stopped him. “This is our management bureau’s issue...;” “Every person has a responsibility to care for minors,” Fu Li patted Zhuang Qing on the shoulder. “Little children shouldn’t interrupt when grownups do things.” Minor...; Who? Zhuang Qing ordered with a straight face, “Nobody’s allowed to be absent-minded. Guard the barrier well. Make sure not to let anything from the Suanyu fall into the human world.” The management bureau’s employees felt that they seemed to have heard something they shouldn’t have. “Yes!” “Suanyu, Suanyu...;” The Suanyu spun around in the clouds. He had merely slept for a few thousand years, so why had the whole world completely changed? The humans now had money to place night pearls everywhere. Who knew where all these strange light beams came from? The way they shook back and forth in the air made him dizzy. He had simply awakened from his sleep due to hunger and wanted to go to the sea to eat some sea creatures but ended up dizzy from all the strange lights. If this were the past, all he had to do was emit a sound in the sky and little yao or humans would be automatically sent up as offerings. As long as he was willing to leave, the humans were willing to give him any kind of food. But he had been turning about in the air for a good half day now, and not only had no human come to kneel and worship him, there was not even a single yao in sight. Could the humans and little yao become more daring during the time he was sleeping? The Suanyu glanced towards the ground. The splendid lights on the ground irritated his six eyes till tears dripped from them. He used one pair of wings to hurriedly cover his eyes as he flew a distance towards the upper layers of the clouds. What kind of terrifying magic weapon was that to emit such bright light? “Is this Jingshan’s King Suanyu?” As long as it was a yao with some fame, adding the title of ‘king’ would never be wrong. The Suanyu released his front wings. He looked around for a very long time before finally finding a person behind a cloud. His six eyes blinked, and human speech came out of his mouth. “That’s me, who are you?” “This humble one is a little yao from Weishui,” Fu Li replied courteously. “May I ask what the King is here for?” “Weishui?” The Suanyu who had little sense of direction pondered over it for a while but was still at a loss as to where Weishui was. “You little yao are quite discreet. Quick, quick, hand this king the offerings.” “The king might be unaware, but the humans of today no longer give offerings to yao cultivators. It would be best for you to leave quickly,” Fu Li looked at the Suanyu with hazy, teary eyes, and did a ‘please’ gesture. “What?!” The Suanyu raged. “How hateful are the humans? It’s fine if they don’t give this king any offerings, but they even used magic weapons to blind this king’s eyes. I need to go down and give them a scare; I’ll let them know just how powerful I am.” He refused to believe this. In the past, as long as he appeared, he didn’t have to do anything and the humans would kneel and bow to him in hopes that he would leave as soon as possible. No matter how daring the humans today had become, they were still human. There was no way they were more powerful than him. “King,” Fu Li stood in front of the Suanyu. “You should go back.” “I won’t,” The Suanyu’s eyes blinked again and again. “I want to scare them to death.” Fu Li felt uncomfortable all over just from seeing his smooth body. Coupled with the Suanyu’s six simultaneously blinking eyes, Fu Li couldn’t help but turn his head to the side to avoid facing him directly. “King, you haven’t been in the human world for a very long time and may not be aware of the customs of the humans today. Nowadays, they promote the belief in science, and oppose feudalistic superstitions.” “What are feudalistic superstitions?” “Our existence is feudalistic superstition.” “Preposterous!” The Suanyu was so furious that his tail nearly slammed into the barrier. “This king will give them something to look at.” He was about to shut his eyes and rush down, but he hadn’t even flown far when his wings were held back. “Little yaoguai, release me, if not I’ll eat you!” The Suanyu opened its mouth, revealing sharp teeth. “This king has gone hungry for a few thousand years. Padding my stomach is my current concern.” How could Fu Li really let it rush out? If he really allowed him to rush out of the barrier, everyone in the city would probably have nightmares tonight. The supernatural newspaper would then have content to write about tomorrow. Seeing that Fu Li was still unwilling to let go, the Suanyu bit at Fu Li with snake-like flexibility. With its overly large body, the image of it opening its mouth resembled a gigantic shark wanting to swallow a tiny fish; biting Fu Li to death should be a matter of ease. Fu Li hadn’t expected the Suanyu to want to eat him the moment they disagreed. Fortunately, he reacted quickly. He did a backflip instantly, both feet landing heavily on the Suanyu’s back. The Suanyu released an anguished howl, scattering the clouds nearby. The Suanyu might not be an expert at combat, but as an ancient great yao, he still had a survival trick. He opened his mouth and spat out green smoke, which flew straight towards Fu Li. If yaoguai were struck by this sort of confusion smoke, they would lose their rationality and obediently become the Suanyu’s prey. During those years, the Suanyu had eaten many great yao by relying on this method. But he had underestimated Fu Li’s abilities. Watching Fu Li fly directly towards him without evading the smoke, the Suanyu inwardly mocked this little yao for being too green and not being aware of the might of the skill he was adept at. However, Fu Li passed through the green smoke without fainting, not did he reveal any signs of confusion. On the contrary, he fished out a fan and fiercely swatted the Suanyu’s face with it, immediately putting the Suanyu in such pain that tears overflowed from his eyes. The Suanyu gave a shrill cry, the sound piercing through the clouds. With a flip of his body, his three claws widened, and he attacked Fu Li ruthlessly. “B-Boss!” Chu Yu listened nervously to the movements in the clouds. “Has the f-fight started up there?” Zhuang Qing’s face was calm. He took out an ornament, changed it into a divine sword, and flew into the depths of the clouds. Chu Yu watched the clouds with alarm. After less than three seconds of hesitation, he took out his own weapon and rushed ahead as well. Fu Li had saved him from the claws of the painted skin ghost. Now that his benefactor was facing difficulties, he could not remain still despite his fear of death. “Ning Xuan, let’s assist them in the fight,” Chao Yun flew up, sword in hand. Ning Xuan, Zhang Ke, and Lin Gui were slightly closer to the area. They glanced at one another and rushed up. “Suanyu, Suanyu...;” The Suanyu’s piercing cries were dripping with yao qi. Its killing intent brought with it a slight breeze that blew straight into everyone’s hearts. The closer they got, the louder and more resounding the strange bird’s cries were, while the fear in everyone’s hearts grew even heavier. Zhuang Qing puffed out a breath and the layers of clouds blocking everyone gradually dispersed. The Suanyu’s enormously ugly body was revealed to everyone. “Suanyu!” Before everyone could react, they saw this Suanyu bird shrieking mournfully as its entire body was thrown out by something before it was mercilessly dragged back. Its immense head slammed against its snake tail, producing a loud thumping sound. Chu Yu looked over with rapt attention and saw Fu Li lifting one of the toes on the Suanyu’s claws, tossing it back and forth. This Suanyu...; was actually an inflatable toy, right? Or was their understanding of certain things flawed? Fu Li realized that Zhuang Qing and the rest had come over. Thus, he flung the Suanyu towards the clouds and smiled guilelessly. “Fortunately, the Suanyu wasn’t very good at fighting. I’ll be in trouble otherwise.” He kicked the Suanyu’s tail. “What matter can’t be discussed nicely? Eating people and yao at the drop of a hat, wanting offerings the moment you open your mouth – this kind of behavior is not good. Which person doesn’t put in effort for their food?” In trouble? Everyone looked at the feathers fluttering everywhere and silently put away their favorite magic weapons they had been holding in their hands. T/N: I’ve changed the term of address ‘Dragon King’ to ‘Dragon Lord’. This change should be reflected in the earlier chapters. Sorry for the change, I have no idea why I thought it made sense for them to be casually throwing the title of king around &gt;.&lt; Seeing that everyone was silent, Fu Li looked down at the Suanyu sprawled on the floor playing dead. He beckoned to Zhuang Qing. Everyone simultaneously turned to look at Zhuang Qing, the word ‘minor’ inadvertently surfacing in their minds. Pretending not to have seen his colleagues’ gazes, Zhuang Qing strode over to Fu Li with his long legs and asked expressionlessly, “What?” “Your dragon clan lives in the water all year round, so you should be very good at catching fish?” “I live in the human world most of the time,” Zhuang Qing kept his divine sword. He reached out and caught a feather fluttering in the sky. The feather in his palm very quickly turned into a wisp of black smoke, vanishing into nothingness. As the fated dragon of the nation, Zhuang Qing possessed virtuous and auspicious qi, and was the nemesis of evil beasts like the Suanyu. “Forget it then,” Fu Li looked at the Suanyu’s teary and snot-filled face and turned his head in disgust. With a wave of a hand, all the fluttering feathers gathered in his palm as if they had grown eyes. As Fu Li was stuffing the feathers into a sackcloth bag, he noticed that everyone was still looking at him. He paused. “Can I take these?” “Yes yes yes,” Everyone nodded in unison. They wouldn’t have any objections even if he said that this Suanyu was his pet, much less him gathering a few feathers. “That’s good then.” Fu Li joyfully placed the sackcloth bag into his Qiankun Pouch before turning and speaking to the Suanyu, “Change into your human form, I’ll take you out to eat.” The Suanyu’s tail trembled. Tears overflowed from his six large eyes as he remained motionless. Fu Li asked, “You can’t change into a human form? Or do you want me to help you?” The Suanyu’s body shook and he rolled on the ground, turning into a simple-looking bald man. The wound on his face made him appear a little pitiful. The clothes he was wearing were identical to those on Fu Li. With a plop, he kneeled in front of Fu Li and offered Fu Li a Qiankun Pouch. “King!” In the yao world, those who lost to other yao would either have their yao core taken or have to obediently offer up all their treasures and respectfully address the other party as boss. A bad life was better than a good death; for the sake of protecting his little life, the Suanyu was extremely tactful. “What are you kneeling for? It’s not fashionable in this new society to kneel here and there,” Fu Li pulled the Suanyu up from the ground. “Got it, boss,” The Suanyu obediently stood behind Fu Li, looking exactly like a junior who obeyed whatever his boss said. In the bureau’s staff canteen, the Suanyu sobbed while holding up the rice bowl and digging into the food as if his life depended on it. Everyone in the bureau silently watched this legendary evil yao eat pitifully, suddenly feeling as if the mysterious veil surrounding the ancient great yao had been torn apart. The person in charge of managing their meals was a ghost cultivator. In the past, he was the top chef in the imperial palace’s kitchen. After his death, he became a ghost cultivator through a fortuitous opportunity. He had been with the bureau these few years and was most dissatisfied with the cultivators’ tendency of not eating their meals on time just because they could abstain from food. After several tens of bowls of rice had entered his stomach, the Suanyu looked timidly at Fu Li and put down the large scoop. “Full?” Fu Li asked. The Suanyu touched his stomach. “Not as hungry now.” Fu Li, “...;” “I’ve already informed the security department about the Suanyu. He’ll live at the bureau for now.” Zhuang Qing asked the Suanyu, “Do you have any objections?” The Suanyu ignored him, merely turning to look at Fu Li. Fu Li coughed dryly. “His name is Zhuang Qing. He’s in charge of managing us yao, so you can discuss any concerns you have with him.” “Boss Zhuang,” The Suanyu turned his face and directed a fawning smile at Zhuang Qing. “As long as the boss has no objections, I’ll listen to anything you say.” Everyone:<i> Bootlicker! Shameless!</i>  Due to this unexpected incident, the sky was about to turn bright by the time everything was settled. The management bureau provided the five examinees breakfast before informing them to check on the acceptance outcome five days later. They needed time to evaluate their exam papers. When Fu Li left, nearly every bureau employer went out to send him off. On behalf of the bureau, Chu Yu gave Fu Li a thick red packet, and even used a mobile application to call a taxi for Fu Li. Fu Li was ecstatic k2013; he could finally sit in a real taxi. Without returning home, he directly rushed to work at the hotel, and was even given a fresh, soft, and juicy honey peach by the front-counter lady. As the most popular male security guard in the whole hotel, Fu Li fully experienced everyone’s envy, jealousy, and hate. Zhang Shan nibbled on a dry bun as he snatched half of the peach from Fu Li. “There will be a production team coming to our hotel to film a show today. They’ve rented a luxurious suite on the top floor. The manager arranged for us to go up and guard them. If you meet an artist you like later, make sure not to get excited.” “Oh,” Fu Li nodded. The production team finished decorating the space at half past nine in the morning and prepared to commence filming. Since no media outlet had received the news, their filming progressed very smoothly. The employees of Affinity Moon Hotel had seen all sorts of celebrities and had long since grown accustomed to this. It was only Fu Li who couldn’t quite understand why the actress would break out into exaggerated screeches upon seeing scary creatures. If her fear had reached the pinnacle, then wouldn’t she not even be able to emit a single bit of sound? A short while later, an actor raced into view in the camera lens. He shielded the female lead, rolling and crawling around on the carpet. He cut an extremely sorry figure. One filmed scene later, She Weilong sat along the corridor re-applying his makeup. After seeing Fu Li in a corner, he involuntarily stood up from the chair. The lip gloss drew a long line across the corner of his mouth. “I’m sorry, Teacher She. I didn’t react quickly enough,” Frightened, the makeup artist apologized repeatedly. This She Weilong was very popular recently. He appeared easy to talk to in front of fans but in reality, he was a very high-maintenance male artist. Moreover, he had even more vanity than female artists. “It’s fine, it’s fine,” She Weilong wiped it away casually. He walked over to Fu Li and bowed to him. “Senior, you’re working again today?” Fu Li: ? <i>If he didn’t work, what was he going to eat?</i>  “You must be tired after standing for so long,” She Weilong placed his chair in front of Fu Li. “Please sit, please sit.” “No need. According to the hotel employee’s manual, I will be fined if I sit down at this time,” Fu Li pointed at the surveillance camera. “Continue filming, it’s quite interesting.” She Weilong nodded. “Yes yes yes, senior is right. I will definitely film well.” Since the most popular artist in the film wanted to continue filming, the director was naturally happy to hasten the speed of filming. The director wasn’t sure if it was just his misconception, but he felt that ever since filming started, She Weilong’s terrified expressions were particularly well done, as if there was truly a homicidal maniac chasing after him. However, apart from the production team, there was only a handsome security guard outside of the range of the camera lens. It seemed it was still his good directing and precise explanations that allowed She Weilong to break out his acting skills. Because of the male lead’s unusually good performance, the scenes that would usually take a day to be filmed ended up being completed in half a day. After filming, She Weilong removed his makeup and then went in search of Fu Li. His assistant was somewhat puzzled. “Teacher She, is that security guard a distant relative of yours? It’s not necessary for you to personally deal with such relatives, you can just hand them over to me.” “What distant relative, that is...;” She Weilong paused and used a moisturizing spray on his pointed chin. “That isn’t any ordinary security guard.” “Could he be a rich second generation who deliberately came to be a security guard so he could experience life?” The assistant recalled She Weilong’s politeness and enthusiasm towards the little security guard today and couldn’t help thinking of certain commonly used tropes in television dramas. Given She Weilong’s fawning personality, if he really met with a distant relative from the countryside, he would probably itch to roll his eyelids till they reached the top of his head. How could he be this cordial? “S-something like that,” She Weilong stammered. “He really knows how to have fun,” As a poor person, the assistant felt that he truly couldn’t understand the brain circuits of wealthy people. “Fu Li, it’s been hard on you – only managing to eat now,” The front-counter lady passed the takeaway to Fu Li. Fu Li handed cash to her with a smile, thanking her, “It’s all right, the production team gave us a red packet.” Fu Li carried the boxed meal back to the restroom to eat before continuing to patrol the area he was responsible for. Along the corridor of the sixth floor, he caught sight of a red packet emitting a subtle ominous aura. “Who dropped this red packet?” Zhang Shan, who was with Fu Li, was about to stoop and pick it up when he was stopped by Fu Li. “What’s wrong?” Zhang Shan was confused. “There’s something wrong with this red packet,” Fu Li bent over and picked it up. Upon opening the tiny red packet, he found a ten-dollar bill, a talisman folded into a triangle, as well as a rusted blade. Zhang Shan sucked in a breath. “Fu Li, this thing looks very strange. Quick, throw it away.” “It is indeed a little strange,” Fu Li put the ten-dollar bill into his pocket and opened up the talisman, glancing at it. “This is called a Transfer Fortune Talisman, though it doesn’t transfer good fortune but misfortune or diseased qi. The implication of placing money and metal inside is that they will be given in exchange for good luck. As long as you pick it up and open it, it’ll represent your willingness to exchange luck with him.” “So immoral?” Zhang Shan looked at the talisman and metal in Fu Li’s hand, his whole body feeling somewhat numb. “Then what should someone do if they pick it up by accident?” “Simple, just wrap the money in red paper and then donate it. It’s best for the donation to be double the amount. Remember, the money must not be placed inside your pocket or wallet,” Fu Li tore the talisman to shreds and wrapped the metal in toilet paper, throwing it into the bin. “It’s all right to donate to Daoist temples or charities. Wash your hands clean, stand under the sun for two hours, and there shouldn’t be any major issues.” “Then shouldn’t you quickly take leave and donate the money...;” “Oh, it’s okay for me to pick it up and spend it,” Fu Li patted his pocket. “The witness will have a share as well. I’ll buy two popsicles later after work and give you one.” “Fu little Li, those words you said just now was meant to fool me, right?” Zhang Shan reached out to grab Fu Li’s shoulder, wanting to snatch the money in his pocket. “What transferring of fortune? You clearly just want to snatch the red packet. Make sure you buy five slices of cake for me, not any less.” Fu Li was all smiles as he covered his pocket, preventing Zhang Shan from snatching it. After work, Zhang Shan and Fu Li went to the nearby market and bought two frozen treats to eat before heading to their respective homes. Midway, Zhang Shan saw a tiny packet wrapped in red paper on the ground. For some reason, he recalled Fu Li’s words. After a moment of hesitation, he fished out a few pieces of paper from his pocket and wrapped them around his hands. Stooping over, he picked up the red packet and threw it into the nearby dustbin. He was a good man who wouldn’t bend over for a scant benefit. At the bureau, the Suanyu had finished eating eight bowls of rice and was seated obediently in front of everyone, ready to answer everyone’s questions. “How long have you slept?” Lin Gui opened up the form for archiving and started to record his data. “I don’t know,” The Suanyu shook his head. “Before I slept, the clan of the king on the ground seemed to have the surname of Ji.” “Zhou dynasty?” Lin Gui filled in ‘approximately 3000 years’ on the form. “Why did you suddenly wake up after sleeping for so long?” Seated at the side, Chu Yu continued asking, “Were you summoned by something?” “What summon?” Confusion was written all over the Suanyu’s face. “It’s not like I’m a dragon or Fenghuang who needs to show their face every few days and play the role of a mascot. Maybe it’s because I slept too long and got hungry?” After finishing his statement, he shot a smile at Zhuang Qing, who was seated at a corner. “I was talking about other dragons, not you.” Zhuang Qing’s eyelids rose a little. He didn’t speak. “Have you heard of the legend of the yao emperor?” Chu Yu continued questioning him. “What is the yao emperor?” The Suanyu was at an even greater loss. <i>Did their yao race have such a thing?</i>  “It refers to the emperor of your yao race.” “What is an emperor of the yao race? Aren’t emperors for humans? What does it have to do with us yao?” The Suanyu looked at Chu Yu in bewilderment. <i>He had merely taken a nap, so why was it that after he woke up, he couldn’t understand the words of all these yaoguai?</i>  “The term ‘emperor’ originated from Qin Shihuang,” Zhuang Qing shot a glance at Chu Yu and Lin Gui. “Both of you, go back and study the high school history textbook.” Chu Yu, Lin Gui, “...;” Upon confirming that he hadn’t answered wrongly, the Suanyu heaved a sigh of relief. Turning, he asked Zhuang Qing, “You guys want to ask who was the strongest in our yao race at that time?” Zhuang Qing raised his chin, indicating for the Suanyu to continue speaking. “There were quite a few well-known fiends at that time,” The Suanyu grinned in embarrassment. “I’m not good at fighting, so I never dared to appear before all the great yao. It was said that the Qiongqi, Kunpeng, Taotie, and Taowu, and so on were all quite powerful.” “The Qilin, Fenghuang, and dragons weren’t considered powerful?” Lin Gui wasn’t very convinced. “They’re divine beasts with innate auspicious qi. They’re different from us fiends,” The Suanyu stole a glance at Zhuang Qing. “Several thousand years ago, the Kunpeng even ate dragons. After that, for some unknown reason, all these great yao gradually withdrew from worldly affairs. As someone with little courage who saw that King Qiongqi and Kunpeng weren’t coming out, I felt that something wasn’t right, so I simply filled my stomach and went to sleep. Perhaps those great yao would have returned by the time I woke from my sleep.” Lin Gui and Chu Yu’s gazes met. In each other’s eyes, they saw a tinge of alarm. However, ever since the start of the Zhou dynasty, records of yao had increasingly dwindled. In the early periods, there were still legends of dragons and Fenghuang, but even these decreased later on. “Don’t doubt me, I’m saying the truth.” The Suanyu thought that they weren’t convinced and hurriedly spoke, “Actually, it’s not just the fiends who withdrew from worldly affairs. Even auspicious creatures like the Baize, Qilin, Fenghuang, and Dangkang vanished. With my weak combat ability, how would I have the guts to go out?” “Then why did you dare to come out now?” “I didn’t want to either. When I woke up, my stomach was growling so badly I couldn’t stand it. Also, there were many people singing and dancing above my head. I don’t know who was singing those songs, but they weren’t tastefully chosen. Their voices were so loud, and they just kept singing those few songs. It was so terrible to listen to that I nearly couldn’t stop myself from turning over,” The Suanyu felt a bit aggrieved. “I endured it for almost two months, but couldn’t stand it any longer last night, so I snuck out while it was still dark.” Chu Yu, “...;” <i>So, he was woken up by square dancing?</i>  “A mountain-like formation in a park at Sanjin collapsed last night. Fortunately, no one was injured,” Xu Yuan pushed open the door and walked in with her phone in hand. At a certain corner of an online media outlet, there was indeed a piece of news on the collapse of a certain mountain-like formation in a park at Sanjin. But to netizens, this sort of news had no appeal at all. There wasn’t even a single comment. An open-air party was held at that park yesterday night. More than ten thousand people had reportedly been at the party. It seemed this Suanyu’s temper was quite good. Despite being disturbed to that extent, he had still endured it till late at night when there was no one around to crawl out. At this moment, Chu Yu and Lin Gui had some sympathy for him. If the people at this park had encountered the Zhuyan instead of the Suanyu, the consequences would be unthinkable. T/N: I’ve done up a list of mythological creatures! For easy access, it will be linked on the contents page. Just as everyone thought that the questioning was coming to an end, Zhuang Qing abruptly fixed his gaze on the Suanyu. “You’re lying.” The Suanyu’s entire body stiffened. His gaze was a little evasive. “I-I’m not lying.” “What you said might be true, but you left out some of the facts,” Zhuang Qing walked over and stood beside the Suanyu. He reached out a hand and tapped the table in front of the Suanyu. The table was made out of real wood, yet it emitted a dull sound upon the rapping of Zhuang Qing’s fingers. The Suanyu stared at Zhuang Qing’s slender fingers, his head dipping even further. “There’s murderous qi on you. Even if you didn’t eat any humans in your earlier years, there is a possibility that you’ve killed other yao,” Zhuang Qing circled the Suanyu. The Suanyu unconsciously drew his arms towards his ribs. “But all this occurred several thousand years ago, there’s no benefit in pursuing it any further,” Zhuang Qing watched the Suanyu secretly heave a sigh of relief before changing the topic. “But a fiend who was worshiped by humans and even recorded in the humans’ ancient texts would not endure human noise underground for so long. What are you apprehensive about?” Only then did the bureau’s people see the light. They had been fooled by the Suanyu’s simple and honest appearance. This was a famous fiend who had even been worshiped by humans, how could it have tolerated the humans’ unbridled behavior? Unless, he had misgivings. <i>Were the yaoguai now...; all so scary?</i> Subjected to the stares of so many pairs of eyes, the Suanyu shook his head unceasingly. “I can’t say it.” “En?” Zhuang Qing stretched out a hand, divine sword already in hand. “Speak nicely if you have something to say, how can you break out into violence the moment there’s a disagreement? The Suanyu was already aware that he wasn’t a match for Zhuang Qing. “I can still consider it.” Fifteen minutes later, the Suanyu who said he would ‘consider it’ honestly voiced the truth he had concealed. “Heavenly law doesn’t tolerate the existence of great yao in this world,” The Suanyu swallowed. “I once saw with my own eyes a Feiyi suddenly melting under strong sunlight, as well as a great yao who suddenly contracted an incurable disease, causing it to rot. In the end, that great yao suffered till its death. What fiend? What auspicious beast? When the time comes, we are merely sacrificial victims of heavenly law.” “Isn’t it said that a Feiyi would bring about terrible drought? Why would such a great yao fear strong sunlight?” A chill wracked Chu Yu’s entire body. Suddenly, he recalled the yao-beating whip Fu Li had lent to the management bureau. According to senior Fu Li, the yao-beating whip had landed in his hands because two great yao had died from thunderbolts in the midst of their fight. “I thought of a creature,” There was a slight tremble to Xu Yuan’s voice. “Dinosaurs.” During the Jurassic period, dinosaurs were the hegemons of the whole world, just like the humans today. Yet now, other than a few fossils that served as proof of their existence, who had ever seen their true appearance? <i>If the ancient yao race ended up as such, then what about them humans...;</i>  <i>Would they one day tread the same path as the dinosaurs and ancient yao race, vanishing within the long river of history?</i>  “What are dinosaurs?” The Suanyu looked at Zhuang Qing in confusion. “Relatives of your dragon clan?” “Our boss doesn’t have such old relatives,” Chu Yu patted the records in his hands. “Tell us about the great yao in the past. Are there any great yao who had a pair of wings on its back, a body of golden fur, eyes as big as the moon, a nose like that of a divine ox, feet like red clouds, a body as huge as a mountain, and a hiss that can shake mountains and rivers?” “There are many great yao who fit those conditions individually, but for a great yao to have all of them...;” The Suanyu thought carefully. “Then how ugly would he be?” Speechless, Chu Yu rolled his eyes towards the sky. <i>This Suanyu was also quite shameless.</i><i>When he called others ugly, did he ever think about his own appearance?</i>  <i>Didn’t all these ancient great yao have a bit too much confidence in their looks?</i>  At the Affinity Moon Hotel, Fu Li changed out of his work attire and was on his way out when he was called to a stop by one of the girls at the front counter. “Fu Li, wait a moment, let’s leave together,” The little girl slung her bag over her shoulder and chased after Fu Li. An ambiguous smile appeared on the faces of several workers in the hall. Fu Li didn’t understand. “Our homes are in different directions, how are we going the same way?” The little girl’s face turned red. Her fingers clutched the straps of her bag tightly. “I heard from Zhang Shan that you have some knowledge on the supernatural. I’ve been having nightmares very often lately, and even experienced sleep paralysis. Can you send me home and help me think of a way to resolve it?” Fu Li meticulously examined the girl’s complexion but didn’t discover any bad luck on her. However, a small number of boys these days didn’t follow good examples and would commit bad deeds upon seeing pretty girls. Since it was this late, it would still be safer for her if he sent her back. Thus, he nodded in agreement. “All right.” The little girl heaved a sigh of relief and revealed a brilliant smile. With a distance of two to three steps between them, they walked out of the hotel’s main entrance together. The moon shone brightly in the late August night. The night couldn’t be considered too hot. The little girl stole a look at the good-looking boy beside her and tried very hard to find a conversational topic. “Did you always live in the countryside in the past?” “En,” Fu Li nodded. “This is my first time entering the city.” “It’s fine even if it’s your first time in the city. You’ll gradually get used to it,” The hand clutching the straps of her bag relaxed and then tightened again. “Have your family members ever thought about the kind of girlfriend you should look for?” Fu Li shook his head. “I don’t have family.” “S-Sorry,” The little girl looked upset. “I shouldn’t have spoken to you about such things.” “It’s okay,” Fu Li felt that humans were very likable. Their bodies were clearly very frail, yet they had a miraculous brain and an adorable spirit. The little girl was silent for a moment before taking out a piece of chocolate from her bag. “For you to eat.” A slight flush colored her cheeks. The advertisement said that this chocolate represented the emotion of love. <i>Would Fu Li understand her intentions?</i>  “Thank you,” Fu Li, who practically had zero understanding of the mechanisms behind advertisements, tore open the packaging and swallowed the candy that was so sweet it bordered on greasy. Turning, he saw the little girl’s eyes still fixed on him. “What?” “Nothing.” The little girl tucked her hair behind her ears and pursed her lips into a smile. “I wanted to ask what kind of girl you like.” Fu Li felt that he quite liked most humans, but he wasn’t very sure why this human girl would ask such a question so directly. The little girl was a bit disappointed at not receiving an answer from Fu Li. After walking for a distance, they reached her house. She couldn’t help asking, “Do...;do you think I would be suitable as your girlfriend?” Fu Li hadn’t expected this human to desire to make love with him. He shook his head, replying, “We’re not suitable.” “Why?” Tears welled up in the girl’s eyes. She’d had to muster all her courage before daring to say this statement, so the instant she was rejected, the entire world felt like it was crumbling. “We’re just not suitable. I’ve never thought about spending a lifetime with someone,” Their life expectancy and age differed too greatly; they wouldn’t be happy together. It was similar to how humans admired butterflies for their beauty but would never fall in love with one. In his eyes, these cute humans were akin to beautiful butterflies. The thought of making love with one had never crossed his mind. “You’re very good. You have cute looks and a kind heart. It’s me who doesn’t want to have sexual relations.” “Did I just receive a good person card?” The little girl rubbed her eyes, forcing her tears back. She smiled and chided, “Unless a person is frigid, who wouldn’t have sexual relations throughout their lifetime? Even if you want to reject me, you have to find a nice-sounding reason.” Fu Li, “...;” He was speaking the truth. “I have a registered residence in the capital and I’m an only child. My family’s houses and cars are all mine. You really won’t consider it?” The little girl asked once again. She was already at her baseline. Fu Li continued to shake his head. “How silly are you?” The little girl was both angry and amused. “Another boy might have already agreed.” “Oh...;” Fu Li recalled the words the female lead in a television drama had said when rejecting a man and decided to put it to practical use. “Because I sell my abilities, not my body.” This statement caused the little girl to break out into a smile. “What is this about selling your abilities and not your body, you really are shameless...;” She had just started speaking when someone behind her called her name. She glanced back and saw a wizened, unfamiliar old man who was walking somewhat unnaturally. “Lu Yi.” The old man’s footsteps were unsteady, and his tone of voice contained longing and eagerness, as if the little girl was someone very important to him. Only, his ability to walk wasn’t quite there, so he couldn’t chase after her. Seeing the little girl turn her head, the old man revealed a grin. For some reason, the little girl felt that this old man’s smile appeared a little frightening. Moreover, the way he walked bore some resemblance to the baboons at the zoo. A fear difficult to put into words besieged her heart. “Ignore him,” Fu Li pulled on the straps of her bag. “I’ll send you back.” “O-Okay,” The little girl regained her wits and hastened her pace, walking towards her neighborhood. As she entered the entrance to her neighborhood, she glanced back. That old man was still calling out to her continuously. The shadow reflected on the road resembled a strange monster who was making threatening gestures. “Fu Li, you better rest at my place tonight,” She lowered her voice. “There’s...; something fishy about that old man.” “It’s all right, it’s just an ordinary old man. You can go back,” Fu Li smiled. “I have a strong and sturdy body, why would I be afraid of an old man who can’t even walk steadily? But...;” He wiped the shoulder strap of the girl’s bag. “If someone calls your name late at night or in the early morning, don’t be too quick to respond.” “Okay,” The little girl wanted to say something but hesitated. Thinking that Fu Li didn’t want to get too close to her, she could only enter her neighborhood dejectedly. After walking a distance, she gazed in the direction of the area outside the gate. Both Fu Li and that strange old man were no longer around. Fu Li walked in front while the staggering old man followed him at a moderate distance away. His not-too-quick legs didn’t seem to affect the speed at which he advanced. When Fu Li reached an area without people, he came to a halt and turned to look at the old man who had followed him over. The old man approached him bit by bit. His huge lips made up almost one-third of his entire face. Strands of saliva hung at the corner of his mouth, giving off a faint fishy stench. All of a sudden, the old man’s mouth gaped open. He rose steeply from the ground and lunged at Fu Li’s throat. Fu Li dodged, turned, and thrust out a palm. The old man slammed into the wall and landed on the ground, turning into a black-furred monkey. The monkey crawled up in an attempt to escape, but Fu Li stepped on its tail and picked it up. “Mountain Imp?” Fu Li shook the extremely ugly monkey in his hands. “What did a mountain-dwelling yaoguai like you run out for?” <i>Kacha.</i>  There was movement on the wall. Fu Li looked up and saw someone lying on top of the wall. The two people’s gazes met, and Fu Li lifted the ugly monkey in his hands a little higher. “You wanted to catch this thing?” Ning Xuan leapt off the wall, trussed up the babbling ugly monkey, and then thanked Fu Li. “No need for thanks, are the results of your recruitment out yet?” Fu Li couldn’t stand the smell of the Mountain Imp’s fur, so he used a purification skill on himself and even cordially purified Ning Xuan’s hand. “We’re still evaluating the examination papers. The recruitment this time places a lot of emphasis on combat results, so given your cultivation, you’ll be accepted as long as the results of your written exam aren’t too poor,” Ning Xuan stuffed the Mountain Imp into a sack. “This Mountain Imp moves especially quickly; I’ve been chasing after it since yesterday. Fortunately, he was blind today and coincidentally ran into senior.” As someone whose original form was a sword, Ning Xuan had an innate reverence for great yao with high combat ability. Therefore, he forcibly dragged Fu Li to eat grilled skewers and then took a picture together before contentedly bidding goodbye to Fu Li. While Ning Xuan and Fu Li were blissfully eating grilled skewers, the bureau employees who were in charge of evaluating the exam papers were about to go crazy. Yao cultivators in the cultivation world paid very little attention to cultural lessons. The majority of their answers to the exam questions were in a mess, filled with incorrectly written characters. Huang Can took a sip of concentrated tea and continued to thumb through the next exam paper. The answers written on it were so wrong he didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. What should one do if they encountered evil qi? The correct answer was to sit and meditate, yet ‘wear jade from Mountain Mi’ was written on this paper. What kind of thing was jade from Mountain Mi? This examinee probably had a similar ailment as Ning Xuan and liked to read those messy Xuanhuan novels. What should a yao cultivator do if they were unable to expel a highly toxic poison? The correct answer was to invite someone with profound cultivation to clear their meridians; the poison could be expelled by circulating spiritual qi borrowed from them. However, according to the paper, the answer was to...; consume either a mouse’s ear or Yansuan grass. <i>So, this examinee wasn’t here to take an exam but to make fun of them?</i>  This paper’s answers to questions on handling certain emergency situations in the human world wasn’t too unreasonable. But other than those, any answer to a question related to the cultivation world lacked such common sense that it would put one between laughter and tears. After reading through this exam paper, his spirits lightened. “Old Huang, what are you laughing about?” The colleague beside him saw Huang Can laughing unceasingly. “Did you find a once-in-a-millennium genius?” “Not a genius, but a lover of novels,” Huang Can passed him the exam paper. “The little yao today really have no ambition. Not only are their answers all over the place, they even have an abundance of imagination.” The colleague finished looking through it and laughed along with him. The colleague lamented, “During the times we cultivated to take on a human form, who didn’t conceal themselves for fear of being caught by the Buddhist monks or Daoist priests and losing their lives? Unlike the yao cultivators these days who become internet celebrities, great stars or whatnot. If our management bureau didn’t have rules, there might even be people who earn a living by being a sports celebrity.” The Buddhist and Daoist cultivators in the room raised their eyebrows one after another. “I’m talking about the past, the past! This is a historical legacy and has nothing to do with everyone, please don’t misunderstand,” The colleague hurriedly waved his hands, indicating his innocence. The Buddhist and Daoist cultivators continued evaluating the exam papers with lowered heads, though with pricked ears. “The little yao lead such good lives now. As long as they have intelligence, the Yao Union will protect them. If they can cultivate a human form and aren’t evil, they can receive the good yao identification and a human identity card. As long as they don’t break the laws, they can live their daily lives in a carefree manner,” The colleague shook his head as he handed the exam paper back to Huang Can. “How long has it been? Yet they’ve already forgotten the skills to survive.” “Isn’t that why it’s important for the management bureau and the Yao Union to exist?” Huang Can was quite open-minded. “It isn’t an easy thing for the cultivation world to have the current peaceful days. Everything is fated. There is no basis for envy.” Saying this, he drew a few large crosses on the exam paper and wrote the number 28 in the box for the total score. He had originally wanted to award some points for handwriting and help this examinee to get a round figure. However, the characters were simply too ugly – he had no way of going against his conscience to give out those two marks. Two days later when the acceptance list was placed in front of Zhuang Qing, Zhuang Qing asked one question after glancing at it, “Why is Fu Li not on it?” Fu Li was number one in the combat test, so why had he failed to enter even the top ten? “Maybe...; he scored too badly in the written exam?” Xu Yuan also hadn’t expected Fu Li to fail to make it to the last round. This was truly too comical. Two hours later, Zhuang Qing found Fu Li’s paper among a pile of sealed papers. Upon seeing the total score on the paper, Zhuang Qing was silent. <i>With such ugly handwriting that people couldn’t even look straight at, as well as this kind of exam results, how did Fu Li have the confidence to participate in the university entrance exam and civil servant exam?</i>  <i>By relying on illegal confusion methods?</i>  At this instant, Zhuang Qing finally believed that Fu Li truly was a countryside yao who hadn’t seen the world. He had lived to a ripe old age of 4000, yet he couldn’t even write well. Did he still want face as a yao cultivator? Fu Li’s handwriting was as stiff as a child who had just learnt to write – when put together, every stroke just barely managed to form a complete word. It could be said that there was no sense of aesthetics. Zhuang Qing’s gaze swept across one of the answers to the questions. He was left stunned. Question: How should one increase their cultivation? Answer: Listen to your heart. Breathe in Heaven and Earth’s spiritual qi. Pray to the moon. Absorb the essence of moonlight. Take in the vitality of the Four Seas. There was a huge discrepancy between this answer and the current cultivation methods. However, Zhuang Qing couldn’t draw his gaze away from the phrase ‘breathe in Heaven and Earth’s spiritual qi’. A few hundred years ago, using the identity of a human, he had taken on an official’s post in the imperial court. Due to this, he was able to get close to the archive of books and found many unpublicized ancient texts. Many books were badly damaged and made outlandish, illegal claims, but certain supernatural stories had indeed been recorded in these books. For example, the story of nine-tailed foxes praying to the moon, plants transforming into yao by absorbing the essence of moonlight, bird yao transforming into their human forms during a full moon, and other such sayings. At that time, he felt that these sayings were thought up by human scholars. Yet for some reason, he had always kept them in his heart. Now that he suddenly glimpsed a similar saying written on Fu Li’s exam paper, besides astonishment, he also felt that these methods might truly be the way the ancient yao cultivated. The cultivation methods of that time appeared simple and crude, but embodied reverence towards nature. Strategies made up a greater proportion of modern cultivation methods, so the influence of nature on cultivation naturally decreased as well. As the times progressed, yao and humans also gradually reduced their dependency and reverence towards nature. It was unknown if this was good or bad. “Boss, what’s wrong?” Chu Yu and Xu Yuan had also accompanied Zhuang Qing to search for the exam paper. Seeing Zhuang Qing’s grave expression, Chu Yu thought that he was angered by his benefactor’s written exam results. Thus, he spoke up, “Benefactor might have been cut off from the world for too long. This...; his poor results are pardonable.” Zhuang Qing ignored him. He took out his handphone and dialed Fu Li’s number. Fu Li was currently studying. Even after hearing the phone’s ringtone, he didn’t have much of a reaction. This was because it hadn’t rung ever since its purchase. Only after staring at the handphone for more than ten seconds did he answer the phone. “Mr Fu,” Zhuang Qing placed the exam paper on the desk after Fu Li picked up. “I would like to consult Mr Fu on some things, do you happen to be free at the moment?” Fu Li glanced at the half-memorized &lt;Graduation Form&gt; in his hands. “I’m studying now.” “I’ll only take up a few hours of your time. I’ll drive over and pick you up,” Zhuang Qing’s voice softened a little. “Is that okay?” Hearing the other party’s softer tone, Fu Li recalled that the other party was merely an underaged, parentless dragon. Unable to utter words of rejection again, Fu Li could only nod and reply, “All right.” On the other end of the call, Xu Yuan and Chu Yu looked at Zhuang Qing in shock. <i>What was up with the boss today? He was actually willing to take the initiative to pick someone up, did his heart no longer ache from the petrol cost of a round trip?</i>  “Many thanks,” Zhuang Qing hung up. Noticing his two colleagues staring at him, he handed Fu Li’s exam paper to Chu Yu. “Put this in my office.” “Oh,” Chu Yu nodded. <i>Had his benefactor’s answers taken the boss’ breath away?</i>  “Mouse’s ear?” Xu Yuan’s gaze casually swept over it. Seeing those two words on the paper, she spoke without much thought, “I remember that it was recorded in an ancient text that eating the meat of a mouse’s ear can confer immunity to a hundred poisons. It’s just a pity that after so many years, mice ears that possess such miraculous effects have long vanished.” Chu Yu looked at the answer and couldn’t help sighing with emotion. <i>This was probably the gap in knowledge between the ancient great yao and the new age of yaoguai?</i>  One hour later, Fu Li was seated in a small meeting room in the management bureau. The bureau’s elite were also present. Zhuang Qing handed Fu Li’s exam paper to him. Fu Li took it and glanced at it, asking in puzzlement, “Why do I only have 28 marks?” Zhuang Qing looked at Huang Can. Huang Can stroked his beard and laughed awkwardly. If he had known that the paper was senior Fu Li’s, he would have given a round figure even if he had to have a guilty conscience. For many of the questions he had been marked wrong, Fu Li didn’t feel that he had answered incorrectly. He looked at everyone in suspicion. “I heard them say that people will go through the back door for certain exams nowadays. Have you guys already decided on the candidates internally, and deliberately gave me a low score because my combat test results were good?” Everyone: <i>How much confidence did he have to say such words out loud?</i>  As the person responsible for grading the exam paper, Huang Can made a supreme effort to conceal his nervousness, inwardly telling himself that he could never let Fu Li know that he was the person who had given him the grade. <i>Just think about how Fu Li had flung that Suanyu about like it was a toy, what more a Siberian weasel like himself?</i>  “You’re thinking too much. It’s not our intention to give you a low score. It’s just that your answers aren’t consistent with the current knowledge in the cultivation world,” There was no change in Zhuang Qing’s expression. After inviting Fu Li to take a sit, he continued speaking, “I’ve lived for 1900 years, yet I’ve never seen the essence of moonlight or Yansuan grass, so I’m unaware that they have such miraculous effects.” “Essence of moonlight is a rare thing that comes by only once in a thousand years, it’s normal to not have seen it. But Yansuan grass is very commonly seen, how can you guys not have it?” Fu Li took the exam paper and pointed at his answer. “All the yao cultivators nowadays like to slack off. It’s fine if you don’t pray to the moon, but how can you have the nerve to say that my answer is wrong?” “Praying to the moon isn’t of any use,” Ning Xuan who was fond of reading cultivation novels said in a low voice. “I’ve tried it.” “Then the way you did it must have been wrong. It will only work if you meditate after praying on the night of a full moon,” Fu Li said seriously. “If it can be done so simply, why would we still cultivate?” Ning Xuan abruptly understood. Nodding repeatedly, he fished out a small book and noted this down. “Ai, all you yao these days don’t know anything,” Fu Li sighed helplessly. “What exactly are your seniors doing, why didn’t they tell you anything?” They were completely unlike that white ape on his mountain who constantly jabbered on every day about everything under the sun. If there was something he couldn’t remember, the ape would nag him about it yet another time. Huang Can felt that these words were somewhat familiar. They seemed to have uttered similar words while marking the paper. “As for the Yansuan grass...;” Fu Li dug around in his Qiankun pouch before pulling out a long and slightly strange-looking plant. The dry branch was square-shaped, and there were even small yellow flowers between its leaves. What was most mystical was that despite the number of years the flowers had been in his Qiankun pouch, when Fu Li took it out, it seemed as if it had just been plucked from the earth. “I’ll gift these to you.” <i>The yao nowadays didn’t have it easy. They hadn’t even tasted any good things, no wonder their cultivation was so low.</i>  <i>Did the Yansuan grass capable of detoxifying a hundred poisons look like this?</i> Everyone looked at the strange plant on the table with wide eyes. <i>No, wasn’t the main point the fact that such a precious medicinal herb had been flung onto the table as if it were a weed?</i>  “What’s wrong?” Fu Li observed their shocked expressions as they stared at the table. Thinking that they were worried about there being too little of the medicinal herb to go around, he took out yet another handful of it. “Take these and distribute them amongst yourselves. Come find me for more when you’ve eaten all of them.” “Their cultivation isn’t high enough yet, my concern is that they’ll attract trouble if they bring this sort of rare medicinal herb out,” Zhuang Qing collected all the Yansuan grass and gave each member a few leaves, only leaving a few for the other bureau employees. “Finish those first. It’s still better for the rest to be placed with you, you can give more to them when they need it.” Zhuang Qing shifted his gaze away from the Yansuan grass and stuffed them back into Fu Li’s hands with clenched teeth. Fu Li wanted to say that they weren’t rare items and that he had a huge pile of it. However, the current era was different. Since Zhuang Qing said so, there was definitely a reason for it. With these thoughts, he stuffed the Yansuan grass back into his pouch. Xu Yuan silently stuffed the leaf into her mouth and realized that despite the plant’s strange appearance, the taste was a pleasant meld of sweet and sour. Upon entering her tummy, her body seemed to loosen up; the effects were profound and significant. After coming back to her senses, she stood up and bowed deeply to Fu Li. “Many thanks, senior.” The rest also followed after her to thank Fu Li, especially Huang Can, whose face was so flushed that it could be taken as a red lantern. “Such a minor thing isn’t worthy of thanks,” Fu Li shifted their discussion back to their original topic. “I didn’t answer this question wrongly, right?” “That’s right, that’s right,” Huang Can nodded again and again. Even if Fu Li were to say that the earth wasn’t round and that the sky was round and the ground flat, he would simply nod and agree. This round of yao face-slapping came both quickly and viciously. The shame was so great that he was on the brink of becoming a red-furred weasel. Fu Li glanced at Zhuang Qing from the corner of his eyes. Zhuang Qing took out a red pen from a pen holder and added the marks from the two questions to his score. Afterwards, the people from the management bureau watched on blankly as Fu Li took out oddity after oddity to prove that his answers were correct, and it was them who simply didn’t have these items. By the end of it all, everyone was looking at Fu Li with admiration. With so many good things, why did he need to be a bureau employee or security guard? Just casually selling something to the Pill Refinement Sect would be enough to make him a rich and powerful person in the yao world. “Benefactor, did the yao cultivators in the past all have such good things?” Chu Yu secretly regretted not being born a few thousand years earlier. <i>That was a land brimming with good stuff, a glorious time when divine spiritual grass was as plentiful as dogs.</i>  “Probably,” Fu Li put item after item back into his pouch. “Everybody on our mountain was an unknown little yao, yet we didn’t lack these things. What more of the great yao outside?” “No,” Xu Yuan couldn’t help saying. “How do you distinguish between ‘great yao’ and ‘little yao’?” Great yao like the Zhuyan and Suanyu also fell to him, so she couldn’t help but suspect that Fu Li had some misunderstanding of the word ‘little’. “The original forms of great yao are extremely menacing. In addition, they were created by Heaven and Earth, and possess incomparable divine power since their birth,” Fu Li smiled with embarrassment. “Their original forms are all majestic and awe-inspiring, unlike us who don’t look very pleasing to the eye.” “Then your...;” Xu Yuan nearly inquired about Fu Li’s original form. Fortunately, she recalled that this was an extremely taboo matter and hurriedly suppressed it. “Innate power is merely a momentary thing. Someone such as yourself would be called a brilliant younger generation who surpassed his seniors. You should be given the respected title of ‘great yao’.” A subtle awkwardness appeared on Fu Li’s face, as if he was embarrassed to bring up the status of the past him. “Let’s continue talking about the exam paper.” Seeing Fu Li’s manner, everyone instantly had a clear understanding. It seemed this senior was truly a very ordinary yao cultivator and was even the type with a very unremarkable original form. This was why he was so awkward when they raised the matter of his original form. Everyone exchanged looks. In the future, they absolutely could not mention anything related to original forms in front of Fu Li, so as to avoid putting the other party on the spot. “I’ll send you back,” Seeing the awkward expression on Fu Li’s face, Zhuang Qing stood up. “About the exam paper, our lack of knowledge has inconvenienced you.” “I don’t blame all of you. This is what those humans often term as...;” Fu Li’s expression became a bit more natural. “Generation gap? Is that the term?” Zhuang Qing turned and looked at the others. Everyone else nodded repeatedly. “Yes yes yes. Your words make a lot of sense.” Fu Li revealed a smile. “Humans really are very interesting. The words they create contain a lot of meaning.” The human cultivators present: <i>I-It’s our honor?</i>  As Zhuang Qing drove out of the bureau, he casually asked, “You haven’t eaten lunch, right? I’ll treat you?” “Okay, thank you,” Fu Li nodded. Zhuang Qing squeezed out a stiff smile. “You’re welcome.” He forgot that this was an older yao who didn’t seem to understand human words of courtesy. There were two meat dishes, one vegetable dish, as well as a bowl of kelp soup that the restaurant had given them free of charge. There were several pieces of thinly cut kelp littered sparsely throughout the extremely clear soup that gave off steam. Fu Li caught sight of a pickled vegetable fish dish that a neighboring table had ordered. The smell was extremely enticing. He glanced at the fish and then glanced at Zhuang Qing. Zhuang Qing clutched the menu tightly and remained silent for half a minute before beckoning to the lady boss of the restaurant and adding a small portion of pickled vegetable fish. Although Fu Li professed to be a yao cultivator who had been in deep sleep for nearly two thousand years, he ate in a very sophisticated manner, somewhat like a child of noble lineage. Although, the speed at which he ate wasn’t slow at all. After their meal, the two people walked out and had just reached the carpark when a young fellow suddenly scuttled out from the corner and grabbed a hold of Fu Li’s sleeve, refusing to let go of it. “Big brother, boss!” Zhou Chang gripped tightly onto Fu Li, fearing that Fu Li would escape the moment he relaxed his grip. “This little brother was blind and didn’t understand that you were an able person. Don’t lower yourself to my level.” He stuck a hand into his pocket and fished out a check. “Don’t leave, I must thank you.” Zhou Chang had been searching for Fu Li for a very long time to no avail. The fact that they were able to run into each other despite the size of the capital indicated that they were brought together by fate. “Oh, it’s you,” Fu Li took a few looks at Zhou Chang and recalled that this person had once said his medicine was fake. “There isn’t any issue with my medicine, right?” “No problem, no problem at all!” Zhou Chang released his grip. He filled in a check for two million and stuffed it at Fu Li. “This is a tiny token of appreciation for you. If I offended you in the past, please just treat me as a fart that you released on a whim.” Ever since he invited someone to appraise the effectiveness of the ginseng and brought it back home for his family members to eat, his entire family’s health had improved considerably. His mother had said that eating the medicine he brought back was even more effective than beautifying herself a hundred times, praising him on a daily basis for his ability to handle affairs. The recent treatment he had received at home was almost equivalent to that of the two years after his birth. “Big brother, where are you going now, I’ll send you there,” In Zhou Chang’s eyes, the Fu Li at this time was a golden doll that gave off a lofty radiance. Apart from him, no other person or creature existed. “No need for that,” The ignored Zhuang Qing’s tone of voice was flat. “We drove here.” “Ah, is this handsome brother a friend of big brother?” Zhou Chang observed Zhuang Qing’s imposing and dignified manner, as well as the exquisite clothes he was wearing, and knew that he couldn’t offend such a person. Thus, he retreated and made another plea, “Big brother, can you give me a way to contact you? When you’re free, I’ll definitely express my gratitude to you.” Fu Li turned and asked Zhuang Qing. “What’s my handphone number?” “You haven’t used your handphone?” The tip of Zhuang Qing’s brows raised slightly. Fu Li nodded. Resigned, Zhuang Qing took out his handphone as he commented, “Even if you don’t use the call time given to you every month, it won’t be brought over to the next month.” <i>Wasn’t this making it too cheap for the operations company?</i>  Zhuang Qing found Fu Li’s handphone number and swiftly recited it. Zhou Chang held his handphone and asked cautiously, “Can you repeat it once more?” Zhuang Qing lifted up his eyelids and stared at him. Zhou Chang stammered, “It’s n-not your fault, it’s my brain that’s poor.” Zhuang Qing lowered his eyelids and recited it again at a slightly slower pace. After Zhou Chang was sent off, Zhuang Qing led Fu Li back into the car. The car was driven a distance in silence. When they were at a red light, Zhuang Qing asked, “If I could be so bold as to ask you a question?” Fu Li turned his head, looking at him. “Two thousand years ago, which mountain did you live on?” “The mountain we lived on was lacking in spiritual qi and didn’t have much fame. Whenever our mountain’s little yao went out, they’ll claim to be from Weishui. That way, they’ll have a bit more face,” Fu Li felt somewhat embarrassed upon recalling the lie they had told those years for the sake of bragging. “All you modern yao may not quite understand how much importance the yao cultivators in the past placed on one’s birth, how good one’s followers were, how famous one’s mountain was, and whether one was revered by countless evil yao. If one really didn’t have all these things, then it was still good to link oneself to famous mountains or rivers.” Speaking about the difficult conditions of his past in front of a younger generation caused Fu Li’s face to turn slightly red. “Our cave dwellings were located at Weishui’s river basin. The tall mountains and steep paths there meant that the area was usually desolate, so we never received any offerings from humans.” As he spoke about not receiving any offerings from humans, Fu Li’s face turned so red that blood was on the verge of dripping off it. “Although that was the case, there were many little yao on the mountain, and no one felt that we were poor. The mountain we stayed on didn’t have a name, but the mountain was wrapped in clouds and mist all year round, so we named it Reflecting Mist Mountain. The White Ape said that this name will make our mountain appear a bit more mysterious.” Zhuang Qing thought, <i>who would have expected the yaoguai several thousand years ago to have already started paying attention to style</i>? However, he indeed hadn’t heard of the name ‘Reflecting Mist Mountain’. Nor had this name ever appeared in the ancient texts he had read. “But more than half of the mountain was destroyed a very long time ago due to an incident,” At this point, the gaze Fu Li directed at Zhuang Qing was somewhat profound, seemingly containing a subtle race-based dislike and loathing. “By the time I woke up, the mountain was destroyed and the yao had perished. My past companions had all vanished.” Not expecting him to have such a bitter past, Zhuang Qing couldn’t bear to continue probing. He couldn’t imagine how angry and sad he would be if everything he once had was gone after waking from sleep. “I mustered my courage to ask a yao from the neighboring mountain, and only then found out what exactly had happened.” It had been two thousand years since that incident. Fu Li seemed to have come to terms with his past, yet also seemed to have never walked out from it. This was why he continued to call himself ‘little yao of Weishui’ – what all the little yao of Reflecting Mist Mountain called themselves – even till this day, as if doing so would safeguard his territory and mountain, symbolizing that Reflecting Mist Mountain had not been wiped out. “The yao cultivator said that the azure dragon clan was romping around Weishui, causing countless farmers within the radius of a few hundred kilometers to drown. Our Reflecting Mist Mountain’s yao cultivators can’t bear to see people suffer, and thus went forward to stop them. In the end, even the skeletons of the dead did not survive.” Fu Li’s voice was so tranquil that it bordered on unreal. “In the entire Reflecting Mist Mountain, only me, the little yao personally raised by them to adulthood, had slept through it and survived.” “I apologize, I shouldn’t have asked you about the past...;” Zhuang Qing suddenly remembered that the Zhuyan had also mentioned such an incident. Only, the Zhuyan had talked about another incident – that the azure dragons who created trouble at Weishui had enraged the yao emperor. In the end, some died, and others were injured; they hadn’t had a good end either. Zhuang Qing hastily braked to a stop at the roadside. “Then do you know who killed those few azure dragons?” Fu Li was awoken from his memories. “Oh, it was me.” His tone was too serene, so serene that it seemed as if he was merely purchasing a piece of streaky pork at the food market. “It was you who did that?!” Zhuang Qing stared at Fu Li, looking as if he had found history’s greatest Godzilla. “Didn’t you say you were on bad terms with the dragon clan? Why still so shocked?” Fu Li didn’t understand. “When I went, those azure dragons all had broken horns and injured limbs. Some of them even had their scales plucked out and were floating on the surface of Weishui, unable to move. They were already in such wretched states, yet they still didn’t forget to mock me for being a furry domesticated animal. My deep animosity towards them naturally meant that I felt no shame in hitting them while they were down. I killed some, wounded some, and then hurriedly fled before your dragon race’s reinforcements arrived.” “So what if I have fur?” Fu Li snorted coldly. “Those with no fur are the ugly ones.” “I can only be counted as half a dragon. There’s human blood running through my veins too,” At this time, Zhuang Qing didn’t have the slightest intention of helping to redeem the dragon clan. He specially mentioned his human blood to let Fu Li believe that he wasn’t the same as those deranged azure dragons. But after listening to Fu Li’s words, Zhuang Qing could be certain that the yao emperor the Zhuyan had spoken of had no link to Fu Li. At best, Fu Li could be considered someone who had a stroke of luck. Anyone with some brains would understand that there was no way a yao emperor capable of stirring up wind and rain would diligently study to enter university for the sake of becoming a civil servant. Even the most ridiculous dramas didn’t have the nerve to spin such a plot. If a yaoguai like Fu Li could become the yao emperor, then the entire yao race would probably have gone extinct two thousand years ago. Even then, the azure dragon clan would still be the cause of the destruction. “When I woke up three years ago, I went to take a look at the mountain I once lived on. That mountain had already nearly fused with the mountain beside it. There were even humans selling tourists tickets to view the neighboring mountain ranges,” Fu Li recalled the grand occasion on that day and swallowed his saliva. “At that time, the whole mountain was packed with people. I had never seen so many humans in the many years I’d lived and was so scared that I quickly concealed myself and came back to hide.” Zhuang Qing thought to himself, <i>he had probably encountered the peak period for tourists.</i>  “What was the name of the mountain?” Zhuang Qing felt like his brain must have been submerged in water for him to have asked such a boring question. He started the car and slowly drove forward. “I don’t know what it was called in the past, but you humans seem to call it Qinling now.” Zhuang Qing, someone who had been navigating the human world for 1900 years and had mastered all six of the noble arts, finally had his first car accident in the entirety of his dragon life. He had knocked into a streetlamp. Zhongnan Mountain made up a part of Qinling, while it was hypothesized by many people that Qinling had been termed Kunlun Mountain many years ago. Many supernatural sayings in the land of China had originated from Kunlun. As for the current Kunlun Mountain on maps and books, it was possible that it had no relation to the Kunlun Mountain in the supernatural sayings. This was because the legends surrounding Kunlun Mountain had broken off abruptly during a certain era. Perhaps the mountain had already vanished, or perhaps it was hidden in a location undiscoverable to the living. Zhuang Qing glanced towards the boot of the car. <i>The gem embedded in the car roof hadn’t fallen off, good</i>. He called the insurance company and the traffic police before turning and speaking to Fu Li, “You were actually born on Kunlun Mountain?” “Kunlun isn’t located in the western part of our country, what link does it have to me? Moreover, just because I lived there doesn’t mean that it was my birthplace,” Fu Li was a little doubtful whether Zhuang Qing was truly a dragon who had been a great government official in the imperial court. <i>Why was it that he didn’t even know this little bit of geographical knowledge?</i>  After all that talking, a spoilt car, and him asking a bunch of nonsensical questions, Fu Li was just a stupid four-thousand-year-old yao who didn’t even know the name of the mountain he had lived on. Zhuang Qing unbuckled his seatbelt, nearly angered into laughter. “Luckily you didn’t leave the mountain in the past, otherwise you would even help the people who’d sell you.” Seeing that Zhuang Qing was unhappy once again, Fu Li shook his head. <i>That lousy temper of his really wasn’t charming.</i><i>Besides, his original body wasn’t valuable, who would buy it?</i>  His conversation with Zhuang Qing ended with a minor car accident. Fu Li still needed to rush to work in the afternoon, so he left Zhuang Qing at the scene of the car accident and jogged to squeeze into public transport. Zhuang Qing stood on the spot and watched Fu Li’s tiny body successfully make it onto the public vehicle while clamped between various elderly men and women with herculean strength. He looked back at his own car and stood foolishly at the spot for a long time before coming back to his senses. His heart started to ache for his car. He had probably been angered by Fu Li into stupidity. There should not have been many people taking the bus at this time, but Fu Li happened to have just barely managed to squeeze onto this one, so there were quite a few people on board. The passengers’ expressions were cold and apathetic. Some who saw the elderly boarding leaned their heads against the window and went to sleep. The elderly’s gazes swept across the bus, fixing unrelentingly onto young ladies who were seated. These young ladies had thin skin and thus gave up their seats to them. Some received a grateful word of thanks, while others only received silence. “Little girl,” An elderly woman who had snatched a seat suddenly beckoned towards a young lady. “Come, sit.” Fu Li remembered that it was this elderly woman whose movements were the fastest and whose feet were the most stable when they were boarding the vehicle. By relying on her sturdy physique, she managed to snatch the only seat on the vehicle. He turned and looked towards the young lady the elderly woman had called out to. Her complexion was pale, and she was covering her tummy as if in discomfort. “Thank you,” The young lady uttered a soft word of thanks. She was bent over at the waist, resembling a shrimp that had just been taken off the grill. “No worries, no worries,” The elderly woman’s voice was very loud. The moment she spoke, the entire vehicle could hear her voice. Her complexion was ruddy, and her smiling, plump face wasn’t particularly good looking. She prevented any other elderly person from nearing the young lady’s seat till the young lady alighted. This was why Fu Li constantly failed to understand humans. There were times when they were selfish and refused to let go of even the smallest advantage, but they also had moments of kindness when they were willing to lend a helping hand to strangers. They were not like yao cultivators who were either completely evil or completely kind. There had never been a fiend who was benevolent, nor had there ever been a divine beast who had engaged in wanton slaughter. This was because Heaven had already determined their character and fate at birth. Only humans were capable of having different emotions, overcoming their biological instincts, and accomplishing many things that seemed impossible. Many of the hotel employees didn’t like doing night shifts. To Fu Li, there was no difference in the time he went to work. The night shift was also much more relaxed compared to the day shift. As long as no one in the rooms called for service, he could sit in the restroom and quietly read books save for the need to patrol once every hour. The night shift today was no different from the previous days – nothing special had happened. He was holding onto a geography textbook and reading it with keen interest. It turned out that there were so many countries in the world and so many interesting places. When he went on vacation, he had to visit all these different places. Zhang Shan walked into the restroom. Seeing Fu Li reading once again, he couldn’t help yawning. “It’s the middle of the night, why are you reading again? Aren’t you sleepy?” “Slept for too long, so I’m not sleepy,” Fu Li replied. “This book is quite interesting.” “Someone who could call a geography textbook interesting probably has an obsession with studying,” Zhang Shan fished out his handphone and put on earphones. “Little Fu, I’m not being naggy. You can read at any time; it’s already the middle of the night, let your eyes rest for a while. No matter how handsome the man, having four eyes will reduce their good looks to some degree.” “It’s fine, my eyesight has always been the same.” Fu Li watched Zhang Shan play with his handphone and asked curiously, “Are handphones so fun?” “Of course they’re fun. A life without a handphone is no different from being a salted fish,” Zhang Shan walked over to Fu Li and held out his handphone to him. “During the past two days, a super glutton appeared on the internet. When he livestreams, he eats a huge pile of food, and even eats all of it with relish.” Fu Li looked at the bald man in the video. “...;” <i>Wasn’t this the Suanyu?</i>  “He’s streaming live even in the middle of the night?” Fu Li couldn’t resist asking. “Don’t you think that’s strange?” “What part of it is strange? The super gluttons nowadays livestream a lot. Although it’s obvious in the latter half that the other super gluttons are struggling to hold on, this brother is a talent who can eat with gusto from start to end. Watching him eat makes me hungry as well.” <i>Of course he could eat with gusto</i>. It was said that the Suanyu had eaten a hundred cows and hundred sheep in one mouth in those days. Just this pile of food wasn’t even enough to fill the cracks in his teeth. “Watching him is making me hungry.” Zhang Shan logged out from the livestreaming platform and told Fu Li, “I’ll order two portions of takeout. What do you like to eat? I’ll treat you.” “I’ll just have the same as you.” Half an hour later, knocks sounded on the door to the restroom. Fu Li opened the door and saw a delivery boy wearing a safety helmet. The two people’s gazes met, and the delivery boy exclaimed in happiness, “Big brother.” He took off the safety helmet, revealing a head of green hair. “I didn’t expect this to be takeout ordered by big brother, make sure to give me a good review later,” The green-haired yao glanced inside the room. Seeing that there was a human present, he suppressed the excitement on his face. “Is that your colleague?” He carefully examined Fu Li’s clothes. <i>It seemed to be a security guard’s uniform?</i>  <i>His big brother was so amazing and was even on good terms with the captain of the management bureau, yet he was reduced to being a security guard? Those bureau people were also too impartial. They didn’t even know how to take care of their own people. The least they could do was find him a decent job.</i>  “Come in and sit for a while. It’s about to rain.” Fu Li took the takeout boxes and explained to Zhang Shan, “This is my friend.” “Big brother, I’m called Ying Lu.” He didn’t doubt Fu Li’s claim that it would rain. He flashed a simple smile at Zhang Shan. “You can just call me Little Green.” Zhang Shan, “...;” There was ‘green’ in his name, and his hair was also a lush green. It seemed he had a deep love for the color green. However, Zhang Shan had a straightforward personality. Upon hearing that the green-haired yao was Fu Li’s friend, he cordially invited him to sit before opening up the takeout boxes. All three of them sat around the table and dug in. They hadn’t even taken a few mouths when the gurgling sound of water could be heard outside the windows. It had started raining. “This year has been an unusual one – it’s been raining quite a bit more than usual. There was even hail a few days ago that damaged the electric car I parked outside,” Zhang Shan picked up some crispy fried intestines with his chopsticks and swallowed it. He spoke to the green-haired yao, “Brother, you’re lucky you didn’t leave at this time. If not, the rain will turn you into a drowned rat.” “Nothing will go wrong as long as I listen to big brother’s words,” The green-haired yao looked at Fu Li with shining eyes. <i>Big brother was really worthy of being his big brother. For him, telling the weather was as simple as blinking.</i>  Zhang Shan had never seen anyone who kissed up to someone else to this extent. Ever since this fellow calling himself Ying Lu entered the room, he had just been praising Fu Li in all sorts of fanciful ways. Even him who was listening from the corner couldn’t help turning red, yet the two people involved didn’t seem to feel an ounce of shame. One of them dolled out praises in an increasingly shameless manner, and the other listened without any change in expression – both of them were talents. “I’ll go upstairs to patrol, you guys can take your time to eat,” Fu Li put down his chopsticks, rinsed his mouth with water, and left through the door. Ying Lu was entertaining in conversation, so there was no need to worry about the atmosphere turning awkward even if Fu Li wasn’t around and he was unfamiliar with Zhang Shan. Upon leaving the restroom, Fu Li felt that the temperature along the corridor was a little on the low side. The light indicating the safety exit gave off a faint green light. The entire corridor was so quiet that it was scary. He headed upstairs through the safety passage and proceeded to patrol level after level. The corridors of guest floors were softly carpeted, so almost no sound was produced when treading on it. At the corner, the lift door opened all of a sudden. No one was inside. Fu Li had just finished checking this floor, so upon seeing the lift door open, he walked in. <i>Ding.</i>  He had pressed the button for the first floor, but strangely, the lift stopped for half a minute on every floor before continuing its descent. In the security guards’ restroom, Ying Lu and Zhang Shan were chatting with concentrated attention when knocks suddenly sounded on the door. Zhang Shan put down his chopsticks and muttered, “Did little Fu forget to bring his keys?” “Wait,” Ying Lu stared at the door for three seconds. “You step back, I’ll open it.” Seeing caution written all over Ying Lu’s face, Zhang Shan unconsciously retreated a few steps. Ying Lu opened the door and glanced outside before turning back to tell Zhang Shan, “It’s nothing. Big brother hasn’t returned, let’s continue eating.” Seeing that Zhang Shan was about to stretch his head over, he turned and shut the door. The lift made its way down, punctuated by stops. Just as Fu Li thought that he was finally going to reach, a partition on the right side of the lift opened abruptly, revealing a girl in a white skirt with long hair trailing down her shoulders. Fu Li cocked his head and took a few glances at her, feeling that the human sense of aesthetics was becoming more and more strange. <i>What beauty was there in shaving off all the brows and painting the lips a deathly pale color?</i>  Seeing that Fu Li ignored her, the girl in the white skirt stretched out both her hands and hopped towards Fu Li. “Wait a minute,” Fu Li pointed at a poster at the corner on the safe use of lifts. “Jumping is prohibited in lifts, such behavior is extremely dangerous.” The girl in the white skirt came to a halt and silently retreated to her original spot. The partition was also placed back in its original position. When the lift finally stopped on the first floor, Fu Li walked out and was surrounded by several people. One of them was even holding up a camera. “Mister, I am the host of the television program &lt;Will you be scared?&gt;. May I ask what thoughts you have on the incident that just happened?” The host raised the microphone towards Fu Li. “Did you not feel any fear when the lift kept stopping and when our actress appeared?” <i>There wasn’t a single bit of </i><i>yin qi in the lift, how could there be a ghost? Even if there really had been a ghost, what was there to fear about such a low-leveled spirit?</i>  Fu Li shook his head calmly. “What ghost would squat in the lift for so long? It’s not like the lift is a fun place to be in. Even ghosts have brains.” The host of the television program, “...;” She actually had no idea what to say when faced with such a calm and collected filming target. After a period of silence, the host opened her mouth again, “May I ask if we can edit the content we filmed and include it in our program?” Fu Li didn’t understand human processes, but he was still quite tolerant of creatures with a short life span. “Sure.” “Then do you have anything you would like to say to the audience?” “For your personal safety, please do not cause a disturbance in the lift.” The program crew, “...;” After parting from these boring humans, Fu Li saw a man standing outside the security guards’ restroom. Water was still dripping from the man’s uniform. It was the colleague who hadn’t turned up for work today. Pada pada. Water dripped onto the floorboards, producing faint sounds. Fu Li’s arrival hadn’t attracted the attention of his colleague, Old Luo. Old Luo stretched out a frozen-stiff hand and started knocking on the door thrice, over and over again. Bang. Bang. Bang. Even the way it sounded was stiff. There was no noticeable difference in the intervals between his knocks. Fu Li walked over to the door and told Old Luo, “You’re blocking my way.” Old Luo’s movements halted. He slowly turned his head and looked at Fu Li, muttering repeatedly, “Accept one’s payment, do one’s bidding. Accept one’s payment, do one’s bidding...;” As he muttered, he made a grab for the edge of Fu Li’s top. Fu Li leaned his upper body to the side and avoided the hand Old Luo extended. “Little Fu, why were you gone for so long?” Zhang Shan opened the door. Seeing that Old Luo was also present, he joked, “Old Luo, where did you go tonight to let loose? You’re wet all over?” Hearing Zhang Shan’s voice, Old Luo turned and glanced towards Zhang Shan. A smile appeared on his face. “I specially came to find you.” “What for...;” Zhang Shan hadn’t even completed his statement when he was pushed by Fu Li into the room. Without any preparation, he nearly took a tumble. Clang! He looked up and saw Fu Li squeeze into the room before firmly pulling the door shut. Old Luo’s hand was wedged in the door crack, causing him to let out a pained yell. This scene frightened Zhang Shan till he momentarily lost the ability to speak. Only a long while later did he ask, “Little Fu, are y-you possessed?” He just finished uttering these words when he saw Old Luo’s hand drop! “Hand, hand, hand!” Zhang Shan pointed at the arm that had dropped onto the ground, his voice sharp and hoarse. “His hand dropped off ahhh!” “Brother, don’t get too excited,” The green-haired yao patted Zhang Shan on the shoulder and tapped him on the forehead. “You’re dreaming.” “Dreaming?” Zhang Shan walked to the restchair in a daze, seated himself, and then slumped over, falling asleep. “A person’s mind is hard to fathom,” The green-haired yao watched Fu Li stamp down on the broken hand with one leg. The hand instantly vanished in a puff of smoke. Shaking his head, he sighed with emotion, “I didn’t expect the person outside to actually have chosen this brother as a death-substitute. But this brother has quite a lot of guts, he even dared to pick up a red packet containing a death-substitute talisman.” “He didn’t pick it up,” Fu Li stamped his foot. “I picked up the red packet.” The green haired-yao, “...;” Their yao race really had it hard – they couldn’t even bear to waste that bit of money. “Then what should we do now?” The green-haired yao didn’t understand. “Why did that vengeful ghost outside insist that it was this brother who picked up the red packet? Did he already choose this brother as his death-substitute while he was still alive?” “It’s possible his birthday happened to be suitable,” Fu Li recalled the location at which he had picked up the red packet that day. Zhang Shan would definitely pass by that area during his patrol. Perhaps at moments unknown to Zhang Shan, Old Luo had also thrown similar red packets at places he would definitely pass by. Knowing that one might die, and thus finding someone else to die in place of oneself – did this stem from the humans’ innate fear of death?Zhang Shan’s life expectancy was considered long among humans. Making someone like him a death-substitute would require one to pay a debt, did these humans not understand this concept? Fu Li felt that he might never understand the way humans thought. He turned, casting a glance at Ying Lu. “Keep a close eye on Zhang Shan. I’ll settle that vengeful ghost outside.” “All right, big brother,” Ying Lu very obediently stood by Zhang Shan’s side. Yao cultivators were still easier to understand and communicate with. Fu Li’s feet stepped onto the trails of water. The water instantly turned into mist, vanishing. Old Luo’s body had turned quite transparent. “I can’t die!” Tears of blood dripped from Old Luo’s eyes. “I still have a wife, children, and parents to look after, what will happen to them if I die?” “Zhang Shan also has family, what basis is there for him to die on your behalf?” Fu Li’s expression was cold. “Life and death are ruled by fate. In a minute, a yinchai from the underworld will come to fetch you. Stop all this pointless struggling.” “What do you know!” Old Luo’s expression turned malevolent, revealing the wound on his face that was so deep bone could be seen. “Would a parentless youngster like you who doesn’t even have a woman know about bonds? Know about emotions? As long as I can be with them, I’m willing to do anything!” “I don’t understand such emotions very well, but no matter how many reasons you have, they are not grounds for seizing what is others,” Fu Li’s voice was calm. “Things that belong to someone else belong to them. Snatching what is theirs is wrong.” “It is only right for someone who owes money to repay it. He owes me, so it’s time to return it now,” Thick baleful yin rolled off Old Luo. “Get out of the way!” “Surely that ‘money’ you mentioned isn’t that ten yuan red packet?” Fu Li sighed. “Wanting to buy someone’s life with just ten yuan, your imagination is a bit too rich and your behavior a bit too shameless. With your stinginess, you still want someone else to die in your place, do you think that’s appropriate?” “I don’t care. He picked up the money, so he owes me,” Old Luo was no longer human. Delusion had already taken over him. In his eyes, Fu Li was now someone obstructing him. As for why Fu Li dared to block his path and even knew of something like death-substituting, his ghostly brain could no longer think of such things. “But it’s not him who picked up the red packet. That ten yuan of yours was spent by me,” Fu Li placed a restriction on the door. Even if Old Luo rammed into the door till his soul scattered, he wouldn’t be able to enter. “Why don’t you ask for my lifespan?” Old Luo’s eyes turned scarlet and he raced directly towards Fu Li. “Then you can die in my place.” Fu Li reached out a hand, blocking his way forward. Old Luo couldn’t budge even an inch, as if his entire body had been frozen. Fu Li cocked his head and looked upon the extremely terrifying-looking Old Luo. Fu Li’s distinct eyes were clear and limpid, devoid of any anger, delight, or disgust. “A soul that has committed a wrong should be punished.” Ding. Ding. Fu Li blinked and turned, looking towards the end of the corridor. Li Xu’s silhouette gradually appeared. Li Xu saw the vengeful ghost whose head was being held in place by Fu Li’s palm and saluted Fu Li in a manner reserved for seniors in the cultivation world. “Mr Fu.” “You’re here to ferry the soul?” Fu Li released his grip. As if alive, the Soul-Locking Chain in Li Xu’s hands bound Old Luo. No matter how much Old Luo struggled, it was to no avail. The Soul-Locking Chain was deeply embedded into his body, twisting his body into a monstrous form. “Many thanks to Mr Fu for helping me to capture this vengeful ghost,” Li Xu pulled on the Soul-Locking Chain as he bid goodbye to Fu Li. “It’s just a matter of raising a hand.” Fu Li asked curiously, “Why are you ferrying souls again today?” “Perhaps this is fate?” Li Xu smiled. Out of habit, he touched his pocket, wanting to light a cigarette. Then, he recalled that Fu Li didn’t have the habit of smoking, so he retracted his hand. “I didn’t expect Mr Fu to still be working here.” Nobody would expect a yao cultivator who had lived for so many years to be reduced to a security guard in human society. “I have a question I would like to consult you on.” Faced with Fu Li’s clear, good-looking eyes, Li Xu subconsciously didn’t dare to reject the other party’s request. “Please ask.” “Do you know if the yao cultivators of Reflecting Mist Mountain 1900 years ago have already reincarnated? “Mr Fu, you should know that the underworld does not control the birth and death of yao cultivators,” Li Xu answered apologetically. “For living creatures to transform as yao, the time and conditions have to be favorable. As for the passing of life and the disappearance of Dao, whether or not one can reincarnate will also depend on these.” Fu Li was silent. Naturally, he had heard of these things from the White Ape. He had merely thought of it all of a sudden, so he simply asked about it. He nodded and smiled, “Got it, many thanks for the information.” Li Xu hesitated for a moment, but still decided to convey the rumors he had heard 1920 years ago to Fu Li before leaving. “During those years, I heard that the little yao of your mountain might have already been buried in the dragons’ bellies, so...;” The azure dragon clan were heavyweights in the current era, so even their underworld had to yield to them to some degree. Even if Fu Li knew this, what could he do? The devastation of the yao cultivators on that mountain that year had spread widely throughout the cultivation world. Ever since then, the yao cultivators became incomparably reverent towards the azure dragon clan. It was just a pity that those kind little yao lost their lives because of the azure dragon clan’s moment of willfulness. After Li Xu left, Fu Li opened the door and returned to the restroom. Ying Lu held up a handphone and asked, “Big brother, the rain’s gotten smaller. I still need to do my deliveries.” “Okay,” Fu LI nodded. “Be careful on the way.” Ying Lu nodded and jogged off. Not long after he left, Zhang Shan woke up. Rubbing his head, he asked, “Little Fu, how did I fall asleep?” “Was I too sleepy?” Zhang Shan saw that the takeout boxes on the table had already been cleared by Fu Li, so he stood up and told Fu LI, “Then you take a rest, I’ll go patrol.” “No need, I just went,” Fu Li tore a few tissues and wiped the oil stains on the table. “Little Fu, you’re really a true friend,” Zhang Shan placed an arm around Fu Li’s shoulders, shaking his head. “Oh right, I had a dream just now about Old Luo wanting to borrow money from me. I rummaged in my pocket for a very long time, but couldn’t find any money, so I didn’t lend any to him.” His shoulders drooped powerlessly. “Even in my dreams, I’m a poor dog. Those who hear of this will feel hurt and those who witness this will shed tears – it’s a physically and emotionally hurtful thing” Fu Li patted his head. It was indeed quite miserable to be very poor in the human world. “Little Fu, you seem like you’re petting a dog?” “Didn’t you say you’re a poor dog?” “...;” The next morning, Fu Li and Zhang Shan were ready to get off work. When they reached the front counter, several security guards were huddled around with the front-counter girls, seemingly discussing something. Their expressions were heavy. “Gossiping first thing in the morning?” Zhang Shan yawned. “Take care not to be seen by the customers. They’ll lodge a complaint against all of you.” “You still don’t know?” Li Shi pulled at Zhang Shan, prompting him to speak less. “Something happened to Old Luo.” “Old Luo?” Zhang Shan didn’t understand. “He skipped work last night, so it was just me and little Fu in charge of our team’s floors for the entire night. Did he fall sick?” Li Shi lowered his voice. “He’s dead.” “Dead?” A certain hazy scene surfaced in Zhang Shan’s mind, though it vanished when Fu Li walked over to him. He rubbed his head and thought, perhaps it was because he had dreamt of lending Old Luo money the previous night. “En, I heard he fell into the sea yesterday noon and drowned. His corpse was only found in the middle of the night yesterday. It seems like his family members are currently kneeling outside the hotel and making a fuss.” “He didn’t even work last night, what is his family doing making a fuss at the hotel?” Li Shi shrugged, a helpless look on his face. When Fu Li walked out of the hotel’s main entrance, he saw two elderly people kneeling outside, two young children draped in mourning apparel, and a woman covering her face and bawling. The expressions of the two young children were panicked and helpless. Under the gazes of passersby and the countless camera flashes, they who carried their deceased father’s picture resembled duckweed with nothing to rely on, helpless and pitiful. A reporter waiting outside saw that a hotel worker had come out and hurriedly approached him. “Hello, may I ask if you are an employee of the hotel? Can you tell us your opinion on Mr Luo’s unexpected death on his way to work?” Fu Li blinked. Just as everyone thought that he was about to speak, he suddenly broke into a run and escaped even before the reporter could react. Only then did the cameraman realize that there was an issue with the camera, so the scene hadn’t been captured. Both parties looked at each other helplessly; they could only search for the next interview target. The next day when Fu Li went to work, Old Luo’s family members had already left. He heard that the hotel had compensated the Luo family eight hundred thousand, despite the fact that Old Luo hadn’t left at noon for the purpose of working despite claiming that he was going to work. Fu Li didn’t understand why this was so. Perhaps it was him who didn’t understand the emotional relationships of human society. At noon, he met the big boss Wang Han, who rarely made an appearance in the hotel. Wang Han very courteously called him into the office and then asked with a face full of smiles. “Daoyou, I heard you participated in the management bureau’s recruitment test?” Fu Li nodded. Wang Han’s smile became even gentler. “What was the outcome of the test?” “First in the combat test.” Wang Han gazed at Fu Li as if he was looking at an exceptional treasure. “Daoyou, you have such profound cultivation!” “In the current era, it really does seem not bad?” Fu Li thought of the yao cultivators he had encountered during the last three years and nodded sincerely. “It’s all because of the other daoyou who served as a foil.” Wang Han, “...;” Was this considered being modest? “Good!” Wang Han exclaimed in excitement. “If daoyou is accepted, I will give you a large red packet on behalf of the hotel and my sect to congratulate you on the great joy that is being accepted!” Their Wanyue Sect didn’t have anyone who had managed to enter the management bureau. Although Fu Li wasn’t one of their sect members, he could still be considered an employee of theirs. In a very indirect way, they could still be considered to have some relation. In this age, who would disdain themselves for having too many connections? For the sake of improving their relations with yao cultivators, their sect’s elder thickened his skin every day and went to play mahjong at the Yao Union. The amount of money he lost every month was not little. He had assumed that the yao cultivator his teacher had shoved in as a worker was a little yao with low cultivation; who knew the other party was this impressive? Wang Han felt a kind of ecstasy akin to a meat pie that dropped from the sky and into his lap. Their Wanyue Sect was filled with average cultivators, nor did they concoct pills of immortality or refine pills. However, they knew how to earn and spend their money. Any problem that could be resolved with money couldn’t be called a problem. In the internal department of the cultivation management bureau, the discussion on the people to accept nearly had the yao cultivators and human cultivators pulling out their magic weapons and rolling up their sleeves. Although, they were currently very restrained, because Zhuang Qing was still in the seat of honor. The yao cultivators felt that Fu Li and the Qing Xiao Sect’s Wei Cang should be accepted, since these two had the highest cultivation. On the other hand, the human cultivators felt that the two spots couldn’t be filled entirely by yao cultivators and that they should accept Fu Li and either Zhong Ze or the Daoist Priest Qing Xu. “Our management bureau is most lacking in fighters, wouldn’t it be more suitable to accept Fu Li and Wei Cang?” Lin Gui stated. “Moreover, our discussion is based on the results. Yao and human cultivators have equal standing. Why are we still distinguishing between human and yao at this time? Our management bureau’s goal is for human and yao cultivators to provide each other mutual aid at an equal level.” “Lin Gui is right, all creatures are equal,” Huang Can continued with all smiles. “Why didn’t you say that when you were gnawing on chicken drumsticks this afternoon?” Xu Yuan shot back. “If a chicken is the same as you, on what basis are you eating it?” Huang Can, who had eaten two chickens that afternoon, silently shut his mouth, Someone among the human cultivators muttered in a low voice, “If we’re basing it on results, Fu Li’s written results are the worst among the five cultivators. We might as well accept the Qing Xiao Sect’s Wei Cang and the Fields Sect’s Zhong Ze.” The moment these words were uttered, regardless of what they were striving for, all the cultivators in the room looked at this human cultivator as if he were a fool. Their minds hadn’t gone so wrong that they wouldn’t accept a yao cultivator whose fists could beat up the Suanyu and the Zhuyan, and who could explain the ancient ways of cultivating. This year, even if they had to thicken their skin and add another spot, they couldn’t let go of Fu Li, okay? “I hope...;” Zhuang Qing crossed his fingers on the table. “Everyone will not raise such brainless suggestions.” The human cultivator who suggested not accepting Fu Li, “...;” At this moment, not only was he opposing the yao cultivators, he was also opposing the human cultivators. He itched to shrink himself into a ball, so as to escape everyone’s death stares. “I have a bit of an immature suggestion,” Ning Xuan spoke amidst the silence. “The affiliated human departments have a policy of taking in unofficial personnel. All five of the examinees this year are outstanding and proficient at combat, so why not learn from the humans’ progressiveness and recruit a few unofficial staff?” “For example, that Suanyu can be considered unofficial staff,” Worry filled the face of Bao Yu, who was seated at a corner. “He’s about to empty the kitchen of food, we can’t raise such a big eater who eats and drinks for nothing.” All the cultivators, “...;” “What does everyone think?” Zhuang Qing’s gaze swept across the cultivators. Nobody objected. “I will convey everyone’s opinions to the higher-ups. If the higher-ups approve it, we’ll proceed in this way,” Zhuang Qing stood up. Suddenly thinking of something, he spoke to the cultivators who were preparing to get up and leave. “Everyone is to be a bit more polite when facing Fu Li.” Just as everyone thought that the boss would domineeringly say ‘this yao cultivator is backed by me’, Zhuang Qing uttered the other half of the statement. “I fear that I won’t be able to hold him back if you anger him into beating you up.” The few cultivators who had personally witnessed the scene of Fu Li giving the Suanyu a beating nodded their heads repeatedly. They wouldn’t provoke him. Definitely not. Two days later, the acceptance outcome was posted. Fu Li and the Qing Xiao Sect’s Wei Cang had been accepted as formal employees. In addition, the Fields Sect’s Zhong Ze, Lin An Monastery’s Daoist priest Qing Xu, the yellow pond turtle yao Huang Long, and an unknown yao called Song Yu could take on the roles of unofficial personnel and sign an employment contract with the management bureau. The entire cultivation world was impassioned after the release of the acceptance notice, because this was the first time the management bureau had recruited so many new members. Sects with slightly less courage thought that the bureau had increased the vigor with which they recruited because something major had happened. Only after they specially asked around and confirmed that it was the examinees this year who had been particularly outstanding did they heave a sigh of relief. The instant the sects with an accepted disciple received the notice, they itched to buy tens of thousands of firecrackers and set them off at their entrance. It was a pity, however, that the setting off of firecrackers was prohibited in many areas in the capital. All they could do was arrange for a huge banquet, invite various figures in the cultivation world for a meal, and show off a little. Qing Xiao Sect was the proudest, since they had a disciple who was a team leader in the bureau, while another disciple had just been accepted. Moreover, this disciple was accepted as an official staff member. The Qing Xiao Sect was so delighted by this sect-glorifying event that they bought a week’s worth of advertisements on the cultivation sects’ forum app. As long as a cultivator opened the app, they would see the huge words ‘congratulations to the cultivators’ management bureau for perfectly concluding their recruitment’ looping repeatedly on the home page. Following these words was a list of the members who had been accepted, of which the Qing Xiao Sect’s Wei Cang was placed first. The Fields Sect who had attained their fame through growing plants was also not willing to fall behind. Although their sect’s disciple was only a contract worker, this was the first time the management bureau had signed contract workers, so if their performance was good, there was still a chance to be converted to permanent staff. They didn’t purchase any advertisements, but anyone who congratulated them was generously gifted spiritual rice and medicine. As an orthodox Daoist cultivation sect, the way in which Lin An Monastery celebrated such things was a little more restrained. Within the short span of a few days, they held two seminars on the Way of the Dao. The monastery’s Daoist priests set up a long row of tables at the entrance to the monastery and told the fortunes of people who visited the monastery. Unless one was blind, there was no way of missing out the long and gigantic red banner behind them. These words were written on the red banner: Congratulations to our Monastery’s Qing Xu for attaining excellent results. This banner was completely inconsistent with the Lin An Monastery’s aura of mystery and disconnect from worldly affairs. Yet, whenever these Daoist priests with profound cultivation passed by the banner, they would come to a halt and reveal a gratified smile. This left the devout believers of the Daoist monastery in a state of bewilderment. How good was the result for such joy to fill the faces of these Daoist priests? Even the sectless yellow pond turtle yao Huang Long had the water clans’ yao cultivators to help him celebrate. They set up a few large tables in a lively manner and celebrated for two days in a row. In comparison to these four, the Suanyu and Fu Li didn’t have many people to hype things up on their behalf, nor did they treat this as something they had to announce. The Suanyu continued to livestream as a super glutton, while the money he earned was split equally between him and the platform. Fu Li was in the middle of considering whether he ought to go to the management bureau. To him, working at the hotel was quite interesting and he even got to interact with many interesting humans. He was sick of looking at yaoguai; the humans were much more interesting than them. In the afternoon, Fu Li sat with Zhang Shan as they ate their packed meals. Zhang Shan asked Fu Li in a low voice, “Say, do you know how Old Luo died?” “Didn’t he drown?” Fu Li’s impression of this human was mediocre, so he had no interest in his affairs. “He lied to his family members that he was going out for work, but in reality, he went to the red light district. On his way back, he lost his footing, fell into the river, and drowned,” Zhang Shan shook his head. “I heard from the cleaner auntie who has some familial ties to his family that his family had a huge falling out. Old Luo’s parents are fighting with the daughter-in-law for the compensation given by the boss, along with the house. It’s at the point where they’re about to go to court over it.” “But he still has two children. Raising children is costly, why do his parents want to snatch so many assets?” Fu Li was confused. “What’s a red light district?” “So, you’re still a fledgling who doesn’t even know about the red light district.” Zhang Shan answered him in a low voice, “It’s a place where you can find women.” Fu Li furrowed his brows. “He has a wife and two children, how can he do such a thing? Don’t the current laws dictate monogamy?” “The laws state as such, but it can’t restrain people who have no control over themselves. It’s just a sad state of affairs for the wife and children,” Zhang Shan sighed with emotion. “So, as humans, it’s still better not to do anything that’s against our conscience. If Old Luo hadn’t done something that let his wife down, how could he have fallen into the river?” Fu Li pursed his lips in silence. He didn’t understand this sort of emotion, but something like betraying one’s mate should be wrong. He thought about the words Old Luo had said that night after becoming a vengeful ghost. C<i>ouldn’t bear to part with his family? If he really couldn’t bear to part with his family, then why did he commit such wrongs?</i>  <i>Was hypocrisy a characteristic of certain humans?</i>  “Why aren’t you speaking? Are you angry?” Zhang Shan turned and saw that Fu Li’s expression seemed a bit off. Thinking that he had gone overboard with his words, he hurriedly said, “I was joking with you. I was just telling you about it, don’t tell others. A-Actually, I haven’t had a girlfriend before either.” Fu Li turned and glanced at the awkward-looking Zhang Shan. He blinked. “It’s fine even if you don’t have a girlfriend now, your natal chart states that you’ll have a harmonious marriage and filial children.” “Since Fu ge has said so, I’m very hopeful for my future,” Zhang Shan wound a hand around Fu Li’s neck. “Let’s go. There’s a single dog gathering or something for some rich second generation tonight. They booked the entire entertainment area in the hotel, so all of us will have to work overtime tonight.” He glanced at Fu Li’s face and coughed dryly. “The venue will become chaotic when there are many people, be more careful.” In the world today, a good-looking man not only needed to guard against women, but also men. Fu Li: ? <i>With how weak humans were, a single hand of his would be enough to beat countless numbers of them. What did he need to be careful of?</i>  When night arrived, Fu Li watched the humans on the grass drinking, singing, and dancing as he easily picked up a drunk boy who had fallen into the swimming pool. Fu Li silently looked at the beer bottles and trash bags that they had thrown into the swimming pool. The cleaners at the side picked them up as they were thrown and then swiftly withdrew to the corners to keep a watch, so as to not disturb their fun. “Brother, your figure is not bad. Come over here and have a drink with big brother,” An intoxicated man slumped against Fu Li’s shoulder. His two legs trembled continuously, his gait unsteady. Fu Li set him down onto a chair and took away the beer bottle in his hand. The man grumbled a little, curled up on the chair, and fell asleep like a young pup. Not too far away, several girls were quarreling. Someone accidentally spilled wine on the cleaner auntie and took out some bills from their bag, stuffing it into her hands. The cleaner auntie smiled cooperatively and thanked them before hiding in a corner with few people and carefully placing the money in the inner lining of her work uniform. Only after confirming that the money wouldn’t fall out did she wipe the liquid on her face and continue stooping over to sweep up the trash on the ground. Shifting his gaze, Fu Li lowered his head and picked up the surrounding trash, throwing it into the rubbish bin nearby. Just as he was turning in preparation to leave, he caught sight of a man in a white top who was picking up the beer bottles on the ground and placing them on the tables. He had even swept all the nut shells on the table into a bag. Noticing Fu Li’s gaze, the man nodded at him. Fu Li flashed him a smile. Turning, he walked to the swimming pool to prevent any drunk, addled person from leaping into the pool. A light breeze blew the clouds in the night sky into motion. Fu Li nodded and glanced up at the sky. His eyelids drooped. A few uninvited guests had arrived at Zhuang Qing’s villa. Both parties were seated opposite each other. Zhuang Qing glanced at the several large chests in front of him that were filled with gold, silver and pearls. The brilliant rays they gave off were enchanting. “Dragon Lord...;” “There’s no need to call me that. I don’t control any lake or ocean, and cannot shoulder such a form of address,” Zhuang Qing interrupted Qing Yan. He picked up the cup of tea from the table and took a sip. “A verdict has already been given for the Northern Lake Dragon Lord’s case, and the cultivation world has already been informed of it. No matter how many gifts these Sirs send me, the final verdict cannot be altered.” “Dragon Lord, you’ve misunderstood,” Qing Yan saw Zhuang Qing’s expression turn even colder and could only change his tone of voice. “We’re not here today regarding the Northern Lake’s Dragon Lord. He committed a wrong and receiving the punishment will allow him to correct his temper. No one in our clan objects to this.” The flesh on Zhuang Qing’s cheeks moved a little, forming a somewhat mocking smile. If the azure dragon clan didn’t have any objections, then what was the fuss they made previously for? Seeing Zhuang Qing remain silent, Qing Yan exchanged gazes with the other people from the azure dragon clan before continuing to speak, “We brought these to apologize to cultivator Zhuang. We are all members of the dragon race, yet we allowed you to wander about destitute for so many years. There is immense guilt in our hearts. We hope you can accept these meager gifts.” Zhuang Qing took out several black pearls from the chest and toyed with them. He raised a brow. “En.” Unable to make out Zhuang Qing’s inner thoughts, Qing Yan’s tone became even more courteous. “It isn’t easy for cultivator Zhuang to manage such a large bureau either. The bureau was essentially single-handedly propped up by you. If not for you, the yao cultivators wouldn’t be leading happy lives today. It’s just that yao and humans are different. After all, strength is everything in the yao world. Ultimately, the cultivation world is willing to abide by the management bureau’s orders because of your profound cultivation. Only because of that do we have the current peaceful days.” “Who would be willing to run and hide all the time if they could live well?” Zhuang Qing threw the pearls back into the chests and sneered. “Dragon Lord, be direct if you have something to say.” “Has Dragon Lord ever considered that there might come a day when a yao with cultivation even more profound than yours appears, challenges you for your position, and even snatches the fruits of all your labor? What should those cultivators under your protection do then?” Qing Yan held up his cup and made a toasting motion towards Zhuang Qing. The moment the water in the cup went down his throat, Qing Yan could tell that the water was the most ordinary tap water, without even a single tea leaf. He swallowed the water and smiled patronizingly, “Good water.” Zhuang Qing nodded. “Water that has gone through countless rounds of precipitation, filtering, and disinfection will naturally be good.” Qing Yan’s smile stiffened a little. <i>It was merely tap water, was there a need to speak of it as if it was so amazing?</i>  Tyranny was written into the dragon race’s very bones from birth. Thus, status was of extreme importance to them. He refused to believe that Zhuang Qing was capable of tolerating being challenged by someone else. He had specially looked into Zhuang Qing’s background – he had been raised by humans after his birth. Only after his human mother passed away from illness was he taken in by the dragon race for a period of time. However, Zhuang Qing wasn’t on good terms with the dragon race. It was said that the white and red dragon clans had beaten him those years till blood covered his entire body and scales littered the ground. But even then, Zhuang Qing hadn’t let up even once. Afterwards, he left the dragon palace before even reaching the age of thirty. The world at that time wasn’t as kind as it was today. Every part of a dragon was considered treasure, so not only did evil yao set their sights on the dragon race, even evil human cultivators wanted to profit from the dragons. To the dragon race, a thirty-year-old dragon was considered a baby dragon. One could imagine how dangerous it was for him to be walking about in the human world. With this sort of lousy temper where he refused to be wronged even if he had to lose his life, how could Zhuang Qing tolerate the existence of a yao cultivator who might be more powerful than him? “That yao cultivator Fu Li...;” Qing Yan examined Zhuang Qing’s expression and only continued speaking after seeing no abnormalities. “Fu Li’s origins are unknown, and the depths of his cultivation are unfathomable. Although there were some misunderstandings between us in the past, we are both of the dragon race and our hearts are naturally aligned with our race. It would be better for you to guard against that Fu Li.” Zhuang Qing raised his eyes and looked at him. He raised a hand, indicating for him to continue speaking. Seeing that he was willing to continue listening, the smile on Qing Yan’s face turned even warmer. “I heard this Fu Li helped you to subdue an ancient great yao. However, where on earth would there be such a coincidence? On the night of your recruitment, a great yao appeared, coincidentally allowing him to take the limelight in front of all the bureau cultivators. Perhaps...;” Qing Yan dragged out his voice. “He’s plotting something big.” Thumping sounds came from the palace crystals at the corner that extended to the ground. It was eleven o’clock at night. It was nearing midnight. “Dragon Lord Qing Yan might not be too clear about something,” Zhuang Qing stood up, towering above Qing Yan as he looked at him. “I don’t only rely on myself to manage the bureau well, nor do I solely depend on my high cultivation. It’s because I have brains and because the cultivation world doesn’t want to return to those days of slaughter where life and death was uncertain.” He reached out and closed the treasure chests one by one. Under the azure dragon clan’s furious gazes, he placed the chests together in a pile. “I accept your gifts. It’s late, please return to the dragon palace early and rest.” “You!” Someone from the azure dragon clan nearly flared up, but was stopped by Qing Yan. “We merely came to convey the worries in our hearts. We have no other intentions. Perhaps we thought too much about all this,” Qing Yan stood up and gave Zhuang Qing a salute for those of the same generation. “Cultivator Zhuang, have a good rest. We’ll take our leave.” “Take care,” Zhuang Qing made a ‘please’ gesture. Qing Yan shot a glance at his two fellow clanmates before leaving Zhuang Qing’s villa with a smile. Only after leaving the villa did one of his clanmates let out a fierce exhale. “What f*cking thing is this? He’s unmoved by both force and persuasion, and even has the nerve to accept the gifts. I’ve never seen such a shameless dragon!” “All right,” The smile on Qing Yan’s face dimmed. “Zhuang Qing isn’t stupid either. If he can change his mind just from those few words we said, then what use does the management bureau have?” “Then didn’t we make this trip for nothing?” “How can this be considered nothing?” Qing Yan’s smile was like the spring wind. “The higher someone’s status, the more suspicious and jealous their heart. Moreover...; Zhuang Qing is a smart person. Smart people always think more.” That yao cultivator called Fu Li could not be allowed to remain. The azure dragons didn’t know that Zhuang Qing had poured out all the pearls the moment they left. The multi-colored pearls lay all over the ground. He glanced around his surroundings. After carefully setting up a barrier, he suddenly transformed into a not-too-large golden dragon and dived headfirst into the mountain of pearls, rolling about a few times. Surrounded by pearls, even the slightly mottled and dull scales on certain parts of his body became brilliant. By the time Fu Li got off work, it was already late into the night. He was walking along a small quiet and empty path when he suddenly looked up at the sky. There was the smell of dragon above. He was about to fly up when he turned and caught sight of an aged human rummaging through the rubbish bin in search of something. Mosquitoes were flying about chaotically beside the stinky bin. His movements stopped and he walked to the bin. The old man was stuffing some soured buns into his mouth. Wrinkles lined his dark face. Fu Li saw the debt of sin on this person – the air of sin had accumulated from disobedience to parents and abandonment of spouse and children. Having understood this clearly, Fu Li turned and walked in the opposite direction. People had to pay a price for what they had done. Old age was not an excuse to bury all wrongdoings. The next day at night, Fu Li had just put on his uniform when the manager of the security guards told him that the boss was looking for him. Under the envious gazes of all his colleagues, Fu Li walked out of the restroom. Upon reaching Wang Han’s office, Fu Li realized that apart from Wang Han, there were also several ruddy-faced elderly men and women, one of which he recognized – Wang Cuihua, the elderly woman who liked to play mahjong at the Yao Union. “Little Fu, you’ve really worked hard,” Wang Cuihua grabbed Fu Li’s arm and patted him on the shoulder a few times in rapid succession. “I saw your potential very early on. See, it’s only been this long, yet you’ve already joined the management bureau. Congratulations, congratulations,” She took out a huge red packet while speaking and stuffed it into Fu Li’s hands without any explanation. The other elderly men and woman saw this situation and also shoved red packets at him. “A friend of Wang Cuihua is a friend of our Wanyue Sect, take these red packets.” Fu Li: <i>The human cultivators nowadays were really generous.</i>  “Yes yes yes, this is fate. Otherwise, why would you be working at a hotel started by our sect?” Fu Li: <i>Wasn’t it because Wang Cuihua had arranged for him to go through the backdoor?</i>  “Although you won’t be working at our hotel in the future, you will still belong to our hotel. If you need anything, you can come to me,” Wang Han also revealed a splendid smile and shoved a large red packet at Fu Li. Fu Li held onto red packet after red packet. “But I don’t intend to go to the management bureau yet.” “What?” Everyone from the Wanyue Sect thought that something had gone wrong with their ears. There was actually someone who didn’t want to go to the management bureau after managing to pass the test? Wang Cuihua pulled Fu Li to a corner and asked, “Little Fu, can you tell me why you don’t want to go?” Fu Li said, “I think this job is also quite interesting, what use is there in going to the bureau?” “Of course it’s useful,” Wang Cuihua said. “You’ve always been in the countryside and aren’t aware of the complexities of the outside world. In the past when there was no management bureau, human cultivators killed yao cultivators while yao cultivators ate humans. Innocent yao cultivators were often slaughtered by human cultivators, and innocent humans were eaten by yao cultivators. Human and yao cultivators were always on opposing sides. After the appearance of the management bureau, yao cultivators didn’t dare to wreak havoc wherever they wanted. Neither could the human cultivators casually use yao cultivators to refine pills or weapons, so everyone’s lives improved over time. If powerful people like you aren’t willing to join the management bureau, who would maintain order in the cultivation world and fight for justice when the cultivation world is wronged?” “But...;” Fu Li said. “I still want to enter university and become a civil servant.” Wang Cuihua turned and looked at Wang Han. Wang Han hurriedly shook his head. He wasn’t aware that this yao cultivator had such a grand dream. “Working at the management bureau is equivalent to being a civil servant in the human world,” Wang Cuihua lowered her voice. “I heard the management bureau is supervised by the nation. If you perform well in the bureau, you might even receive excellent conditions in the future when you become a civil servant.” Fu Li asked doubtfully, “Is that true?” “At least, it’ll be better than if you were to go for the exam now,” Wang Cuihua patted Fu Li’s shoulder with a solemn expression. “Trust me. I’ve eaten more salt than the rice you’ve eaten.” “But I’m 3900 years older than you,” Shock appeared on Fu Li’s face. “Do you usually eat very salty things?” Wang Cuihua smiled awkwardly. This youth appeared a little too obedient, so obedient that the fact that he was yao and not human had slipped her mind. “R-Right. My tastes are indeed on the heavier side.” “The health program said that excessive consumption of salty food is bad for health, you have to take care of your health.” Wang Cuihua, “...;” <i>This 3900 year generation gap was too large, she didn’t think she could carry on this conversation for much longer.</i>  “Ai, it’s already September. It’s so hot outside,” Zhang Ke came in from outside, picked up a cup and gulped down a few mouths of water. “I’ve finished the booking for the welcome feast. You guys can relax this time, there’s definitely no dishes with the same original form as our bureau’s yao.” This sort of communal welcome feast was meant to be lively. Although some yao cultivators didn’t abstain from eating food of the same species, some yao cultivators still paid considerable attention to this. Therefore, the management bureau had to specially avoid these taboos when booking meals. “There’s definitely no fish, beef, lamb, or chicken this time,” After catching his breath, Zhang Ke patted his chest. “I specially booked an all-rabbit feast. Nobody in our management bureau is a rabbit yao, right?” “Zhang Ke did quite a good job this time,” Huang Can praised. “Rabbit meat is very tasty.” Several yao whose original forms were plants also nodded one after another, seemingly in high spirits. Putting so much effort into cultivating a human form was so that they could stand at the top of the food chain and enjoy all sorts of delicacies without lifting a finger. Otherwise, what difference was there between salted fish and plants who couldn’t eat meat? The day before they officially joined, the new staff received an invitation to the bureau’s welcome feast. Fu Li thought about it and felt that he should leave a good impression on his new colleagues. Thus, he specially donned new clothes and spent money to take a taxi to his destination. Upon reaching the entrance of the restaurant, he saw a vivid and lifelike sculpture of a rabbit. The five words ‘Laozihao All-Rabbit Feast’ was written on the board attached to the wall. “Senior,” Zhang Ke saw Fu Li and cordially dragged him into a private room. “It’s hot outside, take a seat inside.” Cold dishes and rabbit-shaped refreshments were already arranged on the table. Fu Li was a newcomer, but his status in the eyes of the management bureau was still a bit more special, so they specially arranged for him to be seated at the main table. Seeing Fu Li enter, everyone waved and called for Fu Li to sit. “Benefactor, this restaurant is the best in the entire capital at cooking rabbit meat,” Zhang Ke poured Fu Li a drink and indicated for the waiter to begin serving the hot dishes. The dishes very quickly filled the table and everyone’s chopsticks leapt into action. Zhuang Qing picked up a rabbit pastry and bit off the rabbit’s head in one mouth. Raising his head, he saw Fu Li staring at the pastry in his hands. He asked doubtfully, “Do you want it?” He stood up and placed the rabbit pastry in front of Fu Li. Fu Li stared at the plump rabbit pastry on his plate. He touched his own neck as several drops of cold sweat appeared on his forehead. “Taste-wise, this restaurant’s pastries are average. These fragrant and tender rabbit cubes are their classic dish,” Zhang Ke picked up a rabbit head with the serving chopsticks and put it into his bowl. “Give it a taste.” On his left was the plump rabbit pastry given by Zhuang Qing, and on his right was the mala rabbit cube Zhang Ke had taken for him. Opposite him was his many future colleagues, their faces wreathed in smiles. All of a sudden, Fu Li thought of a classical story he had once read in a literature textbook – Hongmen Feast. <i>An </i><i>elaborate deception concealing murderous intent – was this an initial show of strength from the seniors to the newcomers?</i>  <i>He thought that he had concealed it very well, but had everyone actually known that he was a rabbit spirit?</i> Many years ago when he had not reached the age of five hundred and hadn’t yet known how to transform into his human form, White Ape’s stories had aroused some curiosity in him towards the world beyond the mountain. Subsequently, there was a day when he playfully ran out and encountered two very strange looking snakes. Not only did they have wings, they even had two heads. Upon discovering him, not only did those strange snakes mock him for his weak and tiny appearance, they even opened their mouths and prepared to eat him. The still-young him had been so scared that he had not only broken out into shivers but even failed to prevent himself from urinating. If King Ganglie hadn’t rushed over to save him, he would probably have already been swallowed by those strange snakes. Ever since then, he would feel disgusted upon seeing smooth, furless things. Only after the incident had passed did he find out that those strange snakes were called Feiyi. Even though White Ape said afterwards that eating the flesh of such snakes was good for health, he would feel disgusted just from thinking about their ugly appearance. <i>So what if he was a r-rabbit? As long as one cultivated well, even a rabbit could contribute to the world.</i>  He pushed the bowl in front of him far away and looked pitifully at everyone from the bureau. “Rabbits are so cute, can I not eat them?” <i>It’s fine if you guys eat. It’s also fine if I sit at the corner and watch as you guys eat. But why did you have to put it into my bowl and urge me to eat? He wasn’t like that mallard who could even raise a hand against a fellow member of his race.</i>  “Rabbits do look cute, but their meat is even more delicious, and their fur even prettier,” Xu Yuan said. “Senior, relax. The meat definitely doesn’t contain an excessive amount of veterinary drugs. This restaurant’s ingredients are carefully picked for quality, and the meat is from free-range rabbits, so it’ll definitely be fresh and tender.” Thinking that Fu Li was tenderhearted, she said, “Although rabbits are cute, their main economic functions are to be eaten, skinned, and have their fur trimmed off.” Even more cold sweat appeared on Fu Li’s face. His gaze became even more wronged. “You humans aren’t fond of eating humans, so why are you forcing a rabbit to eat rabbit meat?” “What?” Zhang Ke thought that there was something wrong with his hearing ability. He turned foolishly and looked in a stupid and silly manner at Fu Li. The rest weren’t much better than him either. With their chopsticks still outstretched, the rabbit meat in their mouths felt like it was on fire, the heat so intense that it sent continuous pulsations through their stomachs. Zhuang Qing threw the half-eaten plump rabbit pastry in his hand into a rubbish bin under the table and took a sip from his teacup as if nothing had happened. “So what if I’m a rabbit?” Fu Li said with a wooden expression. “You look down on rabbits?” “No, how can that be?” Xu Yuan threw aside her chopsticks. “Rabbits are cute and powerful, all of us like rabbits.” “That’s right, that’s right. Rabbits are so cute, how could we eat them,” Zhang Ke, who had recovered from the shock, also threw his chopsticks aside. “There’s a lobster restaurant next door, let’s eat crayfish.” The group of people switched locations and sat down. Fu Li looked at the freshly-served lobster, feeling like he had understood something. <i>He must have beaten the Suanyu too viciously at that time and frightened them, so these people deliberately wanted to give him a scare. No wonder Zhang Shan said that performing too well would incite jealousy. He would have to take note of this in the future.</i>  None of the bureau employees had expected Fu Li, who had such high combat ability, to merely be a senior rabbit who had cultivated for 4000 years. Rabbits had short life expectancies and they had low cultivation even if they were fortunate enough to take on a human form. Someone like Fu Li...; Was probably an anomaly among the rabbit yao. After two platters of lobster were polished off, Zhang Ke shifted to face Fu Li like a shy girl, “Senior, this junior didn’t know that your original form was a...; majestic jade rabbit, and greatly offended you with the meal arrangements. I apologize.” “I’m a-also not any majestic moon-gazing jade rabbit,” Fu Li put down the lobster he had pinched and smiled with some embarrassment. “We’ll be colleagues in the future, just call me by name.” He used his fingers to indicate a length of not more than twenty-plus centimeters and said, smashing the cracked pot, “Actually, I’m a long-eared rabbit that’s this big. When King Ganglie and White Ape, the mountain’s elder, went fishing by the sea, they saw that I was still a baby and was without the protection of elders. So, feeling that I was very pitiful, they brought me back to the mountain and raised me.” Seeing everyone watching him foolishly, Fu Li’s cheeks turned a little red. Hearing these words, Zhuang Qing thought of the kind little yao of Reflecting Mist Mountain who were buried in the bellies of dragons. His hatred towards the azure dragon clan increased by a few more notches. “Benefactor, you’re amazing,” Chu Yu said with a face full of worship. “I’ve cultivated for more than a thousand years and my original form is only one finger long and two fingers wide.” Even if his benefactor was a paramecium and was only visible under a microscope, Chu Yu was determined to worship him, much less if he was a twenty-centimeter long rabbit. The moment Chu Yu uttered these words, everyone looked at Fu Li with even more worship. <i>For an ordinary long-eared rabbit to cultivate to his current state, how much effort and sweat did he have to put in to achieve such profound cultivation?</i>  <i>He was a true iron-blooded man, how awesome!</i>  <i>They worshipped yao cultivators who were born powerful. But they had deeper veneration for unremarkable animals who cultivated till they were almighty!</i>  “But the yao cultivators who raised senior are also quite impressive. If I saw a furry little rabbit, I might just bring it home to cookk2026;” Zhang Ke scratched the back of his head with embarrassment, giving a mischievous but hollow laugh. Fu Li looked down and with a k2018;kacha’ sound, bit into the lobster’s head. Zhang Ke swallowed and no longer brought up the matter of eating rabbits. At the end of the welcome feast, everyone knew about Fu Li’s original form. In particular, the Suanyu, who was using the alias Song Yu, nearly fell apart after learning of Fu Li’s original form. For good or bad, he was still an ancient fiend. How could he have been beaten by a rabbit into weeping bitter tears? No. The correct question was – how could a rabbit suppress the innate reverence it had towards great yao and attacked him till he ended up in such a state? The ancient yao’s face had all been lost by him. Fortunately, the ancient yao cultivators were all either dead or in hiding. No one was aware how much of a sorry figure he cut. The moment he thought this way, Song Yu felt at ease. Weren’t stories about poor kids making their comeback popular among humans nowadays? In the world of yao cultivators, Fu Li was the poor protagonist. This way, it also made sense that Fu Li had the ability to put him to shame. In front of the senior workers, the few newcomers still couldn’t quite be at ease. Wei Cang was Zhang Ke’s junior; although he had joined the sect as a yao cultivator, he was still very much welcomed by his fellow disciples in Qing Xiao Sect. Therefore, after finishing his meal, he made his way to Zhang Ke. “Senior, this is my junior Wei Cang,” Zhang Ke had the intention of letting Wei Cang and Fu Li form good relations, so he took the initiative to introduce Wei Cang to Fu Li. “In the future, I’ll have to request you to look out for him.” “Didn’t I say to call me by name in the future? Calling me senior sounds strange and old-fashioned,” Fu Li could be considered easy to get along with. Although he suspected that these people from the bureau had set up a Hongmen Feast for him, he was broad-minded and wouldn’t be petty with the younger generation. However, after seeing through Wei Cang’s human form and making out his original form, Fu Li was a little envious. He was actually a tiger. Perhaps it was because he had witnessed Fu Li beating the Suanyu, but the moment Wei Cang caught sight of Fu Li, he involuntarily felt reverence towards him. Without the need for Zhang Ke’s guidance, he respectfully called out, “Fu ge.” Although he appeared older than Fu Li by quite a bit. “Fu ge, it isn’t very convenient to hail a taxi here. Let me send you back,” Seeing that Fu Li wasn’t fond of being called senior, he very astutely called Fu Li ge instead. “No need,” Zhuang Qing walked over. “I’m more familiar with the area he lives at, I’ll send him back.” “All right, Boss,” Zhang Ke pulled Wei Cang back, retreating a few steps. Only after Zhuang Qing left with Fu Li did he tell his junior Wei Cang in a low voice, “I heard dragons and tigers don’t get along well and constantly get into fights when together. Remember to exercise restraint after joining the bureau. Boss might not have reached two thousand years old yet, but the depths of his cultivation are immeasurable. I’ve worked in the bureau for ten years but have never seen the boss losing to someone in a fight.” “Senior, you’re thinking too much,” Wei Cang glanced in the direction in which Fu Li and Zhuang Qing had left, his eyes full of worship. “The supposed fights between dragons and tigers were all fabricated by humans. It’s the Fenghuang who doesn’t get along well with the dragon race.” “Aren’t dragons and Fenghuang dual symbols of good fortune?” Zhang Ke felt his three views shattering. “The truth isn’t important, it’s fine as long as you humans are happy. Anyway, I’ve never seen a Fenghuang since the day I was born. They might already be extinct. Despite the humans’ belief in dragons, only several tens of them are left. What fighting can there be?” Wei Cang thrust both hands into his pockets and shrugged, his attitude extremely nonchalant. “This land under the heavens has belonged to the humans since a long time ago.” The past splendor and glory of the yao race were akin to the humans’ elegant historical records. Time could not flow backwards; they could no longer turn back. Only by raising their heads, moving ahead, and being in the present would their future have new hope. Zhang Ke gazed at his extremely indifferent junior, feeling like he was looking at an aging hero past his prime. He felt a faint sadness. “Senior, what are you thinking of?” Wei Cang sighed. Contained in his eyes were the transformations of the world that he had witnessed. “It’s fine. Anyway, times change. It’s okay as long as we get used to it.” Zhang Ke: ? As a human, he felt that his race seemed to have been cursed. Fu Li got into Zhuang Qing’s car and looked all around. “Has your car been repaired?” This question made Zhuang Qing recall the minor car accident not too long ago. His heart ached slightly. “En.” “For a dragon, you’re really generous. You must have spent quite a lot treating so many people to lunch?” Fu Li buckled his seatbelt. “It’s okay,” It wasn’t like the money was his anyway, since it would be reimbursed. This time, the bureau had recruited a yao with four thousand years’ worth of cultivation, as well as a great yao only recorded in ancient texts. The higher-ups were very happy, so they had specially sent down some funds. “We didn’t know about your original form and offended you in our meal arrangements,” Zhuang Qing scrutinized Fu Li’s expression. “Please don’t take it to heart.” “No worries, no worries. I don’t eat rabbit meat, but it’s fine if you guys do,” Fu Li replied. “For example, the original form of the king of my mountain was a pig, but everyone still had to eat pork.” A very vivid scene suddenly appeared in Zhuang Qing’s mind – a pig was grilling rabbit meat, a rabbit was eating pork, a monkey was eating grilled sparrow, while a sparrow was eating fish on a branch. These four different animals were seated in a circle, the atmosphere friendly and harmonious. Frightened by the things his own mind had thought of, Zhuang Qing shook his head. He had been led astray by Fu Li. He hadn’t had the opportunity thousands of years ago to witness grand occasions in the yao world, but one thing he could be sure of was that Fu Li had lived in a simple environment. Although there were moments when he would strangely feel that Fu Li was dangerous, the qi on the other party was very clean. It was a spiritual aura distinctive to yao cultivators who hadn’t eaten humans nor been affected by karma or ill-fated relationships. “Why are you still going to the hotel?” Zhuang Qing gave the steering wheel a smack. “You’re still going to work now?” “I’m going to tender my resignation,” Fu Li took out a resignation letter from his coat. “Although Wang daoyou approved my resignation in advance, the regulations stipulate that I have to hand in my resignation to the human resource department.” “You really abide by regulations.” Zhuang Qing didn’t express any opinion on this. Many of the current yao cultivators had integrated into the human world, but a yao cultivator who abided by the rules to this extent was really quite rare. When the car reached the hotel, Zhuang Qing cut the gas. “Go, I’ll wait for you in the car.” If not for Fu Li’s diamond and Hunyuan pill, he wouldn’t be able to bear wasting so much petrol just to act as a rabbit’s free chauffeur. Truly, one who took other’s things would have their hands tied, while one who ate other’s things would soften their manner of speech. Moreover, he both took and ate, so his confidence was at its lowest point. After handing in his resignation, Fu Li bumped into Zhang Shan on his way out. Zhang Shan already knew that Fu Li had found a good job at a certain biology company, so upon seeing him, he jokingly asked Fu Li to give him a treat. After a few rounds of banter, Zhang Shan pulled Fu Li to a corner and told him in a low voice, “Little Fu, I specially went to investigate that Chang Long Biotechnology Company yesterday night after going home. I didn’t expect this company to actually be quite impressive. The medicinal makeup or something that they independently researched is very popular among the female population. It seems they also produce medicinal products. Anyway, it’s a low-profile company with an established reputation. It won’t be a scam, so you can go to work with peace of mind.” Fu Li had mentioned to Zhang Shan a few days ago that he had been accepted by Chang Long Biotechnology Company but was unsure if he should join them. Zhang Shan had thought that Fu Li was worried that it was a sham company, so he specially went to investigate it. He couldn’t be blamed for thinking so. There were too many sham companies under the name ‘biotechnology company’, what would Fu Li do if he encountered some disorderly organization? If Zhang Shan hadn’t told him, Fu Li wouldn’t have known that the management bureau was really selling products in the market. It was truly...; a very appropriate disguise. “Thank you,” Fu Li looked at this cordial human and patted him on the shoulder. “I’ll treat you to a meal when I’m on holiday.” “Sure,” Zhang Shan giddily patted Fu Li’s shoulder as well. “Rest early. Since you’re going to work at the new company tomorrow, you must have enough energy.” “En!” Fu Li nodded. However, on the first day of work at the management bureau, Fu Li didn’t do anything apart from familiarizing himself with the various formations inside the company. The next day of work, Fu Li stayed with everyone else in the huge work area and spent the entire day listening to ghost stories in the human world. He didn’t understand why a group of human and yao cultivators would be so interested in ghost stories written by humans. On the third day, a senior employee gave the six newcomers a briefing on the staff rules and even distributed a huge pile of office materials. To the left of Fu Li’s office was Wei Cang, while Song Yu was to his right. There were many rooms in Chang Long biotechnology company since many cultivators had different habits and interests. Therefore, every person had an office to themselves. There was a public workspace and meeting room on every floor of the building. Cultivators who enjoyed a lively atmosphere usually liked to linger in the public workspace. If a human were to enter, they would merely think that this was an ordinary biology company. Only cultivators in possession of the bureau’s work pass would have a clear view of the area. The building with innumerable floors, the luxurious spiral staircase, the ancient paintings on the wall that had seen the lapse of time, and the seemingly-ordinary bonsai plants at the corner of the walls that were capable of breaking out into speech or song and even transforming into vines – all these was evidence of its uniqueness. Any scene in a supernatural film appeared cheap and clumsy in comparison to the management bureau’s true image. When Fu Li brought a thigh bone and drumstick to visit Seventh Uncle Sun, the clothes in his hands had already turned into a doll. Those black and short dog claws of his were particularly nimble. With a whoosh, he stuck the doll’s eyes on it. Seeing that Fu Li had arrived, he very happily pushed the frame containing the doll to the side and lay on the ground near the entrance, his black tail wagging. “Little Fu, you finally came to visit me.” The formation on the door flickered, and the items in Fu Li’s hands appeared in front of Seventh Uncle Sun. He leaned against his forelimbs, opened his mouth, and bit into the bone. Raising his head, he told Fu Li, “I really didn’t invite you into the city for nothing. You’re the only one who came to visit me in the past few months I’ve been locked in here.” “Appearance is very important to humans. You gave the fox spirit fake identification and allowed her to use that to cheat humans on the internet into believing her and buying her shop’s fake masks. In the end, their faces were damaged. This is called aiding the evildoer.” Fu Li leaned against the door frame and spoke to Seventh Uncle Sun through the barrier, “Don’t swindle any more people after you complete your prison sentence.” “What would I eat if I don’t swindle people?” Seventh Uncle Sun bit into the bone with ‘kacha, kacha’ sounds. A subtle callousness could be seen on his doggie face. “Are humans worthy of my kindness and goodwill?” “They can only blame their stupidity for being fooled!” Seventh Uncle Sun threw down these words, turned, and used his mouth to pick up the heat-preservation tupperware. He laid down a distance away, showing his buttocks to Fu Li as he continued to gnaw on the drumstick and bone. He didn’t forget to wipe the occasional splashes of gravy off his face with his claws. Fu Li walked out of the prison and ran into Zhuang Qing and Chu Yu on his way to the dining hall. Chu Yu hurriedly called for him to walk with them. “Fu ge, what were you doing at the prison? There’s no spiritual qi there and the air’s turbid,” Chu Yu asked curiously. “I went to visit someone from the same village.” “Oh, that field dog,” Chu Yu commented. “I never thought that that imprisoned dog was from your mountain.” “Not Reflecting Mist Mountain.” Fu Li shook his head and explained, “The yao cultivators of Reflecting Mist Mountain never cheat people, and they would never do things that harm others. Seventh Uncle Sun was a yao cultivator I met at the place I woke from my sleep.” <i>Where on earth would they find a yaoguai who didn’t cheat others?</i> Chu Yu cautiously glanced at Fu Li. <i>Senior Fu Li simply hadn’t been in the know when they were doing the cheating.</i>  After they returned from their meal, the management bureau received a report from a warm-hearted yao saying that a fox spirit had transformed into its human form and cheated humans of their money. The sum of money involved might have already exceeded two million. “Why is it a fox spirit again?” Chu Yu hung up the phone and furrowed his brows. “The fox race was involved in quite a few cases this year. The one from that fake mask incident hasn’t even been released and there’s already another fox who can’t wait to break the law.” “Zhang Ke, take Fu ge and Qing Xu out this time. It’ll be good to familiarize them with the workflow too.” The Daoist priest was in charge of capturing the yao, while Fu ge would be responsible for beating it up; this made sense. Late into the night, Fu Li watched a yao cultivator who was aggressively pulling at a certain human. He turned to look at Zhang Ke. “That’s a fox spirit?” Who knew whether the cultivators nowadays had been influenced by television dramas? The moment they saw a yao cultivator enticing a human, they would think of fox spirits. This was clearly a lemur. Biologically, lemurs were classified under the same category as monkeys, and had nothing to do with fox spirits. Hou Wei pushed the man leaning against her into the car. Closing the door, she stooped over and sent him a flying kiss, her smile sweet and beautiful. After the car moved off, she took out a cosmetic mirror from her bag and looked at her reflection, cursing, “F*ck, even someone provided for by a woman has the nerve to have an extramarital affair. What a waste of laoniang’s makeup.” After re-applying the lipstick that had been smudged by the man, she fished out her phone, took a selfie of herself pouting, and then sent it to her moments. With her large eyes and palm-sized face, she looked very pretty in the photo even without beautification. Shortly after posting her photo, many men liked it. She sneered and placed her phone back into her handbag. Lighting a cigarette, she leaned against the streetlamp and puffed out clouds of smoke. When a young man wearing a white top walked over to face her, she spat out a mouth of smoke. “Big sister isn’t interested in tender fledglings like you, keep your distance from me.” Fu Li took out his work pass. “Hello, I am an employee of the cultivators’ management bureau. Please take out your identification for verification.” Hou Wei’s grip on the cigarette had slackened from shock even before hearing the full three words ‘cultivators’ management bureau’. She bit her fiery-red lips and said pitifully, “Older brother, all I did was sleep with a few humans. I didn’t absorb their vital qi or yang qi. T-That isn’t illegal, right?” “We aren’t concerned about things done with mutual consent,” Zhang Ke walked out from behind. He took out his work pass, shaking it. “What we are concerned about is your suspected involvement in cheating humans of their money.” “Those were willingly given to me, how is it considered cheating?” Hou Wei blinked her large eyes. “Older brother, let me off this time, okay?” “Save it, the fox spirit I met the other time was far better at seducing people,” Zhang Ke took out his magic weapon, facing Hou Wei. If Hou Wei refused to cooperate, he could only capture her by force. Seeing that these three men couldn’t be moved by force or persuasion, the smile on her face vanished. “Those men were asking for it by fooling around outside after marriage. So what if I cheated them! You rush to bother me after hearing that I cheated them of their money, but why didn’t anyone punish those slag men when they had extramarital affairs? Even if it wasn’t me, there will be other women. Can you manage all of them?” “Human affairs aren’t under our control, we only manage things related to the cultivation world,” Zhang Ke knew that there was some logic to Hou Wei’s words, but without rules, there would be no structure and orderliness. If all yao did evil on the basis that humans also did wrong, then the entire cultivation world would be in chaos. Today, a human who littered deserved it even if he was killed. Tomorrow, it would be fine even if a human who uttered profanities was eaten. Following that, it could become ‘humans should be eaten’. “But according to human laws, half of the money you cheated from them belongs to their human wives. Those men deserve to be swindled, but the women are innocent,” Fu Li wasn’t taken in by Hou Wei’s words. “According to human laws, those men’s extramarital affairs are illegal. And the way you swindled them is also wrong. Just because someone else did wrong doesn’t mean you aren’t at fault – these are two very different things.” Fu Li words choked Hou Wei up. A long while later, she took a puff of her cigarette and spat out the smoke at them. “None of you were even born yet the year laoniang traveled to the central plains. On what basis do you think you can capture me?” Seeing that the three people didn’t have higher cultivation than her, Hou Wei looked up at the moon in the sky as she flicked the cigarette ash off. “Why don’t we all compromise a bit? I’ll return half the money to those men’s wives and you guys won’t put me in jail.” She had heard that yao cultivators who were captured and made to do forced labor in the management bureau would revert to their original forms. She would not put up with such a thing! “You realize now that being in jail isn’t a good thing, but what were you doing in the past?” Zhang Ke laughed irritably. “Fox spirit, we do things according to the rules. We’re not running a business.” “You’re the f*cking fox spirit!” Hou Wei pointed at her pretty and large eyes. “Are you blind! Are a fox spirit’s eyes as large and pretty as mine?!” Zhang Ke didn’t understand the reason behind Hou Wei’s sudden outburst, her display shocking him into retreating a few steps. Soon after, he heard a string of classic insults known nationwide, none of which was repeated. Zhang Ke turned to glance at Qing Xu. Qing Xu’s fingers were pinched together in a Daoist gesture, looking entirely like that of a lofty individual beyond worldly affairs. He immediately understood – Qing Xu could not be counted on for something like arguing. Turning his head, he took another look at Fu Li. Unexpectedly, the other was listening to the insults with relish, seemingly very interested in the curse words. “Fu ge,” Zhang Ke tugged on Fu Li. “These are all curse words, don’t take them seriously.” “All these curse words were learnt from you humans?” Fu Li’s face was filled with reverence. “I didn’t expect you humans to also have such tremendous creativity when it comes to language.” As a human, Zhang Ke didn’t feel the slightest bit of pride that came with being praised. “But, she really isn’t a fox spirit,” Fu Li said. “I’ve seen her original form in &lt;World of Animals&gt;. It’s called a lemur.” Hou Wei, who was spouting curses at them, stared dazedly at Fu Li upon hearing the word k2018;lemur’, as if someone had pinched her neck. As early as the beginnings of the Tang dynasty, a rumor had started circulating from who-knew-where that lemurs would bring people misfortune. This resulted in many wealthy merchants specially purchasing lemurs at high prices and using them as weapons against their competitors. There were people who captured countless lemurs and traveled towards the central plains to exchange them for refined clothing and household utensils. As the journey was a long one, nine out of ten caged lemurs died. Even if they were fortunate enough to make it to the central plains, they would fail to escape death due to the fear humans had towards them. She was lucky. Since she had already gained intelligence, she managed to survive the journey. Afterwards, she was purchased by a rich merchant and thrown into their competitor’s yard. However, the mistress of the competitor’s household was an extremely kind lady. She hadn’t disdained her for her ugly looks, nor did she believe the rumors outside. Instead, she took her in. Yet, such a good woman was poisoned to death by her husband, all because her husband had a love affair with another woman and didn’t dare to divorce her out of fear of her family’s influence. Hence, he could only use this sort of ruthless means. She didn’t understand why a couple who had pledged to live to an old age together could so easily cease to be faithful, even being so heartless as to want the other party’s life. Were all those oaths of eternal love fake? On that night, she transformed into her human form due to resentment and killed that heartless man. She had lived for 1500 years and almost no human cultivator could see her original form. Why was this person able to state her original form so easily? Hou Wei threw away the cigarette butt and looked vigilantly at Fu Li. “Who are you, why can you see my true appearance?” “You aren’t even half my age, how hard can it be to make out your original form?” Fu Li gazed at Hou Wei with concern for the younger generation. “Come, I’ll give you two options. One, cooperate with our work and leave with us. Two, be taken away by us through force.” “Senior.” Hou Wei straightened her body and said pitifully, “I’m a foreign monkey who doesn’t understand the rules of the central plain’s cultivation world very well. Spare me this time, I won’t do such a thing again in the future!” Zhang Ke finally understood what it meant to switch attitudes even faster than flipping through a book. This was certainly not what she looked like just now when she was puffing out smoke and cursing people. “Your breed might not be native to our country, but your cultivation methods aren’t any different from our country’s. Moreover, you broke the law in our country,” Zhang Ke took out his phone, snapped a photo of Hou Wei, uploaded it into the work system and ran a check on it. “Oh, you even have an identification card in our country. After living on this land for more than a thousand years, you still don’t know our rules?” Hou Wei hadn’t expected her lie to have been seen through so easily. Turning her head, she caught sight of the many people behind her passing by. Her eyes shifted and she instantly hatched a scheme internally. Taking a deep breath, she sank her breath to her dantian, and yelled loudly, “Help, a hoodlum molested me!” “F*ck, this woman is too shameless,” Zhang Ke suffered a huge shock. He hurriedly glanced around their surroundings. Upon seeing that there was no reaction from the passersby, not only did he not heave a sigh of relief, he became even angrier. “No reaction even after hearing a girl scream for help, what kind of people are they!” “Sorry, I set up a barrier in passing just now, so the people outside can’t see or hear us,” Fu Li smiled innocently. He reached out to grab Hou Wei and she immediately reverted to her original form. A large-eyed, not-very-good-looking lemur landed in Fu Li’s hands. <i>“Zhi zhi zhi zhi.”</i> The lemur struggled for a while, but in the end, its four claws stilled, and it lay motionless on Fu Li’s palm. Then, it curled up its tail bit by bit, hiding its shockingly large eyes. “Quite cute,” Fu Li turned his head and spoke to Zhang Ke. “Let’s go back.” “<i>Zhi?</i>” The lemur’s tail shifted a little, revealing its large eyes as it looked timidly at Fu Li. It seemed she had never thought that someone would actually praise her for being cute. Hou Wei was brought to the management bureau. During the course of the investigation, it was found that she had not violated the laws by using bewitching techniques while she was in a relationship with the human men. The money was also voluntarily given to her by the human men. However, Hou Wei’s actions were suspected to have damaged the human couple’s relationship. Hence, an internal disagreement resulted when it came to determining her sentence. While everyone was arguing with no end in sight, Fu Li spoke up. “Hou Wei’s behavior was wrong, but we realized during the investigation that she did not take the initiative to contact those men. It was those men who had deviant intentions towards her and actively courted her. From this perspective, Hou Wei would not be considered the main perpetrator,” Fu Li took out the documents on the investigation. “Furthermore, Hou Wei expressed that she is willing to return the money to those men’s companions. If any of these companions want a divorce, she is willing to testify and prove that the men who engaged in extramarital affairs were the parties in the wrong. This would allow the women who were negatively affected to receive more assets upon divorce.” “If this is the situation, then I think we can reduce Hou Wei’s sentence,” Xu Yuan snorted coldly. She didn’t have much goodwill towards the men who engaged in extramarital affairs. “If we think through Hou Wei’s case carefully, her actions should be considered a boon and not swindling.” In the end, the conclusion everyone arrived at was for Hou Wei to return all the money to those men’s companions. After paying a fine, she would then be exempted from serving a prison sentence. However, she would need to do two years of volunteer work in a human community, so as to interact more with humans who led ordinary lives. To the management bureau, Hou Wei’s case was merely an ordinary one. Not only would they punish the wrongdoer Hou Wei, they would simultaneously give those cheating men their just deserts. As for how exactly they would do that, that was the bureau’s internal secret. On Fu Li’s seventh day at the bureau, he suddenly exploded in popularity on the internet. It turned out that the wacky program that intentionally scared people had broadcasted the edits of the fake ghost in the lift. Among the various people who were frightened into crying or making a fuss, Fu Li was a breath of fresh air. The moment the ghost leapt out, his first thought wasn’t fear, but to remind the other party not to jump in the lift. The interview that followed was also very interesting – he didn’t say anything other than emphasizing that wreaking havoc in the lift was not allowed. With such a security guard in the hotel, the feeling of responsibility and security was overwhelming. Of course, one other important point was that this security guard was very handsome. A netizen very quickly found out that not only was this bodyguard completely unafraid of the ghost, he had even saved a young lady who was being harassed by hoodlums, as well as a python who was struck by lightning. The evidence was the picture the young lady had attached to her weibo post when she was searching for her benefactor, as well as the Forestry bureau’s weibo post expressing thanks. Netizens who learnt that the security guard worked at Affinity Moon Hotel flocked to the hotel to ask about him. Only then did everyone realize that this handsome guy had already resigned one week ago. The very disappointed netizens wanted to ask more about his whereabouts, but they learnt nothing no matter how much they asked around. There were netizens who felt that it was definitely some company’s way of promoting their internet celebrity. Yet, no matter how long they waited, this handsome bodyguard didn’t make a weibo post or accept interviews. In the end, they had no choice but to admit that he was truly a bodyguard whose brain was wired somewhat oddly. “Fu ge, you’re famous,” Zhang Ke walked over to Fu Li, phone in hand. “Many meng girls on the internet are calling you the most handsome bodyguard and want to birth your children. There are even Miss Perfects who want to take you in and support you.” “What children? We’re not the same species, we can’t have children together,” Fu Li was doing a set of history exam papers and didn’t even raise his head upon hearing Zhang Ke’s words. “I have a perfectly functional set of limbs, how can I be so shameless as to be supported by a human girl. How embarrassing would that be for a yao?” “It’s fine, it’s not like there aren’t many yao who’re being raised by humans. Not long ago, I even ran into a few cat yao who were comparing whose feces-scooper was more devoted,” Zhang Ke smiled mischievously. “What is yours when compared to them?” Fu Li shook his head, sighing, “In the past, it was considered shameful to become a human’s pet, yet it’s the common practice now. Public morals really are deteriorating with every passing day.” Zhang Ke gave two dry coughs and kept his phone, fearing that not doing so would turn him into a scumbag who led yao astray. “Everyone’s here?” Zhuang Qing walked in carrying a file. “The cultivation world’s once-in-a-decade population census is about to start. Work a bit harder these days and complete it as soon as possible. The method of counting is a bit more complex than the previous times – registration has to include address, number of people, house, and employment.” “Boss, isn’t that the humans’ criteria?” Chu Yu asked. “Why do us yao have to follow their criteria?” “We have to keep up with the times. Strengthening the management of the cultivation world is our responsibility,” Zhuang Qing handed him the file. “Evil yao have been appearing more frequently lately. Even the mountain imps hiding in the forests and mountains dare to venture into the city and cause havoc. What does this mean? This means that our work isn’t good enough.” The representative of the evil yao, Song Yu, lowered his head a little. Everyone was aware that there were no two ways about this, so they no longer talked about whether or not they had to do it, but who would be in charge of what area. Zhuang Qing glanced at Fu Li. “Fu Li, come to my office for a while.” Fu Li put down his pen, got up, and followed Zhuang Qing. After both people entered the office, Zhuang Qing tapped open a message on his handphone. “You transferred this one million to me?” “Didn’t I borrow one million from you? Now that I have money, I naturally have to return it to you,” Ever since the human called Zhou Chang gave him a check, he became someone with money, although it still wasn’t enough to buy a house in the capital. “You...;” Fu Li’s completely unperturbed appearance stifled Zhuang Qing till his anger had no way of dispersing. “Do you know that that’s a million?!” “I know, that’s why I returned it to you. If I only borrowed ten yuan, it would probably have already slipped my mind a long time ago,” Fu Li cast a resentful glance at Zhuang Qing. <i>This person was unhappy that he was returning him money, was there something wrong with him? He had queued up at the bank with much difficulty to transfer the check’s money into his bank account before he could return it to him, yet here he was getting angry.</i>  “Then did you know that the Hunyuan pill you gave me is worth at least two million, and that the raw diamond has immeasurable worth? Do you know how to settle your accounts properly?” Zhuang Qing finally couldn’t suppress the gloominess in his heart. He exclaimed in a low voice, “You’ve lived for four thousand years, what are you thinking of in that head?!” “Borrowing is borrowing, of course it has to be returned,” Fu Li patted Zhuang Qing’s shoulder. “You’re still young, don’t have such a violent temper. What if your cultivation drops? I’m not distressed over it, so what are you doing getting distressed on my behalf?” Zhuang Qing took a deep breath and swatted the hand on his shoulder. “Okay, just take me as a dog that catches mice then.” Fu Li muttered softly, “That’s not true. You’re a dragon who has no link to dogs.” Zhuang Qing tried very hard to remind himself not to flare up. He took two deep breaths. “Fu Li, many of the things that are worthless to you are considered rare treasures in this era. You’re a yao under my management bureau now, so I can’t just watch as you suffer losses. Understand?” Fu Li blinked. “Is the current cultivation world really so miserable?” <i>Those things he considered second-rate snacks were now rare goods?</i>  “There are still many things you’re unaware of.” Zhuang Qing watched Fu Li obediently lower his head as he listened to his teachings and sighed, “I told you before not to only watch news broadcasts?” “I didn’t. Lately, I’ve been watching &lt;Approaching Science&gt; and &lt;Animal World&gt;.” A while later, Zhuang Qing replied with gritted teeth, “Okay, as long as you’re happy.” “Zhuang Qing, you’re really a good dragon. I’m living my life quite happily now,” Fu Li smiled merrily. <i>This dragon might be a bit bad-tempered, but his heart was very good.</i>  Zhuang Qing chuckled sarcastically. “You...;” Zhuang Qing’s voice cut off abruptly. He turned and glanced out the window, his expression grave. “What dense yao qi.” “It seems to be coming from the direction of the East Sea,” The East Sea was very far from the capital, yet the yao qi still reached this place. It was clear that it was a great yao with profound cultivation. The two people’s gazes met. Morphing into streams of light, they vanished into the horizon. At the coast of the East Sea, night had already descended. In the dense mass of roiling seawater, the image of an enormous monster was faintly discernible. Shoals of fish fled in all directions. There was not a single bird in the sky. Ilyz: I see you guys are divided on whether or not FL is a rabbit~ I wish I could do a poll just to see what everyone thinks 🤔 Also, DDAS will be updated twice per week on Tues and Fri from next week onwards. Thank you for being so patient ^_^